      "identifier" : [
         "80425"
      ],
      "text" : [
         "libapt of mars 1858-1918",
         "'t' W , I j ST. ANN PATRONESS OF THE ACADEMY",
         "Q",
         "lv~'",
         "i FOREWORD i ~ IXTY YEARS ago four Sisters of St. Ann landed i ~ ini Victoria. They had ciossed the Isthmus of Panama on newly laid rails-the first railway ~ that ever spanned America from ocean to ocean. They had gonc forth, like Abraham of old, out of their country and of their kindred, to found a new home on the shores of a tranquil sea. And even as God blessed Abraham and prospered him, so the blessing of God rested on the littIe community of four, and caused it to flourish.. HE ACORN is now grown into a sturdy Oak beneath the shadow of which Sisters of St. Ann from rnany a corner of this far Western Vîneyard find respite from, labour and fresh strength ta bear the burden and heat of the day.. They go their way weeping, sowing the seed . they shall corne again with joy, bringing their sheaves with them.\" Ps. 125:6. In the footsteps of the four pioneers, hundreds have followed. And they, too, have sown in tears for othere to reap in gladxaess. But who *hall so torecast the years. And find in loss a gain to match? Or stretch a hand through time to catch The fr-off intercast of tears? One there is, and One only. Others note the lasses which the years bring. when Ou aofle is frilln into the sear. the yellow lear;- He notes the gain. So the idie passer-by sec the corn bleached by the suns of autumnn, and is perhaps saddcncd at the thought of the bloom and verdant beauty that bas passed with the sprzngtime. But the husbandman - rejoice in his new-found treasure of golden grain. These covers bind together ane small bundie of sheaves from the sowings of six decades. 4-ALEXANDER MACDONALD, ~, . Rishop or Victoria . pcintecest Day. 1918 MM£'% k",
         "INTRODUCTORY --Iý ICTORIA, at the southern extremity of Vancouver Island, a city basking in the favour of niountain, rv4 sea and climate, is rich ini historic mnmns yAmong these are the s;ster-buildings, St. Ann's Academy and St. Joseph's Hospital, on Humboldt Street. Both institutions are conducted by the Sisters of St. Ann. The former was opened sixty years ago this june 5, 1918,; the latter, eighteen years afterwards in 1876. Tracing the origin of these Sisters of St. Ann; learning the motives which led therm to cross from the peopled east of the Dominion to, its unsettied west - taking part in their private and social round of duties; following their progress- such is the purpose to which this CHAPLET 0F YEARS gladly lends itself in commernoraition of the Sixtieth Anniver- sary of the arrivai of St. Anra's Sisterhood in Victoria, B.C.",
         "PART 1. A CHAPLET 0F YEARS - ORIGIN 0F THE SISTERS 0F ST, ANN N one of the fairest orchards of a parish fi, tingly called S\"Terrebonne,\" near the city of Montreal. a womnan about ït~1.th*rty-fivc sat in grave conversation with a young man somne tweive years ber junior. They tivere brother and sister, their eyes told you that--large, brown, vivaciaus eyes. welis of kindness and humour. \"My dear brother, 1 have corne c-n this visit ta the aid home to tell you that I have formed the project of founding a religious order.\" \"Esther, that is a very solenin undertaking - do you realize what it means? Yau know better than 1 do, that founders of religiaus orders have had ta pass through bitter ordeais.\" \"Yes. John, I have long counted the cast and wrighed the suffering, and I frankly admit that nature shrinks from it al; nioreaver, my reason holds out before me that it is temerity on mny part ta entertain the remotest idea of being instrumental in establishing such a work in the Cburch, but. again. I arn urged on by an irresistible force which I believe may be divine. I can no longer resist the inspiration, nor argue with doubt.. As you are now the representative of the f amily. 1 thought proper ta inforni yuu of my design and let you know that 1 wili at once take the initial step tawards its fulfilment.\" **It is a seriously important one. Esther, and 1 dread to think of thie pain and misunderstanding it wili bring upon yau. At home you were doubly dear ta us aIl. and now as mistress of your fiourishing schooi in Vandreuil, where yau enjoy the favour of 'la Seigneuresse' of Harwood Manor. you are highiy considered: in ail probability. the Cross wiil supplant this prestige.\" -Remnember, John, if it is really God's work, His grace will not be wanting.\" -Yes, nothing but our lack of co-operation with Hiim can defeat His purposes. But. may 1 know your plans?\" -Certaînly. 1 came here ta tell them ta you. The light of God may in time make theni more definite. just now. I have chiefly in view the Christian education of children in city boarding-schools. and in country parishes where schoals are few and fer bctwecn. The weli-to-do can [Pâte 7",
         "A CHAPLET 0F YEARS always find the way ta, education, but the poor must have it brought ta them at their very doors. God helping, I will organize a congrega- tien of young wornen. whose aim will be threefold: first. ta work out their own sanctification by taking the three vows of religion, and living under a comrnon rule;, second, ta teach girls in boarding-schools, and acccpt contrai af district schools; third. ta care for the sick, the poor, and the orphaned.' And so under the branches af the apple-trees, were laid the great lines from which St. Ann's Institute evolved.. Sa well werc they drawn that frarn Eastern Canada they have extended ta farthest sunset west, and ta midnight northwest, In the after years, when the courageous founuress, having tasted the chalice of humiliation, could say ta a novice, who was surprised that one who had donc such great things should naw be filling the rctired office of sacristan, \"The grain of mustard sccd must bc buried before ài can grow into a large trce,\" did she remember the peaceful, Arcadian orchard interview with lier brother? This young man's insight into Gad's dealings towards His foreniost workcrs. may sound far-fetched. but it should be borne in mind that in the surroundings and home of this man of the world, the lives of the Saints were famniliar tapics of reverent conversation. But at that lime. Miss Esther Blondin and trials were practically unacquainted. They had been kcpt apart by the kindness. the exquisite tact. the graciaub .ignity and beaming cordiality with which she con- ducted her young ladies' boarding-school. None but those vcrsed in God's ways witi. His chosen friends could have foreseen that thcy shoffld anc day be interlockcd. The Cross, ýh 't badge of God's nearcst and dearest. alone could have substîtuted voluntary trial and abnegatian for Miss Blondin's hitherta peaceful course of life. She. tao. knew God's ways with those who take up His livery,: sa it was nat lightly that she balanced her advantageous position with the Cross, and freely relinquishcd the ane te embrace the other. Another voice. besides her brother's. prcpared her by saintly warn- ing for the difficulties of her piaus enterprise. This was Bishap Bourget. to whomn she explaincd in persan thc caîl she felt ta sever herself marc camplctely from the warld and found a cangregation of religiaus womnen, devotcd ta the Christian educatian of young girls. Page 8)",
         "ORIGIN 0F THE SISTERS 0F ST. ANN -Such a determination is most weigbty,\" said the Bishop. \"and requires mature deliberation as welU as the moral certainty that it is the will of God.\" \"I know that my project is beyond any means of mine. either natural or supernatural. but I believe that God wants me ta be His instrument and I amn ready for any sacrifice. I cannot rest satisfied unless I try to do something towards promoting this new organization.- '-I advise you ta examine. study, and discuss every aspect of your proposed religious undertaking that you may find out if your resolution springs from mere human enthusiasmn, or frorn the Holy Ghost. Your prirnary duty is to weigh ail things wcll. Mearawhile, you may associate piaus young women with your work.- Miss Blondin toak her leave of the Bishop ira the following words. flow s0 treasured by the hundreds who have since called ber their Mother-Poundress: -I arn not deceivcd as ta the trials and labours which await me in the new path 1 feel myself called ta tread. but Almighty God, so rich irn His benefits. bas neyer forsaken those who place their trust in His Providence.\" Encouraged by His Lardship's appraval. Miss Blondin returned ta Vandreuil and resumed her duties at the bcad of the Young Ladies' Boarding and Day School. This \"Pension\" had been apened by Miss Susan Pinault in 1833. Becoming more anad mare favourably known. its increasing roll made an assistant necessary. But Miss Pinault would accept only ane wbose chief motive, like hers. was ta give religion the faremost place in the system af education. Miss Esther Blondin was this desirable person. She had been recornrended by twa Sisters of the Cangregation who had received hospitality at the Pension. Miss Bloradin's resalve ta open a novitiate ira which she would be the first probationist for the projected Order. made no perceptible change in the schaol scbedule, but tbe directress made known her intention of forming into a religiaus body the youn , ladies who wished ta cansecrate their lives ta God by placing their natural abilities at the service of the yaung. the sick. and the poar. through the vows of religion. The invitation met a much felt need and faund fervid respanse. The long warring struggles in the Atlantic Provinces being now over. the construction period began. Schools and charitable institutions were erected ira tawvns and villages with an activity and zeal which would have surpassed the ineaaus of the impoverished inhabîtants. bad not their esteem for learning prevaileci over every difficulty. Ipage 9",
         "A CHAPLET 0F YEARS Thc young wonen. desirous of making trial of the new association, placed themselves under the direction of Mr. Paul Archarnbault, the parish priest. and began training for their threefold duties, May 24, 1848. TRAINING FOR THE SISTERHOOD 0f paramount importance was the ireligious formation of the candi- dates. Even to the choicest of Catholics, such as those who now pre- sented themselves for probation, Christ gave much to learn and do. when He taught. \"Pc ye perfect as your heavenly Father is perfect.\" This exalted ideal is very inspiring and draws many, but between ideal and practice. lie the difficuit triple conditions, \"If you would be perfect, deny yourself, take up your cross, and follow Me.\" These rides are hard, and as we learn from the rich young mnan in the Gospel, few have the courage to follow thein. 0f fifty probationîsts who began to train, only five persevered through the required two years' novitiate. On Septernber 8, 1850, these heroines of self-denial, obedience. labour, and prayer, knelt at the altar in presence of the Bishop, of happy relatives, and the proud Vandreuil congregation, and with glad hearts pledged themselves to God by life vows. Since that day, the Institute of the Sisters of St. Ann, by steady growth and adherence to the rules and customns tested by its first exemplars, has held an honoured place among the religious congrega- tions of the Catbolic Church. FIRST FRUIT Among the visitors in the modest parlour -if the new Sisterhood, on that heaven-registered day, was the brother of Miss Blondin, the foundress. He looked with reverent admiration at the sanctified face, the consecrated features. More than any one else, he could share his sister's sweet emotions. he knew that she was the architect of an edifice with a stairway leading to the dome of Heaven , he saw au unbroken procession, ever coniing, ever asccnding to reach its goal at ths- feet of God. Manlike, he also grasped the meaning that new glory was attached to the family naine, by the sacred event that day recorded in Catholic Church History. It was a holy hour in a holy place, and bis heart expanded wide to receive its abundant benedictions. Filled with a realization of God's signal favours, he looked around the roomn at the visitors, and there- Page 10)",
         "I ORIGIN 0F THE SISTERS 0F ST. ANN in the bloom and blush of sweet sixteeri, he saw \"her\" and, like Jacob, loved. Shie, too, had corne ta the religiaus festival ta congratulate lier eldest sister, one of the five that day espoused ta the Divine Lover. \"Esther,\" as!ced the fond brother-be could flot yet call hier Sister Mary Ann, bier name in religion-\"who is that young girl tallcing ta the Sister yonder?\" The faundress smiled; intuitively she knew that happiness, new- born, carne ta two young people at that supreme moment. \"She is Miss Margaret Pinault.\" After this, the comiely yaung man and the fair young girl often met in the Convent parlour. then ini the home parlour, and finally in the House of God v.here, by solemn contract, they agreed ta meet ta part no more. The sequel was as blessed as the time, place. and persans which saw the blossoming of their acquaintance. Their sans and daughters took rank with the priesthaod, the cloister. the army, the hearth. It is significant that this union, in the fullest sense a mode) one, which developed under the sanctioning patronage of two haly nuns, began almost at the saine hour as St. Ann's Institute, whose chief aim is ta fit young girls for their place in the world. In the household of the pious couple, where religion. happiness and affluence blended beautifully together, conversation was more on con- ventual matters than on sociel . gossip. Tihere we learned much of the gifts and graces of MARIE ESTHER, THE FOUNDRESS, who had been appointed by Heaven's decree ta do the greatest work that can faîl ta woman. She was the third child in a family of twelve. Sa frail was she that her parents. when bending over lier cot, held their breath lest it shouid extinguish hier feeble spark of life. but God. who had a grand organiza- tion for hier ta lead ta happy issue, preserved hier existence, even ta, the age af eighty. From her tenderest years. Marie Esther bore the credentials of those ta whom God entrusts important missions. The neighbours and others who observed her remarkable bearing, ber expressive counitenance and hcer precocious mind. knew that she was destined for things of the highest order. Whîle still very young, she began ta practise self-control, and soon she acquired a degree of fortitude which enabled her ta bear annoyance and physical pain without betraying themn even ta, ber parents, who were extremely watchful of ber because of hier delicate constitution, [Page il",
         "A CHAPLET 0F YEARS At school she was known as the first scholar, the most endearing companion. and the best skilled ini reedlework. To this day pieces of altar linen, which she mnade when far advanced in vears, are exbibited, and excite the wonder of adept needlewomen. Her respect and affec- tionate attentions for the aged were eulogized far anid wide in the neighbourhood. After the exaniple of lier mother, who was well known for her charilies, Marie Esther f el great compassion for the poor. Ry a hundred an~d one little means suggested by her industry, she tried to lessen their needs. To work for the poor and to talk with theni, was veritable joy tu the refined and dearly loved girl. One very bot summer day Marie Esther happened to be at a friend's bouse, when she saw a poor old man corne painfully along. He entered the bouse and without a word sat down. He was middle sized, pale, and haggard; his long. white, unkempt hair fell on his shoulders;' bis face was soiled, and wet with perspiration. He was exhausted with fatigue and want. His large, black, luminous eyes seemed to appeal tu the little girl for help. An ordinary child would have been frightened, but Marie Esther was deeply touched. At that moment, too, she rernembered that her mother had said that Jesus Christ sometimes bides Himseif under the guise of a beggar, This thought sent an indefinable current through her soul. Instantly, she approached the poor old man, and, full of com- passion, asked him tu let ber wvash bis face and comb bis hair. When this was done, the poor old man, whose voice sounded rather choked, thanked the littie giri-she was then only eight or nine-and asked ber for something to, eat. Very sadly, she explained that this was not the house of ber parents, so sbe was flot free to take anything, but if he waited. she would go and ask permission of tbe lady of the house to give hini food. Sbe at once started out and baving soon found the good lady, immediately carne back with her, but to their surprise the beggar had diszappeared. They made inquiries everywhere to find out where the stranger had corne from and where be had gone, but neither then nor at any later tume was anytbing ever heard of the mysterious oId man. Already at this early age Marie Esther showed ardent love for the Blessed Sacrament, for the Passion of Our Lord, and for the Blessed Virgin. She was often seen before an image of Our Lady as if pouring out ber beart in loving confidence. Su careful and earnest was the preparation for First Communion made by this cbild of predilection that it influenced others for good. It also intensified the candour of ber features and made the beholders say that she seemed like an angel. Thosc wbo assisted at the cereniony Page 2",
         "ORIGJN 0F THE SISTERS 0F ST. ANN neyer forgot heu rapt devotion. Her piety was of the amiable kind. which neyer obtrudes itself, but ledves pleasing and fruitful impressions. and makes religion attractive. Such had been the childhood of Marie Esther Blondin; without doubt good St. Ann saw in it a reflection of that of ber own daughter, Mary. Surrounded by tender home care and lending herseif to the harmless pastinies of her environment, Miss Blondin attained her twenty-fourth year. At that tinie her health required a change of air, and Heaven directed her to Vandreuil. Here she flrst met Miss Susan PinadIt. wîth whom, as it has been said, she for several years conducted a select boairding-school for young girls. With identical aims in serving God and impartîng Christian education, the two young women united in the commun enterprise and tacitly vowed theniselves to religious teaching. Like the sisters, Martha and Mary, they worked and prayed in accord. The third part of their income was given to works of charity. The sick, the needy, and the indigent widow soon learned to bless these beneficent educators. Leading, as they did, a life which so rmuch resembled that of nuns, it seerns to us that the Most natural course of these excellent women would have been to join one of the established Orders. There were several f rom which to choose. But God wanted the Order of St. Ann on the Amnerican Continent, and He reserved thern for the undertaking. He slowly pre- pared conditions so that these, His agents, might be worthy of their model, St. Anti, the Immnaculate Maid's teacher, God's intentions gradually dawned on Miss Blondin. His voice becamne more distinct, more iMperatîve:ý but the undertaking appalled her. Humility shrank from its sublimity;' limited means feared its financial phase. Courage and trust in Providence are the unfailing channels through which saints bring about God's purposes. Miss Blondin had these. The financial element was supplied by Miss Susan Pinault. She had with- drawn frorn teaching and left the Select Boarding School under Miss Blondin's controI some years before her friend had penetrated the Divine Will in her regard, but upon hearing of the inception of St. Ann's Institute , she offered her thousands to the good project, and solicited admission amnong its probationists. Miss Susan Pinault was then fcrty-four years of age and used to a life of independence and ease. Moreover, she had indulged her taste for rich apparel. It would already have meant con- siderable renunciation to be a life boarder witli the Sisters, in return for the sum of money which she unrcstrictedly placed in their hands. [Page 13",
         "A CHAPLET 0F YEARS But this was flot going far enough to mneet her earnest desire of pleasing God in humility and perfect love. She put herseif with the youngest in the novitiate, and took up at the foot of the ladder the yoke of conventual rule, with itS minute practices of poverty and obedience. We know that she persevered. Miss Pinault's name, in religion Sister Mary of the Assuamption, is inseparably linked with that of her friend, Miss Blondin. The corner-stone of the spiritual edifice of St. Ann's Congregation rests on the latter, its financial basis on the former. Both these ladies were ladies indeed, with a charrning politeness which must have been transmitted to themn through generations of French blood. It is told with pleasant paraphrasing that on ont occasion - s Pinault was returning from church where she had been sponsor to a child, when the horse took fright and ran away.. In a glance she saw that safety lay on the opposite side of the road. Like a flash she sprang past her partner, and alighted safely on the solid ground, with the wee Christian snug in her arms. But in that moment of danger she had flot forgotten politeness, for the gentleman heard her say as she flew past him, out of the flying buggy, \"I beg your pardon, sir.\" TWO PRICELESS GIFTS Without doubt the new Order was now proved to be of God.. Its numbers steadily increased, and the sphere of its action grew quite dis- proportionately. The caîl to religious life is a mystery even to those who are called. Why one girl is drawn to the life at fourteen, and another at twenty-five; why one prefers a particular Order out of many which differ only in name and habit; how some come from long distances, and others from next door ; how French, English, Americin, Irish, Canadians and other nationalities converge at a centre by a law of common attraction-what power brings the convert of a few months to embrace the same vows and rules as the Catholic of many generations-these are the Miracles Of predestination. This cosmopolite family lives ini closest intimacy, seldom knowing, neyer caring, whether one's pedigree is high or low. There, the highest aristocracy is to serve God best. It is the fulfilment of tht Scripturc saying, \"The Spirit breatheth where it listeth.\" It breathed one day on a fourteen year old girl who had often gazed longingly at the newly professed Sisters of St. Ann and their convent. Page 14]",
         "111 I.RtwIUI 0F THE SISTERS 0F ST. ANN \"Mother.\" she said one day, \"I do so want Io wear a frilled cap like the Sisters. Will you flot let me go and be one of thern?\" \"My child, wearing the frilled cap dots flot make the nun.. That is a childish and unworthy motive for so holy a calling..\" Day after day the child coaxed, and always ber mother treated the subject as a child's whim. Finally, to put an end to these importunities, she called on Mother Mary Ann. \"I arn rather confused at troubhing you for a fancy of my daughter's, but she gives me no peace with her entreaties to bave me ask you to receive her. I amn sure she does not know wbat becomning a religious means, because she is only fourteen and plays more than she works.\" Looking iflto the eager, srniling face with her soul-penetrating eyes, Mother Mary Ann asked, \"What is your wish, my child?\" \"To wear a frilled cap and dress like you,\" was the guileless answer. The good widowed mother f elt she could sink tbrough the floor with mortification at this childisb admission, but the wise Mother General smiled approvingly - she could read deeper. In the clear, animated eyes of the young applicant, she saw that this attraction for a sombre garb and veiled head rather than for gay beribboned attire-as inexplicable as the preference of the violet for sbady places-was the germinating seed of a vocation, irresistibly pushed forward in the garden of Convent life. Admitted into ber wished-for element, the girl of fourteen accepted the rule gaily. Rising before five at ail seasons, obeying a bell which twenty times a day notified her to go from prayer to work, and from scbool to recreation; going tbrough a sort of apprenticeship in the many occupations which fill a Sister's daily programme, accepting agreeably the contradictions which mould character-such were the exercises of this young novice during two years. So congenial were they to ber that she took themn upon herself forever. A few years later, she camne to Vancouver Island where, as Sister Mary Bonsecours, she gave the fruit of this training for forty-five years. The orphans, especially, reaped the biggest part of this harvest. The native and half-breed children, also, received a plentiful share. In pre- trained-nurse tirnes. this up-and-doi-ig Sister ministered much in the bouses of the sick. Later on. the Victoria and Alaska hospitals knew the skill of her hands and the compassion of her heart Convent rule is conducive to long life. This professed of sixteen lived to celebrate the Fiftieth Ariniversary of ber taking the vows, known as a \"Sister's Golden jubilee.\" *The event took place in Victoria. St. [Page 15",
         "A CHAPLET 0F YEARS Ann's Sisterhood and Academy united ta honour the humble, cheery nun, who in those years had laid up so much gold, frankincense. and myrrh for her Divine Lord. Ten years pass, and the Good Sister celebrates her Diamond Jubilee. Now it is the Community of the Mother House in Lachine, P.Q., that assembles around the aged Spouse of Christ ta keep that Sixtieth Anniversary of her life-obligation ta God. Another plant, with marvellous properties ta spread and bloom, was presented ta the new Order in the person of Miss Teresa McTucker. She was flot quite fifteen, recently arrive,: from Sligo, Ireland. Few had as much right as she ta be called \"A Rose of Erin.\" British Columbia was ta know, love, and venerate ber as Mother Mary Providence-a gift of unusi'a! -vorth ta this Pacifie Coast Prnvince as well as ta St. Ann's Congrcgation. Names have sometimes been heaven-sent ta individuais ta signify their particular mission, that of Mati- Mary Providence belongs ta this prophetic class. After the first year of probation, Miss McTucker was clothed with the holy habit of St. Ann's and, according ta the Rule, received ber name in religion. Lady Harwood, a friend of the new Order, captivated by the blooming appearance of the Iris.i novice requested that she be called Sister Mary Rose. At the same ceremony, another novice, pitifully pocked and cantrasting in every outward respect with the prepossessing Irish girl, was to take the habit. The naine, Sister Mary Providence, was intended for ber. The family naine of each novice, with the naine by which she was henceforth ta be known, was written on a list froin wbich they were ta be read by the officiating priest. At the appointed place in the Ceremonial, the priest 6ave out the naines but inadverently connected Miss McTucker's with Sister M. Proveolence, and the other novice's with Sister M. Rose. The mistake might easily have been rectified when the Sisters rime out of the Chapel, but the slip was so unaccount- able that it was accepted as willed by Gai. Her subsequent career justified this interpretation, for she was a Providence ta great and small, ta rich and poor, giving counsel ta the ane and resources ta the other. No less God-willed was the substitution of Sister Mary Providence for anather religious who had been named for the Vancouver Island missions, and had already set out on the twa months' trip, when she became too ill ta proceed and had ta return ta the Mather House. The details are interesting and have their analogy in the Life of St. Francis Xavier. Page 161",
         "OUR ALMA MATER'S JUBILEE The Sun sinks low: against the darkening sky The truant sunbeams play among the trees, Or throw their golden shafts on mountain high;, While softly o'er thc rnadows and the leas, The summer sounds of insect and of bird Sink into murmurs, indistinctly heard. But hark! upon the balmy air doth break A sound that leads us back o'er Mernory's laný- A sound that bids our hearts front dreams awake, And cast aside the presenit woe and pain. Ah, souls!, ye know full well that solemn strain That guides us back ta girlhood days again. The Convent bell bas cal!ed, and fain we corne To kneel within the silent Hall of Prayer, And leave our tributes, even for \"the Sonie,\" Whose faces ne'er again shall meet us there. And 1i.ave as offerings at the incensed shrine. Wc go; the bell bas ceased to toîl. 'Mid tears We gcntly lay within their flowered bcd The withered rnemories of fifty years, The buds of proniise--open wide-now dead. And ini our hearts, as thus we say farewell, We feel what humant lips can never tell. The morning breaks. The golden rays of light Gild radiant the Convent's weathered walls; Nature in all ber grandeur and lier rnight, Her various satellites of beauty cails. And fain we join wîth theni in mirth and gice, To celebrate thiq Golden jubilee. With loving hands, we weave our blossonis fair Into a coronet. than jewels more bright, To crown our Alma Mater's silvered hair- A tropby of b aîf a century's flight. Once more the halls re-echo sounds of old,, Once more tbe tales of girlhood are retold. Ah, swcet it is to live tIr! days of yore, To clasp the hands again tbat are so dear; To turn the golden page of Mermory o'er AAnd flnd it traced with love and joy and cheer- Asymbol of that \"Union\" which will be One glorious. endless Golden Jubilee. BESSIE NUTTALL-HOPKINS.",
         "RT.. REV. MODESTE DEMERS FIRST BISHOP OF BRITISH COLUMBIA AND ALASKA 184 7-1871",
         "PART II. * THE CALLTO9VICTORIA BRITISH COLUMBIA THE VOYAGE ,HE young Order, being the work of God, soon became favourably known, and was invited to open branch houses in several parts of the Province of Quebec. It was to extend beyond. As early as 1858. Rt. Rev.. Modeste Demers, Bishop of the country lying north of the State of Washington and west of the Rocky Mountains. with his Sec in Victoria, Vancouver Island, made application to the Order to assume mîissionary work. It was to be a literai setting out without scrip or purse, Salary. or a fund, however slight ta begin with, or to look forward to, was flot to be ýhought of. The most the Bishop could do was ta defray the travelling expenses of the first four Sisters. selected f rom forty-five who, with one accord, had volunteered for that poorest portion of the Church's vi neyard. The names and birthplaces of these Sisters, to whom British Columbia owes the highest examples of devotion to God and human- kind, should be forever chronicled. They are.- Sr, M. Sacred Heart -- Salome Valois. Vaudreuil. P.Q. Sr. M. Angele - -Angele Gauthier. Vaudreuil. P.Q. Sr. M. Lumina - - Virginie Brasseur, Vaudreuil. P.Q. Sr. M. Conception - - - - Mary Lane, Rawdon. î.Q. Leaving Montreal, April 14. the Sisters arrived at Victoria. June 5. Their route had taken them by rail to New York, th,-n down tht Atlantic to Aspinwall, across the Isthrnus o! Panama by train. up the Pacific to San Francisco, then on ta Vancbuver Island.' in ail a two months' trip for what would now take only ont hundred hours on the C.P.R. Imperial Limited. From tht pleasant and uneventful voyage there remains the rnemory of an incongruous but amusing incident. which is stili recalled with Iaughter. After crossing the ncwiy-laid Panama railroad. the Sisters had ta bide their chance to embark on ont of the steams1-,s ten-iers. One thousand seven hundred passengers. ail men. with an immense amount o! baggage. and niany cette. were here waiting to board the steamer John Ellis, then bound for San Francisco. These men had joined tht mad rush ta the recently discovered gold fields in Cariboo. 1Page 19",
         "WI 1 A CHAPLET 0F VEARS 1W It was ne easy matter te force one's way through the excited crowd ta the steamer. After waiting two hours in vain for his chance. the i3ishop, wha was the head cf the party, fearing the Sisters might catch yellow fever if exposed longer to the pestilential atmosphere, hired mulattoes ta conduct the party te the anchered steamer three miles off. They agreed ta do sa for eight dollars. As there was ne landing place. the mulattoes waded knee-deep to the boats. carrying their passengers an their shoulders. The Bishop was carried ever first, then the priests and brothers. the Sisters looking on with dismay ta think they, tee, must be borne on the shaulders cf these mulattoes. Nothing had daunted themn se far, but te be hoisted an those naked shoulders, te grasp those mulatto necks, and ta be grasped by thase brawny arms, ah. this was toc inuch! Sister M. Conception. with truc Celtic independence, positively refused te submit to this mode cf travel, but finally had te yield te the inevitable. When the rnulatto teck her up she held an se gingerly that he nearly dropped her in thé Pacific. The irate mulatto scolded her roundiy fer thus ruining his reputatien as a carrier. Before consenting te carry over Sister Mary Angele, wha was cf generous weight and buiid, the porter demanded a double f -e. This fact afterwards was often jestingly held up te the gece, natured Sister. with the reniinder that as her passage had cost twice that cf the ether Sisters she was cxpccted ta do twice as much work. THE CABIN CONVENT Tht day after their landing the Sisters were te be secn at the great duty for which they had left Mothcrland. a severance which then implîed voiuntary exile. Their first wark was te niake their dwelling. which was a diiapidated cabin. fit for habitation. For some weeks tht sleeping apartment af the Sisters consisted of mattresses spread on the floor of the living room. and piled in a cerner during the day time. This -living reom\"- came by its name nîost honestly: it was a school room. cem- munity room. parlaur and office ail cambincd.. The paramauni duty ini which the Sistcrs at once engaged was ihai of teaching the yeung that wz. are on earth **to know. lave and serve God, and bc happy with -ini forever in heaven.- As a means te an end. the Sisters. then as now. impartcd this vital lesson through the medium of secular lezrning. The first Catechisrn lessosi given an Sunday. twenty-faur heurs after their arrivai. was Page 201",
         "THE CALI, TO VICTORIA, B.C ii followed on Monday by lessons in the three \"R's.\" No time was lost in. preliminaries, such as building and fitting a school; the cabin, 20x10. with a partition across dividing it in two apartments, was as satisfactory ta the four nuns who honoured it with thc nanie of '*Convent,\" as it was ta the childrcn who were happy ta cail it 'their school.\" Success and content were the rewards of labour and poverty, The demands in teaching and caring for the sick increased. Moreover. the elernentary programme which the Bishop had mapped out as sufficing the nccds of natives and half-breeds, had suddenly been brought ta highcr requirements by the unexpected influx cf population caused by the discovery of gold in Cariboo, while Mis Lordship was on his Eastern tour. The situation was at once made known te the Administration at the Mother H-ouse--which was now at St. Jacques, P.Q.-and urgent request was made for recruits. Negotiations were slow, for we must rememnber that it took four months for an answer te corne f rom Montreal te this far Western city. Seventeen months elapsed between the conxing cf the first Sisters and that cf two more. who swelled the Victoria Convent ta a community cf six. The new corners were Sîsters Mary Bonsecours and Mary Provi- dence, already introduced te us inl their sixteenth year at the time of their consecratien te God. Sister Mary Providence was net te have corne te the Western missions-, she was far toc promisîng and valuabit te St. Ann's Eastern convents te be spared there. and her talents tee excep- tional to be sacrificed ini a pioncer country. So decided those who sat in Council ta appoint workers for %he far. far distant country, but the bigher Council of the Ruler cf aur destinies over-ruled this reasoning. St. Ann's counsellors fixed their choice on Sister Mary Elizabeth, a first cousin cf Mrs. J. Sadiier. the well-known authoress. Sister inherited the same literary gif t and liked te give it expression by writing holy themes and spiritual books. Loving ber Sisterhood above ail things. as ail its members should, she wished to sec it win a great name, and being young and holding authorship in high esteem, she thought this might be donc through publishing books. Being enthusiastic on the point. anc day at the mid-day recreation when the Sisters were talking in happy vein. as is their way. the conversation fell on the Saints and the great things donc in the old Orders. Sister Mary Elizabeth broke out with the innocent exclamation,' How 1 wish our commuriity would do something in the Uine of lcarning to bring it before the world !' ipage 21",
         "W1 1 A CHAPLET 0F YEARS w1 \"My dear Sister,\" said the Superior, '*go and sheli the peas ini that basket and think while doing se, that the greatest glory of an Order. depends on the humility and obedience of its members.\" The Superior knew that tne good Sister had these virtues, and being herseif a woman of wharn it was said she bordered an genlus. she could appreciate the younger Sister's gif t. The lesson was not meant ta stifle it, but rather ta give pre-eminence ta the example of Christ, who havirig it in His power ta do great things was, as the Evangelist tells us, \"subject ta them.\" Because Sister Mary Elizabeth walked in these footprints of her Divine Model, she heard the voice of God ini that of her Superiors when they told her that, after much prayer and deliberation, thcy had narrid ber for the Vancouver Island missions. She gladly acquiesced and dili- gcntly prepared for the voyage and her future emplayments. Shortly before the departure from the Mother House it was noticed that Sister's encrgy had slackened, but this was attributed ta fatigue and suppressed emnotion. When the final h\u003co\u003eur of farewell came there was noa aisguising the fact that Sister was combating illness. There were some wbo thought the long sea voyage would do her good. others, that she would soon came 'j\u003eack. Among the latter was Sister Miry Providence, who went sa far as ta say ta Mother General, \"Do flot hesitate if you want a substitute for Sister Mary Elizabeth-, I amn quite ready ta go in her stead.\" The Sisters tried ta bush ber, so apprehensive were they that one so dear and necessary ta them,. would be taken at her word. Mother General accompanied the two Sisters (Mary Bonsecours and M. Elizabeth) to Montreal, where they were ta join the party cf other religiaus bound for the West, and finish preparations for the voyage. While Mother General was attending ta business, bath Sisters were gaining whatcver humred knowledge tbey could in hospital train- ing from their kind bostesses, the Sisters cf Providence. There wanted but forty-eight bours for the enibarkation when, late in the evening, af ter a strenuous day's tramp in the city, buying and packing and shipping. Mother General was gently informed by the Providence Superior tbat Sister Mary Elizabeth was down witb typboid fever, Poor tired Mother General, it was no time ta rest;ý she mxust think quickly and act quickly. and be back at the Mother House by next foreno\u003cln. She hired a vebicle where she had ta drivt, and a rowboat where the St. Lawrence was ta be crossed, and a cart for the country roads. At the river crossing so wild a stOrm raged that it was by sheer force of will she got the boatînen ta row ber over. Page 221",
         "THE CALL TOVCOIB.C. \"It would be daring the greatest danger ta cross the St. Lawrence * in such a storni neyer has it been so furious. the very demons seenri ta bc in it.\" \"Sa they may be,' answered Mother General, \"for I have no doubt * they want ta frustrate niy efforts ta serid a Sister ta a missionary land. where she wiIl deprive thern of much prey. Let us defy theni! Take me over, 1 amrn ot afraid, na harm will corne ta you ini such a cause.7 *The boatmen were won aver; they had not rowed fat before the storm suddenly abated and the remainder of the crossing was easily accomplished. After this, there were several miles of muddy road ta caver, and the early marning air was cold. Ta mnake rr.atters warse, the driver had left some of the wraps behind, and Mother contracted pneumonia. It was about eight ini the rnorning when the Sisters of the Mother House saw her arrive alane and haif chilled. \"What bas happened ?\" they asked with alarmn, as they hastily gathered araund her. But Sister Mary Providence approached and said with quiet assur- anîce, \"Mather, you have carne for me I knew yau would.\" * 'How cauld yau know, for it is only within the last twelve hours 1 * have knawn it myseif?\" \" This marning wben I was making my adoration on rising. a vaice * sajd, 'Make your oblation. Mother General is on ber way ta fetch yau ta jain the party going ta the Pacific Coast.' 1 have been expecting you.\" \"Yes, Sister Mary Providence, I have corne for yau. Sister Mar-y Elizabeth has developed typhoid and as this absolutely cancels her cali to the West, Bishop Bourget indorses yaur going. You have only a short time in which ta get ready, because we must leave ir a couple of hours.\" 1arn ready now,\" said the generous nun. who like a sinccre lover * of religiaus paverty. had no persanal belangings. When the Chaplain heard the occurrenIce which had led ta substi- * tuting Sister Mary Providence for Sister Mary Elizabeth he said. -The * finger of God is there.' The news that Sister Mary Providence was about ta leave far Van- couver Island soon came ta the cars of the pupils, and then followed indescribable scenes of sarrow and grief., Lý;z the belaved Sister. who for five years bad been ail in ail ta them: devoted mother in their needs. magnetic teacher in their studies, cangenial campanion in their play. ingeniaus conductor in their dramatic performances-part with Sister Mary Providence, the glary alike of Convent and town. this was desola- tian tao deep for words! Nor was this a passing moment af over- [Page 23",
         "1 A CHAPLET 0F YEARS 1W wrought emotion; to their very old age, the children who had feit the anguish of that parting hour, whether they had become wives or religious, remembered it with a renewed sense of pain. Such is the stamp of personality, that to the population of St. Jacques, in ail these sixty years, no other name has been so much as that of Mother Mary Providence, the exponent of the richest qualities of hcart, mind and soul in a superior woman. The Mother House is the fountain head of an Order, and St. Ann's in depriving itself at the outset of the co-operation of one of its ablest subjects. shows how costly was the responsibility of its missionary enter- prise. After giving two years' training to the young ladies who seek admission in its membership, arnd then and afterwards affording tbem the best available means of furthering individual capacity, the Mother House, naturally, would like these advantages to be placed to best account in some populous centre; instead, when set in mission lands, they are dis- pensed to comparatively few. The Mother House draws from the more robust, those who wilI adjust themselves to foreign climatic conditions, and best bear the hard- ships of pioncer settlements. Financially, i-, supports rather than receives, and has no proximate hope of return. Why. then, does an Order take these obligations? For the samne reason that Christ took our burdens upon Himself-to help bring the race to Heaven. United to the Divine Will, Sîster Mary Providence courageously bade fartwell to lier disconsolate Sisters and pupils. and began the long trip from Montreal via Panama. Io longitude West 123 19' and latitude North 48 30'. The Sisters in Victoria wrote their namnes in this pithy sentence, -AIl good things have corne to us, with her.\" Countless others of various race and creed have said the saine of this nun, who was so resourceful for the necdy. and so strong to support those in trouble. Sister Mary Providence was only twenty-two. and the youngest of the Victoria Convent Sisterhood. when she was placed at its head. This was young for so important a charge. The sceptre of an Empire can be placed in the hands of a girl of eighteen. as was the case with Queen Victoria and Queen Wilhelmina, but to be Superior of the least of con- vents at that age is unheard oi. twenty-five being considered young; as for being Mother General of an Order. forty is the minimum age. Page 241",
         "SIXTY YEARS AGO I. Full ten and fifty years ago, There came ta bless aur Western land, A zealous group of noble souls, The humble Sisters of St. Ann. il. Thcy left their far-off Eastern homes, This brave, heroic littie band; Thcy came ta spread His gospels far, Ta teach His word on every hand. Ii. Not easy were the tasks assumed-- To heal the sick, ta teach the youth, To comfort ail whom sorrow touched, To guide the erring back ta truth. IV, Now sixty years hape rollcd away, Since flrst these mi'iist'ring angels can'er; With laving pride we view taday, The work accomplished in His name. V- Success has crowned their efforts brave, Each cherished hope has been fulfilled; A stately convent rears its walls- Mute testimonial ta their skill. VI. Ring, diamand bells of jubilee. Let joy and gladness have fui! sway; With grateful, loving hearts we're camne To celebrate this festive day. VII. Amidst this joy, can we forget The dear anes who have gone befare? Ah. na! We miss each gentie face, Thase loved anes wham we sec na mare. viii. We know that they're rejoicing now, With tender love they're looking down. Too soon their mortal course was run, Too soon they earned the golden crown. Ix. We pray that in the future years, God's chaicest gifts He will bestow, And that His b!essing still may rest, Upon these workers here below,. x. And we, who're gathered here today, Trust that we all may live ta sec, And hLlp once more ta celebrate St. Ann's Centennial jubilee. MARY GODFREY..McBRIDE.",
         "A CHAPLET 0F YEARS THE CABIN CONVENT Appearances were assuredly against Victoria's first Convent School. It bordered on Beacon Hill Park near the entrance of what is now known as Heywood Avenue, but was then a littie back street. In the fali of 1858 the original building had been doubled, and now presented a frontage of 40 feet, 15 feet high;' two doors. four windows and a belfry. The school furnishings, ail home manufacture. were of the sirnplest sort. Humble as was this primitive school, the pupils were satisfled with its arrangements, and happy in their trustful affection for the Sisters. Lizzic Eddy (Mrs. E. E. Williams), San Francisco, the first resident pupil registered, writcs from that place fifty years later: \"I off er My congratulations on the wonderful progress the Sisters have made., There wcre four Sisters when I was at the Convent. I ran see them now; one was Aunt Aigele-we calied them 'Aunt' in those days. She was one of the dearest souls that ever lived - she saved me f romn many a punish- ment, for I was always in disgrace. 1 look back and sec how hard those four Sisters worked - they sawed the Iogs with a cross-cut saw, and we children sat on the logs to keep them steady. It was f un for us, but hard work for them.\" We could wish that the reward of labour under such circumstances would have been to immune the toiling Sisters from suffering, but such was not the case; for the writer continues:ý \"Aunt Conception was con- fined to her bcd with a swollen lcg and one Sunday I was at home to take care of her. It was winter, and as I sat by the stove in the dining- room, I lit a splinter and put it in a crack of the papercd partition which separated the dining-rooni from the chapel. As no miracle took place, the Convent was set on fire. Aunt Conception smelt the smoke. How she got down stairs I do not know. She took a rug and smothered the flames, but a portion of the chapel was ruircd.. What dire puni shment do you suppose 1 got for so dire a deed? I was made to sit and look at the burned wall and charred chapel. \"This is only one of the many naughty things I did. I would dearly love to meet some of the dear cnes, but instead, 1 send ail the best wishes one can scnd for continued prosperity.\" Doctor Tolmie, in his intercsting diary of those early times, has an entry of his mnedical visit to -one of the Sisters who had a very bad leg.\" Indecd, it was so bad that there was grave talk of its being arnputated. Page 26]",
         "3JTHE CALL TO VICTORIA, BC. If many naw credit Christian Science with healing power. why not, with greater reason, believe in the much aider and more efficaciaus HEALING BY FAITH? Sister Mary Conception, who by nature was very compc\u003esed, said littie when she heard the medical verdict, but she resolved ta try the efficacy af the sign af the Crass and haly water befare the surgeans came with their anodyne and instruments. Her faith and devaut use of these two sacramentals. were rewarded-she was perfectly cured ini ane night. Next day she resumed her duties, and neyer fram that time did she experience the least weakness or discamfort in that member, though she reached her nînetieth year.: Other impressions of childhaod at St. Ann's, besides thase of 'mis- chicf\" and its follower, \"clernency.\" left influences which tîme and distance made mare and mare sacred. Since the persans who do indivîdual gaad bring praise ta their city and spread its fame, it will be gratifying ta Victarians to read the foilowing communication dated 1908, fromn Mrs. Esther Samnuels, 1763 Geary Street, San Francisco. -Truly the days spent at beioved St. Ann's were ail interesting. I date very far back, having attended the Convent from 1860 to 1864. but no period of timne can efface the tnemories of days spent under the laving guidance of the dear Sisters, and my awn special teacher, *-Aunt Provi- dence,\" as lier laving pupils called her. Ta have been her pupil is a noble privilege. I shall neyer forget her sublime teachings, for every year that passes seerns ta brîng me that strength which she strove ta inculcate and which is mare uplifting as tume goes on. Neyer did I realize as fully the influence of those youthful days as at the time of the awful earthquake of April 16, 1906. While the earth was quaking and shouts af terror rent the air (for apparentiy we were doamed), memary brought back ta me the vision of a severe thunderstorm that occurred in Victoria in 1862. It had been starming terribly ail marning, culminatîng in a severe thunderstorm. The children were terror-stricken as the peals of thunder crashed and the lightning flashed. The schoolroom grew dark. and we ail crouched and huddled close ta aur beloved Aunt Providence.. lier eyes were closed. ber lips moved, and with her hands folded, she was praying for her littie flock.. The dark hour passed. We were in His care and knew no fear. As on that day, sa many decades past. the sarne feeling overcame me. Her influence was with me yet. God heard my prayer and gave nie the courage and strength 1 humbly sought. I treasure as a priceless gift the mnemory of the days spent 'in the Convent of St. Ann's, Victoria.\" [Page 27",
         "A CHAPLET 0F YEARS SOWING AND REAPINO Just as the beauty of the King's daughter, according to Scripture, is froin within, sa was Mother Mary Providence's strength. Calm in the ordinary course of things, she was equally sa in great events. As directress in educatian, counsellor in the parlour, or hostess to peerage, the saine case and dignity marked her mnanner; the samne calm in th~e quiet of the Convent, in sarrow, in difficulties, in lasses. This strength of the high-born came to bier froin a long line of Irish ancestry which had firmly withstood persecution for the faith. The great lesson which starnped Mother Mary Providence's whole if e was this, received at lier grand- mothcr's knee, -We have ail riches, if we kccp the faith.\" Faith was the great power which praduced the amaount of good donc by thîs admir- able nun. In hier this gif t was sa strong and natural that for it she would have gone ta martyrdom, quite as a matter of course, with the quiet dignity with which she went ta greet a welcomc guest, c- ta the chapel for Benediction of the Blessed Sacrament. It folws that the teaching and example drawn from such a source, was impregnated 'vith Catholic belief and precept. Much af it, like the Sowcr's seed, fell on good ground and yielded fruit a hundredfold. Lillie E. Baron, in hier \"Memoirs of my School Days,\" voices many hearts, when she says:. \"There stands out cleaily in my mind the happy days we spent in preparatian for First Haly Communion. How well I remember dear Mother M.: Providence as we went each day ta listen ta bier wards of wisdom and advice. They wcre sa impressed on aur minds that to this day we remember thein. We alsa remnember with affection, the gentie and loving teacher, wha cndeavoured to prepare each ane for a noble Christian lîfe.\" The effects of Mather M.. Pravidence's religiaus instruction reached beyand her immediate hearers; the pupilz she had taught with such canvincing faith. passcd ber lessans ta their children. Coming frain a land where aur Holy Faith was still suffering the consequences of persecutian, into another where apathy expased religion ta dangers no less seriaus, this wise teacher knew the losses sustained by the Church thraugh mixed marriages, and the impartance ta salvation of contracting a Catholic union. Sa much did she have this cause at heart that she would repeat ta bier class:, -Dear girls, you should pray on your knees night and marning that God may send you a Catholic husbancO.\" Page 28]",
         "THE CALL TO VICTORIA, B.C. W There are grey-haîred ladies toda' who tell yoi. thankfally that they did so, and how mnuch it has n-nt' -, their dorrestic harmony. So afraid are their daughters of being attracted by men out of the fol: that. going beyond the above prayer, they ask to be spared introductions or acquaintance with non-Catholics. 1I do flot want to know young men who do flot beloiig to our faith,\" said one. \"for I might be charmed by their manner, and through weak- ness, fali into a mixed marriage. This is too great a rnisfortune for me to run its risk by associating with any but Catholic men. Every day I pray to God to keep the others out of mny way.\" Among those who garnered Mother M. Providence's doctrinal teach- ing was a littie Jewish girl of eight. Though so very young she guarded closely the secret of hier love for the Catholic religion, Nobody ever suspected the innocent ruses she practised so as not to miss \"Aunt Providence's\" Catechism lessons. So rare a grace as that of the conversion of a Jewess, deserves to be told in detail. Though the convert was very reticent on the matter of her spiritual life, she slightly relaxed bier tension, when quite advanced in years, and on two occasions told the story of ber conversion to a few intiniate friends. It was taken down verbatirn to be kept by the Convent froni which issued the streani o! grace which made the wealthy Jewess an htiress to the kingdotn of God. the deeds of the transfer entailing banishiment from kith and kmn. THE MARBLE 1HEART «'I was nine years old when my mother placed my younger sister and me with the Sisters of St. Ann in Victoria. and entrusted us to Mother M. Providence's care. My parents being strict Jews had given us many carrnest e:diortazions flot to kneel or comply in the least degree with aiiy Christian forni. We promised obedience to their injunctions. Il was no-, without reason that they insisted so much on this precau- ticnary lesson., They had already had a littie experience with niy ten- dency towards Christian symnbols. Prevîous to this, when a mere tot. I had often accompanied onie of my sisters to the Convent School of the Sisters of Mercy, in San Francisco. My pleasure was cut short hy not being- allowed to go to the school any more. This was because I had formed the unconscious habit of repeatedly blessing myseif. -I Iovcd the Sisters dearly. but my greater love for mny rnother. -«hom I idolized. made the se-paration intolerable. 1 cried incessantly an~d became ill., so the Sisters were obligcd to summnon iny mother. [Page 29",
         "A CHAPLET 0F VEARS \"Regretful at partirxg from the Sisters but happy in her company, 1 left for home. \"Tbough I was so young, and had been so short a timne at the Convent, I had conceived a strong attraction for Catholic worship, and already in my youthful mind, had deterrnined to, be a Christian-some time. \"Now that I was sick, that 'Sometimne' seemned to become 'Now,' for 1 was afraid to die unbaptized. 1 was quite at a Ioss what to do, for ____ -.1 dared flot tell my mother. I knew of only one Catholic in the town, and I resolved to send for ber. My request to have ber corne and see me, displeased mTy mother, and she replied with somne rz.,her aspersive remark about the wornan. Quite shocked, I sat up in bed, and said. 'Mother, it cannot be true. because she is a Catholic. Catholics can't do wicked things!' Mother was annoyed at rny defence and lef t the roomn saying something 1 neyer heard, for as my eyes fol- lowcd ber retreating figure, another formn interposed itself. \"A beautiful woman appeared. clothed as 1 had often seen the THE CONVERT JE S Imrnaculate Conception at the 18 6 9 Convent. Her feet did flot touch the floor, but she seerned to be floating. She came near me, smiled and put out both arins. 1 tried to go to her, but was too weak, and while I gazed enraptured, she withdrew, stili smiling, still invitingly extending her arms. «*I was filled with a sweet peace whichi I can neyer forget.. I said to myself, 'It is because 1 defended Catholics that 1 saw the Blessed Virgin.' I feit sure it was Our Lady. I did flot dare to mention this at home, though foc days and days I could think of nothing else. Two weeks afterwards, being recovered froni the effects of my excessive lone- Iiness, I went back to the Convent, and I told mny music teacher what I had seen.: I was somnewhat better behaved this time, though I missed my moth r sorely. Page 30]",
         "TI-IE CAL LT TO VI CTO0R IA, B. C. \"On the feast of Corpus Christi there was to be a procession of the Blessed Sacrament, in which ail the Caitholic girls were to take part. My sister and I were deharred. I longed to join in the procession, and coaxed the Sister in charge of the boarder pupils to allow me to be in the procession, 'Just this once.' \" 'But you will have to kneel,' she objected. \"'Oh, ll kneel,' I declared, warmnly. \"'If you are ready to kneel that you may join in the procession. you should be willing to kneel in the chapel.' \" 'I do flot object, only do let me be in the processi on for this time.' \"I won niy point. My sister thrcatened to tell my mother. and reminded me of my promise, but to no avail. Oh, how happy 1 was that day! \"The years went by, and my desire to becomne a Catholic increased. Still I did not confide it to anyLody. 1 had a crucifix and a colleczion of the pious souvenir cards so dear to Convent girls who belong to any Christian denomination. My mother found themn and threw themn in the fire. She neyer knew how much of rny heart went with th:ym, those littie treasures of mine. I also wore a medal. This the Siste-s found out when in mny sixteenth year I f el sick unto death. Taking this emblem for a sign of my intentions. Father Seghers stayed within cail, ready to baptize me, if the crisis expected at midnight proved fatal. It was favourable. \"When I attained my nineteenth year. I resolved flot to delay longer in putting myseif in touch with a priest and becorning a Catholic. At this time the family was in San Francisco, because on account cf my father's business we lived in Vancouver Island and California alternately., \"My youngest sister was a boarder in San Jose Convent, and I was to go and spend the Easter vacation with her. This was my opportunity -once there, 1 would take the decisive step. \"My becomning a Catholic, I knew, would arouse great excitement. for those times were charged with religious intolerance. I realized. too, the grief this act would bring in my home. 'My home!' it might neyer again be mine. 1 loved the luxuries which abounded in it, the tender, vigilant watchfulness over mny frail healthe but more than ail, I loved my mother. No wonder that 1 hesitated about going on the everitfu! visit. somnetimes saying 1 would go, then again that 1 would not. One day my mother said, 'Do make up you.7 mind. For a girl of your age [Page 31",
         "A CHAPLET 0F YEARS you are very changeable. Decide once for ail whether or flot you wiIl go to sec your sister, then say so.' Little did she know why 1 hesitated. \"I did go. During the train ride and afterwards when 1 arrived at the Convent. I revolved in my mind how I could manage to see a priest. and that without exciting the suspicions of my sister, who hardly let me out of her sight. The girls had a play that evening and I sat at the back of the hall with my favourite nun, Sister Teresa. She always called me her 'Little Pagan.' 1 was playful and merry, but ail the time asking myseif. 'How shall 1 manage it?' 1 tilted my chair back and forth while 1 talked nonsense. As if by accident 1 tilted too far over, and losing my balance. fell quite close to Sister. She quickly stooped to help me. 1 whispered., 'I would like to talk to a priest.' I got up and Iaughied heartily over my fall. Ncxt day at five Mother Cornelia came ta me, saying. 'You wish to speak to a priest?' 'Yes. Mother.' -We have asked ane to came. He is in the parlour.' 'She led me to the door, and opening it, left me with him. I felt quite at case. My impressions of Father Seghers, around w'iom ail the Convent girls in Victoria used ta flock so lovingly. would have set me at case with this priest. I could not have fallen under the direction of one wiser or kinder than Father Masnata. S.J.. whom 1 was now meeting for the first time. At once 1 told him that since I was a li'tle child I hiad wanted to bc a Catholic. and that now being of age. I was decîded to, become one as soon as he would think me prepared. \"He inquirec if 1 had been instructed. I told him 1 had not but that I remembered the Catechism lessons. furtively listened tc, at St, Anln's Convent. Victoria. while pretending to studv.- 1 answered readily thc questions he askcd mie on Christian Doctrine. and repeated the praver he named. He told the nuns that I had been taught by the Holy Ghost. -After this the good prîest asked what I could do if I were in the neccssity of earning my livelihood. I answered that I was prepared ta teach -music. He lcf- me. saying that he would sec me the ncxt day. -When he carne a'-ain it was not to interview, but to act. 'l havc consultcd a lawyer in your interests. and he says that, being of age. you can do as you please.' '-Then. Father.' said 1. 'sînce 1 mu,,* go back to San Francisco in two days. would you baptizc me at once?' - 'Yes. since you wish it. Corne to the Church at fivc.' It waý; t Wednesday. April 14th, and the Church appointed was that of St. 0 Pa ge 321",
         "TECALL TO VICTORIA, B.C. t J oseph's. St. joseph bas heen mny guardian. and has neyer failed to conduct me under his roof: first to be baptized, then for my first Com- munion. which I made in San Jose Chapel. and now in a St. Joseph's Hospital, to spend the remaining years of in) life., \"As the hour of my baptismn approached, Mother Cornelia and Sisttr Teresa, the only two in my confidence, accompanied me to the garden gate. In a vcry short time 1 came back a Catholic. The good Mother held me in an indefinable embrace and cried as if ber heart would break. She gave me a book-mark picture e it represented the Child Jesus walking on thorns. \"'This is what you wiIl have ta do now.' she said. -Every year, on the anniversary of this day. I take it out. and hold it in my hand while 1 renew my baptismal promises. -When I re-entered my home a fcw days later, I feit likc a thief in the bouse. 1 tried ta be the sanie as before. Quite unawares. I was not, for my mnother would say. 'Do put off that Holy Mary look.' -Archbishop Alemany had given me dispenýsation from Catholic observances for the tîme being: but I had yearned so long ta be a Catholic. that now 1 was one 1 wanted ta attend Church. hear Mass, and receive the Sacraments. To do so I had recourse to innocent ruses. Among therm was the pretext for going ta the home of a Catholic lady in the neighbourhood. ta eat some of her baked beans. \"Perhaps on a Thursday evening. 1 would say. 'Mother. Mrs. Amos makes the loveliest baked beans. may 1 go over? She is -oing ta have some tonigbt.' -Thus. 1 had the happiness of spending the night there. and going to Church in the morning. But 1 wa-- soan deprived of xhis excuse by my mother's going to the house of my friend and asking hr- recipe for baking bezns. 'whicb my daughier praises sa much,* she said. **In June when I went to the Convent for the Closing Exercîses. 1 secretly mnade my first Communion. \"Ail those weeks I was waiting word from niy adviscrs ta acknowl- edgc myself a Catholic, and practise my religion openly,. The revtlation worked itself unaided. I did not bave to put in words bef are my parents that I was a Christian-they surmîsed it.. Was it intuition, or suspicion. or betraya: in my conduci.? I have neyer learned. iPagc 33",
         "A CHAPLET 0F VEARS ; \"One morning. I had dismissed niy rnajd. and was sitting on the rug putting on my shoes. when my bedroom door, which was off the boudoir. opened. and niy father appeared, my mother stood at a little distance behind him. \"Trembling and ashy pale. he said in a fierce, husky voice. 'Answer me, are you a Christian? If you are. I will shoot you. and myseif next.' \"I looked him full in the face. stunned. immovable. speechless. Was it my look, or my silence which disconcerted him? He turned away abruptly without another word. \"I was neai-iy dressed when rny dear rnother came in. overcome by e.notion. '-.I have not slept ail night,' she said, 'something tells n'e you are going ta become a Christian. If you do, I will do like your father.' -She went away. She had flot asked me to speak. «'After these harrowing scenes. I camposed myself as wcii as I could. and by breakfast time I was able ta go in the dinirig-room. and ask quite gaily. *Mother, wiil you came with nie ta buy my party dress? Mrs. Patrick, you knaw. said she would help us select it.' -I realiy wanted ta tell rny friend, that the farniiy knew and 1 must leave home at once. '-Mother watched me closely. but in the store I dropped a parcel. and as Mrs. Patrick and 1 bath stooped ta pick it up. I conveyed rny message. -~My friends. clerical and lay. knowing the influence of my family. and that they wouid have sympathizers in their angry grief over my defection. had taken ever precaution ta pratcct me. if this bccame necessary. -That afternoon. a letter from my lawyer advised me ta have every- thing ready ta leave an the train for Santa Clara. where he would meet me with a carnage ta conduct mn. ta the family with whom I was ta stay tempararily. Mr. McLoughlin. a Cathoiic banker. a perfect strangcr ta me. had affered me a home in his family. but my friends advised conceai- ment till the flrst violence of the storm. which they foresaw, had spent itself.. 1* had begun ta get my things in readiness. little by littie. taking them over ta Mrs. Amas'.. There was stili ane bundie I needed. I wrapped it up well and threw it into the backyard fram the attic window. then 1 wcnt tltraugh the kitchen. picked it up and hurled it through the Page 341",
         "I THE CALL TO VICTORIA. B.C. . woodshed opening, wvhere my friend found it and took it to bier bouse. In this little feat I dropped the sewing apron I had on, and this circumstance led the maid afterwards to assert that 1 .had -one out te, meet a man-the apron was the circunistantial evidence. -1 slipped a green silk velvet dress over my black. and taking my jewelry. I went fromn home wîth the expkl.nation that 1 was going to spend the day with a friend. The last words mny mother said as 1 passed out of the door were. 'Have you enougb money?' Sucb a motber! Always so thoughtful. so, lavisb of superfluities for me. And I was doing tbe deed that would inflict an unhealable. gaping wound in ber maternai breast. It was the feast of St. Michael. September 29. 1869. forty-nir.e years ago. -Arriving at the homne cf my friend. a former Victoria scboolmate, I wrote a letter to mny parents. stating that 1 had become a Catbolic. that no one had influenced me to this. and that desiring te, be at liberty to practise my religion. I would flot return bor-c. but would support rnyself by teaching music. Tis letter was sent by special messengez. Wben hie arrived at the house, rny rr.,ther was ahready growing alarmed at niy prolonged absence. Though the letter was plainly addressed to lier. cither from nervousness or dread. sbe refused te take it. -Unfortunately the messenger. seeing the letter rejected. went and dropped it in the post office.. Its perusal would have spared my mother a night of agonizing doubt. Next mornir.g the papers bore the head- lines. 'Strange Elopement of a Jewess.' -When the truth was rnade public through my letter. the expected stor\u0026\u0026 bruite out in ail its force-in my own famnily and in the whole Jewish quarter. A price was set upon my persan. and the mnen swore te find me, dead or alivc. Everyonc put on mourning as in a racial calamîity. **A warrant was issued for my arrest. on the ground tbat 1 bad taken away jewels which were flot mine--the only plea on whicli they could pursue me--but 1 had been very carefui te bring only such things as were strictly rny pet sonal belongings. *\"Naturally, the Convents were the first places suspected of harbour- ing me. For this very reason 1 had not gant ntar themn. nor did 1 corn- miicate with the nuns. nor even attend services in their chapels. \"For over a year. they were under police and detective surveillance. Tht Sisters often saw lights fiashing about their gardens. the searchers [Page 33 àÈ",
         "T] tA CHAPLET 0F YEARS naturally ihinking that after hiding indoors ail day. 1 would corne out for air at night. Santa Clara Valley was scoured. but I was flot found. My friends were flot to be frightenAd. nor bought with bribes. While I was sought for in darkness and in covert places, I was walking freely in the open fields of a large farmhouse. I had been told to offer nio pro- test if 1 were discovered, but to f oliow quietly wherever 1 rnight be led. -To exonerate Convents from ail blame as well as to satisfy public opinion that I had flot become a Catholic through coercion, but of rny own free choice, I wa, obliged to write several open letters in the San Francisco papers. -Whether or not. rny parents wanted to palliatte rny offence in bring- ing what they considered the greatest conceivable disgrace upon the Jcwish race. they rnaintained that 1 was the victini of Catholic prose- lytism, Both my father anid my mother said they would be satisfied if they heard from my own lips that I had not been forced into this change of creed. -To answer this challenge, a meeting was decided upon. at which. in presence of my father and mother and eldest brother, their lawyer and witnesses. I was to rerno, e ail doubt in their minds. as to rny perfect frecdom in the matter of joining the Catholic Church. '*Word was sent me to corne to San Francisco at the appointed tirne and place. I had been instructed to follow Colonel Young and his wif e to their carniage silently. because the trains were watched. -I was conductcd to the residence of Mr. Donague. where on the next day at two o'clock. 1 went to the parlour. attended by Miss -. to make niy profession of faîth before my parents. \"My mother was not there--nor my brother., - Where is mother?' 1 asked my father. - She was too sîck to corne. Will you corne with nme to her?' - 'Yes. father.' I said. 'if these people may corne with nme.' -So we drove to the bouse. My brother's absence is accounted for by the tact that he had been denied admiîttance into Mr. Donague's home for refusing to give up his revolver to the two police guards stationed at the door. -When I went into the roorn where my mother was lying on a couch. she opened ber anms and with aIl the wounded love anad pain of her rnotherhood. she pressed me so passionately to her hcart that the glass Page 36j",
         "I.THE CALL TO VICTORIA. B.C. À of my watch-case was broken. I fainted. My niother's nurse, a renegade Catholic, quickly got a glass of water. \"'Take it. there's nothing in it,' she cried. -No more than this assertion was needed to confirm the suspicions of rny advisers. who h'.d warned me flot to accept any food or drink irom the household. Long, long years afterwards. my sister told me that the water had been poisoned. 'While my friends were cndeavouring to, restore me to conscious- ness, the lawyer, who was famous as a speaker, hcaped most cutting language upon me. 'Cruel daughter, you are piercing your mother's hcart. You will cause her death. etc., etc.' \"My Iawyer. the son of ex-Governor Burnctt, intcrposed, saying Miss M-- is flot in a condition now ta fulfili the purpose for which we are here. Tomnorrow she wilI be better. We shall rneet at Mr. Donague's. and the proceedings will bc in Engiish. flot like today's. in German. \"As 1 was carried back ta the carniage-I could flot walk-the dense crowd. which. ail curious to sec me, had blacker.ed the street. called out. 'Marble heart! Marble hcart!' ' Next day the meeting was brief and ta thc point. My lawyer pre-- rnised. 'I undcrstand that we are here te find out two things:. Fis.If this lady became a Catholic of her own free will. -\"Second. If she inteiids ta remaîn one.' 'After 1 had said: 'I became a Catholic of mv own free will. and I intcnd ta remain ane.' my father said, 'I have paid dear for this.' \"My lawycr askcd. 'Is there anything cisc?' The prosecuting lawycr said. 'Yes. she must return the jewcis and clothes she took froni home.' 'She will do so as quickly as it can possibly bc donc.' \"There lingered a hope in the hcarts of my parents that if I felt deprived of my very clothing. I would through neccssity go back ta them. In time. my mother returned my jewels. 1 had some fine diamonds. After her death I nc'.er worc thcm-I gave theni for the ostensorium in St. Ignatius Church. \"The quasi trial scexie over. 1 returned to my hiding-place. A Protestant, a mere acquaintance of mine. infornied my attorney that a great many people had rcsolved ta seize me at thc depot. if thcy had ta [Page 37",
         "A CHAPLET 0F VEARS shoot me in the attempt. This gentleman died a Catholic. 1 often ask myseif if it was in reward of this charity. My frîends drove me three stations further down. where I quietly got on the train and reached my abiding-place. \"I believe my brother got to be verv thankful for my escape. for he once said to mne. That is the best thing you ever did. You werc certainly going to be caught that lime.' It was October 24th, the feast of the Angel Raphaei, protector of travellers. \"Ail these means, well-meant and otherwise, having failed ta draw me back home-whi ch really implied Judai sim-my father tried a more plausible means. 1-e wený to the Archbîshop. He presented his request. saying, 'My daughter has heart disease and having always been delicate, requi res ber mother's care. Will you flot use your influence to have her -o back ta her mother?' -We Catholics will be able ta look after her health,' answered the Archbishop. \"Three days after the legal meeting. I returned every article of clothing which 1 had taken from home, from shocs ta hairpins. Since that day 1 have been God's child alone., He had provided fnr me. Ill health soon made it impossible for me to support myself by giving music lessons. but 1 neyer wanted for anything. Generous Catholics homed me. clothed me in costly garments, and made me one with themn at their table-sa that 1 may apply to myseif the words, 'having nothing. I possessed ail things.' \"Up to the time of my conversion I bad no Catholic acquaintances. but in my time of trial several influential families championed my cause. As there wvas no more need ta hide, Mr. McLoughiin camne ta fetcb me froin the farnihouse to his mansion, saying. 'Sa long as 1 have a roof over my hcad my home will be yours.' '-'I shall accept your offer only on condition that I be allawed ta teach music.' \"The rich banker demurred, 'That is flot at ail necessary, but you may it you will.' -I went with hirn to Sarn Jose. Every morning when he drove ta the bank, he lef t mne at the Convent and stopped for me in the evening. \"'On diffe-, it occasions I received calîs fromn family friends, who would invite me cordially to take a drive with them. I neyer feil inta the snare, and well I did flot, for I learned that tbey had been paid ta lure Page 38]",
         "~:THE CALL TO VICTORIA, B.C. ih nie off. My brother proposed a trip to New Orleans, a, another trne a voyage with him to Europe. Atas. these. too. were dccoys. My poor brother. quite angry that 1 should have so disturbed the family union and brought sorrow to my mother, had sworn te take mie somewhere in Europe where I should be made te fast on bread and water. tili I relented. He was foiled by my simple expedient of neyer going any- where alone, \"Apparent peace reigned tili june, then one day mny brother camne to me with letters frorn four doctors, each stating that my mnother was ir. a dying condition. These were endorsed by a message from rny mnother, promising me liberty in the practice of my religion if 1 consoled ber by my presence. \"What could I do. but go? FilIed -xith misgivings. I re-entered rny father's house. My rother's condition had been greatly exaggerated. I was tenderly received. kindly deait with by al. and dressed in the costlicst. Everythîng was donc to make life pleasant for a girl barely twenty. My invitation to corne home bad been a strategy to try to obtain by kindness what persecution hiad failed to accornplish. With maternai tact and gentleness my mother entrcated me to free myseif froni the couls of the Christians. «Nine nionths of this home life. and it was the last week in Lent. Corne what rnay, I resolved te practise my faith. Holy Thursday. I announced my intention of attending the services. My mother said. 'If ycu do se, you need flot corne back here.' I went. I had flot yet breakfasted.. Evening carne, and I thought the wisest plan for me was te go home and stand the consequences. I went te my room and dressed elaborately for dinner. I went te table; only mneat courses were served. 1 would not touch themn. My mother sni. 'If the food is not te your liking, you may retire te your roorn.' I did so. Not a morsel had crossed my lips that day. No proper person entered restaurants in those days, at least, I thought se. The servant brought me food. The last test had been given-neither nly parents nor myseif. Jew and Christ\u0026n, could ever be reconciled. The relations between parents and daup,',ter were dropped, neyer te be resurned again. '*The time had corne for rny mother te give up the San Francisco bouse and stay more perrnanently in Vancouver Island. 1 remained in California. and began again te teach mnusic. [Page 39",
         "A CHAPLET 0F YEARS \"Strange as it m ay seem, ail the members of the family always loved the Sisters; the survivors do ta this day. My mother had noa dearer friend than Mother M. Providence. During my mather's illness, for nine months, every day without fail, a pitcher of Irish moss was sent from thec Convent ta her sickroom.: The day before her death she drove ta the Convent and, flot being ablr, to go to the parlour, Mother M. Providence came out and sat with her in the carniage. The two friends. one a staunch Jewess, the other a staunch nun. had their Iast heart ta heart talk. \"In the next ten years I met mny mother twice; on bath occasions she spoke ta me ini a cold, stramned way.. \"In 1882, 1 was sccing a banid of six Sisters of St. Ann aff an the steamner bound for Victoria. At that time the route betwcen Montreal and Vancouver Island was via, Chicago, Ogden, Omaha and San Francisco. When I came up the deck I saw a man reclining camfortably in a chair.. It was my father. 1 had fiat seen him since my quiet departure from home twelve years befare. I was scized with a great langing ta throw my arms around him and kiss him fondly. 1 said so ta the Sisters, adding, 'I behieve that even now he will repulse me.' I went softly up and satisficd the heart hunger of a daughter's love. My father turned away his hcad. When 1 came back ta the Sisters tears wcre in their eyes. They could flot speak. \"In spirit 1 lived in Victoria with my ever dearly loved teachers, thec Sisters of St., Ann. My anecearthly desire was ta he with thern and, as in my childhoad and girlhaod, bask ini the happincss of Mathcr M. Providence's presence. Thirty years passed before I reached that haven; naw I amn contentedly prcparing for the voyage ta the haven of eternal rest.\" THE RESCUED CHILD The cannectinig links between certain families and certain Convents are often-tîmes extraordinary. Such were those which braught this Jewish family so close ta the Sisters of St. Ann. Quite unawares the Sisters had helped anc of the members of that household on the road ta the Catholic Church:, it was ta be given them ta save ane of its childr2n fram a watery grave.. On june 19, 1865. Sister M. Conception and Sister M. R~omuald were coming fram Cowichian ta Victoria on board the \"Fideliter.- After cnjaydbly steamning under a serene sky. through the betwitLhingly weird Satellito and Sidney channels. they were rounding Claver Point when Page 40]",
         "U_!THE CAL L TO) VICTORIA, 13.C. 711- the powerful \"'Alexandra\" shot full force into the \"Fideliter,», penetrating its side. So interlocked were the two steamers that the passengers of the one could easily pass to the deck of the other. As the tell-tale shock conveyed its foreboding message of disaster the two nuns fell on their knees, and, true to the instinct of their vocation., prayed. The captaili gave his orders quick, sonorous. cool; the crew lowered life-boats. In the twinkling of an eye the panic-stricken pas- sengers pushed forward. The two nuns remained hand in hand on their knees out of the way, and prayed. The boats with their human burdens were soon plying to and fro to the beach, four hundred yards away. Thec watcr was up to the second deck, the nuns stili quietly prayed on. The captain continued to superintend the debarkation of the livcs entrusted to his care., The deck was nearly clear of people, when the kneeling Sisters saw that a baby in long clothes had been left behind by its distracted mother. Sister M. Conception picked up the unharmed little one, and gathering it in her kind arms, kneit again, and prayed, till the captain's order, *'Sist'rs, go into the boat,\" made the two Sisters rise. They were the last to leave. The captain went with them. By this timne the water was on a level with the top deck. The \"Fideliter,\" as if it had tîrned its sinking to the departure of the nuns, imniediately disappeared. The poor ruother who had dropped her baby now realized what had happened, and was frantic:, but wlien the Sister appeared carrying the baby, aînd the mother received it fromn her arms snug and gurgling, her paroxysm of grief was changed to one of joy. That \"Ettle one\" is the niece of the Convert Jewess. She is an old laçiy now, and lives in New York. [Page 41",
         "THE WORK 0F FAITH Roli back, 0 Father Time, the siivcry mists 0f mernory that obscure the hidden past' Oh! show to us those fifty golden years 0f virtuous toil and labour, spent for God. Ye saints of haif a century gone before, Gaze on the work, the godliness and faith 0f souls whom, striving upward, Angeis biessed With cormfort in dark hours, when penury And want, the chast'ning hand of God imposed. Oh! thou, Juýt Angel of the mighty pen. Record the progress of the ceaseiess ycars, And, too, the great reward of fervent zeal. 0 dear St. Ann's! tho' wintry winds may chili Thy gardens nude, unseen by mnortal eye, There, bloomn far sweeter than ail earthiy flowers, Blossoms of spirit-Lilies, white as snow 0f Chastity; the bluest Violets 0f purest Modesty ind humbled wills; And Roses red, of hoiy Poverty. Angeis hovcr iow, so there to bathe In fragrance 'midst the perfurne of thy bowers. j Toil on, 0 Aima Mater, in His way! And mnay success the laurel crown bestow On ail thy works of charity and love. And biessings on thee may Our Lady show'r, Which, guarding thee from danger and f rom woe, Shahl keep thee safe on life's tempestuous sea: * tintai at last, tF-y darksomne iife's cruise o'er, * The~ golden gates of heaven open wide, Then mayest thou hear, each soul, the tender words, 0 VENI SPONSA MEA!-Come, sweet Spouse, Receive the kingdom e'er for thet prepared; The rugged path of life weli hast thou trod, Eternal biiss awais thee,and thy God! ALTA QUIRK.",
         "PART Ill. HAPPY TIMES THEN AND NOW L ''~ \u003c~ IHE Sisters had corne ta a pioneer country thousands of miles away frorn Motherland to do good on a large scale. and jthey did do t in multitudinous ways. ta one and all. Thcv __did it in a spirit of joy, which is the portioni of God's ser- vants. The Sisters diffused this joyful atmosphere over their charges, one of the principles of their rules of pedagogy being: \"If the bright days of early youth are spent in a sombre element, far from watchful mother love, without a channel for heart expansion, it is ta lie feared that such a child's future will be frauglit with miserye therefore, the Sisters by ingenious devotedness, should bring horne-ife into the Con- vent days of their pupils.\" U\u0026XL-i UN -Ille kLAYUkCUOUr4U Sa happily did the Sisters carry out the letter --id the spirit of this kindly admonition, that their pupils brought away pleasantest school-day mnemories, which were passed ta their children's children. Many a rnother, Canvent-trained. bas held pratecting sway over the domestic circle by telling her fledglings and grawn-ups, about the days spent with the Sisters. It is one of the rewards of religiaus educatars ta hear of the ever-waxing eagerness with which athletic sans and accomplished daughters surround mother, and beg her ta tell thern about \"the nice tirnes she had at the Convent, when slie was a littie girl.\" Here is a recent instance: [Page 43",
         "j..- A CHAPLET 0F YEARS K HALL0WED BECAUSE 0F HIS MOTHER November 21, 1864. Mary James, aged 18. frorn Penzenza. registered in St. Ann's Convent School.. Fifty-four years later, on March 24, 1g18. hcr son, Mr. C. Ellis Shephard, Seattle, Wash., inscribed his name in the Visitor's Book of his mother's Aima Mater. What induced him, a non-Catholic, to drop his business for a while and devote a few of the precious hours of his short stay in this city. to a cail at St. Ann's? The reverence he bas for the Convent which was the bappiest of influences in his mother's life; also the happy remembrance of this mother's talks on the minutest details of those Convent times, on which his boyhood had becn fed. What were somne of the things he had heard? Those great names. Mother Mary Providence, Archbisbop Seghers -, then Marie Munroe, the girl from Chili, same age as Mary James. and registered on the same day. This Chilean came from a part of the country where rain is unknown. She had opportunities for learning something about the watery element wbile in Victoria. The first time she saw ramn, she went out ?-d stood in the downpour in an ecstasy of delight. Then and there, as now. girls were vain. One day the mnost unusual of ail happenings, happened. The Sisters were ail cailed to a meeting. and the resident pupils-boarders they were called-were left alone. Something should be donc to mark the phenomenal occurrence. What? Finally. one bright mind bit upon the bright idea. \"Oh say, I've got it!\"-\"What, what?\" \"Let us see who bas the smallest foot.\" Carried unanimously. Quickly and silently, the usual conditions for girl mischief, caLh took off shoe and stocking; comparisons and measure- ments were in fui] progress when the door opened and-each bare foot suddenly disappeared, as the chaplain, Father Seghers, appeared. 0f course he did flot sec. Oh, ro. how could he when bis eyes were intent on looking at something above the heads of the Miss Vanities. His coming had always b2en welcome, but this time bis exit was doubly so, These Convent girls, flot less than other girls, had spirit-an~d thcugh it must be saîd under one's breath, this high-spiritedness was condoned by the composed, calrn Sisters. The following incident is an illustration. It was April 15, 1865. The wcrld over, the tragic message of Abraham Lincoln's assassinition was flashed eit reached d'e quiet St. Ann's Con- vent on Y zw Street. The colony of Amieri can girls there at scbool Page 44]",
         "HAPPY TIMES was grieved. indignant, horror-struck. They loved the North-they *ed idolized the President who had saved the Union. A British girl,- who 18. set a low value on American patriotism. said with uter uncoxicern. he \"Served the President right.,\" \"How dare you! \" and Mary James made a dash at the speaker. There is no telling what might have happcned ile had flot Mother Mary Providence called out, \"Mary, you forget your- )a self; corne here.\" If it was hard for Amnerica's young blood ta let such he an offence pass, the subdued girl got ber reward next day, whei' Mother, ce rnaking an opportunity, confided ta her, \"I quite understand youi temper ý, under yesterday's provocation, for I would have felt the same myself.\" Perhaps, Mary James did not feel triumphant about this ta her dirn old age.. Perhaps. 's. 'le St. Andrew's littie cathedral on Kanaka Street, now Humboldt, was Y. a treasured rernembrance with this young lady as with hundreds of yi others. On rare occasions the Convent personnel assisted at the services it there. These were solemnized with a grandeur far surpassing the size id of the edifice. The choir was al] talent of superior order. the vestments rich and brilliant, being the gift of wealthy Europeans and of the noble il missionaries who gave their patrimony ta the diocese. The perfection ilof the divine offices was made complete by Father Segher's oratory. How proud everybody was of him-the congregation, the city, thc Con- vent girls. They, more than anybody else, claimed him. Did he nct * know exactly how they ranked in their lessons, their music, the quality of their singing, the tone of their recreations? So they passed their admiration of him ta the next generation. As the visitor, Mary James' son, stood in the mniddle aisie of the r present Convent chapel, and heard that it had been the first cathedral, - on the opposite side of the street, and had been rolled into present posi- Stion, he said reverently, \"This, then, is the place where my mother wor- f shipped. In memory of the happiness which this cathedral and the t Convent were ta ber through life, please accept this offering. You always have the needy.\" 3o saying, he made a thank-offering ta God, through the Convent cicerone. [Page 45",
         "I HAPPY TIMES J TYPICAL LIFE AT ST. ANN'S Another silvery-headed alumna. whose home. thotigh humble. is rich with heirlooms of grace and learning procured at St. Ann's, thus describes life there. \"The whole day, and each succeeding day. as a student at St. Ann's brought me its fragrance of delight. but dear Aima Mater offered now to one. then ta another. a sweet forget-me-not. 1 hear once more the oft-recurring bells. and feel once more. if but for a moment, the sweet content of those peaceful days. \"Happy days-flled ta averflowing with duties which. if well donc. brought their reward; and simple pieasurces with whose sweetness mingled no bitterness, no dread of an aftermnath af pain or weariness. which so often alloys the pleasures of later life. \"Once again I arn in the aid dorrnitory. can hear the rising bell, and from beds ta the ~ '~ right. beds ta the left, heads uplift to the duties I \\ of the day. beginning at 5.45. Was there ane who did flot find it too early? One fair head, on my left.-I wonder how it bas fared since. Beyond that a smooth dark one.-now slum- bering farever. On my right. a mass of nut- brown Iocks. since shorn and replaced with the sacred veil. and many more. whose pillows are naw scattered far and wide. I wander SISTER MAR'. LORETTO how many of them remember the morning we rose an hour carlier. thaugh blissfully unaware of it.. After waiting in the Chapel three-quarters of an hour. we had gone ta breakfast, and wcre taking it sleepily when the arrivai of the Chaplain ta say Mass at the custarnary hour of 6.30 thoroughly awakened us ta the fact that we had risen at 4.45 a.m. What a break in aur routine! Samething ta be amused over ail day. until retiring bell at 7 o'cick nstead of 8 changed aur smiles into sighs. -On we go through the day's duties. The Holy Sacrifice, breakfast. *study, walk, class. Oh. those dear classmates! A good campany of fri--nds. at ane time helping ane another. perhaps with ideas for the new essay. and then striving in good natured rivalry for the coveted prize. What kind of teacher bas Experience proved? It is toa much ta expect *that it bas been as aur awn beloved teacher, Sister Mary Loretto. llaw her bnight inspiring cauntenance cames ta me. as she disentangles same [Page- 47",
         "A CHAPLET 0F YEARS knotty problem. or in her own beautiful words, sceks ta interest us in the beauties of sarne chosen masterpiece of literature. To ail at St. Ann's. she was 'Perfect woman, nobly planned, to warn, ta cornfort and cam- mnand, and yet a spirit still and bright with something of an angel light.' Alas, no mare shall ber dear face light up for us in this world, but 1 pray ber pupils may sec its glory ini a better sphere, with that of Mother Superior, Sr. Mary Anne of Jesus, the friend and counsellor of ail. Her festal day brought the greatest rejoicing. Then did teachers and pupils vie with each other in giving hanour where honour was due. Yes, truly. due to one who filled ber high and holy office so admirably. With Long- fellow, 1 feel: \"Oh, though aft deprcssed and lanely, AU my fears are laid aside, If 1 but reutember only Sncb as these have lived and died.\" \"After the feast programme, which consisted of music, singing. an addres and a dramatic performance, Mother Superior proclaimed a holi- day. and then we knew same great surpr*.se was ini store for us. In the many ycars I spent at St. Ann's there ilever was a picnic or holiday without some pleasant surprise. One year it was an excursion ta Nanaima; the next year, ta Kuper Island; and another tine, ta aur astonishinent. site announced we could go to the theatre at 2 p.m.L! How she enjoyed our open-eyed amazement; s0 that afternaon we had a trip around the world by limeligbt. -Amateur performances were orten given for aur own diversion. The Academy always lias its'stats--giriish *stars.'-whose farne is more enduring for remaining within Co-'vent precinets. PANCAKE PICNICS *'And our pancake picnics, under the tic-s beyond Bcacon 4ltU- what jolly trnes! Were ever pancakes so ceicious? *'On the morning of these excitable dayi. 'i«an.' t!je Convent fai.;:vn, was a busy factor indeed. Nt an carly bour lie begari loading bis cart at the kitchen doar, with pots, pans. ketties and cooking accessories. The white «Charlie,' the old horse, blinked from behind bis blinkers, fearful of too heav' a load. Hiaving deposited the first delivery on thet chosen spot near the beiach. Dan, Charlie and the cat returned for provisians- huge galion tins of batter. sugar, syrup. bread, butter-nat the present day tantalizing tiny. thin sandwiches, but baker's loaves from which you could cut length, breadth and thickness to suit picnic appetite. Page 48)",
         "HAPPY TIMES \"Fires were kindled on ]Beacon Hill beac, frying pans adjusted;, drippings began ta sizz, the ladie measured the pan ail round with bter a la Canadienne, and then the gypsies-we were ail gypsies that day-began ta kecp tally of the pancakes they consumed, each aiming at the highest counts. Who stood over the fires making the pancakes? The Sisters, of course, with faces red as lobsters while cooking them; but they did flot care, the more we wanted, the miore we were laughingly encouraged. They understand that the joy of young life is cating. *'Easter Monday was always a day of great frr-Aic. After hunting Easter eggs, we ail repaired ta the kitchen ta cook as we pleased, what we pleased-.cakes, puddings, omelettes, candy. '«0f the daiiy life at St. Ann's, it is sale to say that it would hxave been bard ta find a school of equal size having a more farnily-iike spirit. We were neyer consciaus of rigid regulations;' the surveillance was con- stant but conducted openly with motherly provision. The girls fanm a lively, social set, deeply devoted withal ta theilr studies, yet ever rzady for a good tirne, always brimnxing over with innocent hilarity. \"Oh that those voices were ever singing! Oh, that the organ would go on ringing! Oh, that the cesser wcre always svinging, And 'twere ever an Ester Day!\" MAY ANDERTON-DOWNIE. EXAMINATION DAY Uet u% listen ta another of those Voices echoing c'own the Corridors cf Tume. It is Margaret Wilson Switzer telling us of the last day of school: The lovely feasts and celebrations cf the year were ail eclipsed by the grand public examinations on Closing Day. They were held in mid-July, and as far down as 1887. they meant an aral cross-fire examina- tion before the public. on ai the subjects taught during the ten and a bal months school terni. Every class, from the prirnary to the higbest, came forward on the impromptu stage, and did its best at correct answers, clear articulation, and easy car.tage. Every subject compassed between the addition table and problenis on the celestial globe (that globe is in the garret now) was put ta the test of the pupils, more or less mercilcssly by examinera inteaudience. But we were ready. Had we not prepared long and weIL [Page 49",
         "jW[ A CHAPLET 0F YEARS 1 Thase were the days when lessons were strictly learned by heart, word for word, as tbey carne in text-books. If you were exceptionally clever, or thought to bce so, then to overlook a punctuatian mark, by lack of time pause, was accounted a miss. Recapitulation of the books, fromn caver to caver, began about the Feast of Ascension. Then-did we grumble and shirk study--Oh, my na! Every student aimed at gîving the greatest nurnber of pages at once. The ambition was ta see who would finish 'repctitions\" flrst. One by ane we went ta our teacher ta recite aur reviews. We were free to give fromn ane page ta a chapter or more, at a time. Miss three words and back yau were sent ta begin all over. We surely did study, and thaugh people frown nowadays as rnuch an lessons \"by heart\" as they do on the \"Dark\" Middle Ages, I think we students of pioncer times can hold a logical conversation with any of the present day, whko slight memory to train reason. Or the Grand Examination Day, the manatony of granimar, geo- graphy, history, etc., was relieved by music, singing and acting in their widest range. Music with four hands, eight, nay, sixteen hands; sing- ing in solo, duets, quartettes, charuses; acting-dranas, historical, comic, tragic; French plays, dialogues, sangs-mi fine, ail that goes ta make a colossal entertainrnent was interwaven with text-book recitations. Martha Campbell, ane of the girls of that period prettily links ber actual borne in Paris with the childhaod scenes af Closings at St. Ann's, Victoria. *\"I recall when I played 'Little Red Riding Hood' on the day af the prizes; 1 was sa afraid of the marnent when the wolf would juznp at me. Happily, the entrance of the fairies saved me f romn his çlutches. I have yet the littie cape I ware that day, and once in a while I take it aut of its box ta look at it.\" The heavier part of the programme was in the aftcrnoan, and began at one o'clock, when His Excellency, the Lieutenant-Governor, mnade his entry ta the strains and variations of \"God Save the King.\" Then came the mornentaus revelation, the well-guarded secret which had long excit.-d aur curiosity, *'Who would read the..openmng address?' We did flot know the word «*Salutatory\" in those times, thank goodnes.. The secret now divulged, the reader paid for ber conscientious dis- cretion, by having ta pass througb a gauntiet of schoolmnates, who with bland siniling faces fixed an the audience, inflicted petty punishinent with fiery eye* and stinging fingers as she regained ber seat after deliver- ing the address. Page 50]",
         "HAPPY TIMES rt. At four or five, the brilliant scene of happy faces, white dresses, blue Ily sashes, anid music-here, there and everywhere--closed with the award- tck ing of prizes, and the congratulations of His Excellency the Governor, )M and His Lordship the Bishop. ng This graphic account by onc of the scholars requires a companion ho article showing how the public received the Closing Day iixercises. ter There are many from which ta choose, but the first, in 1861, is repre- :er sentative of the series. in \"The examination of the pupils of St. Ann's Convent School was a Ys very interesting and agreeable affair. A large number of spectators wer e in attendance. The scholars were tastefully dressed in white, and the th e place was ornamented with a variety of fiawers and shrubbery. The young ladies made a very creditable appearance, and went through what o- xnight be tcrmed almost an arduous ordeal. Fromn natural philosophy îr to Edaglish granimar-from modern history to Grecian antiquities.-from g- French ex'ýrcises to English dialogues-fram geography ta arithmetic- C, from music ta mythology. The scholars showed a proficiency in these a . variaus branches that evinced careful study on their part, and uncéasing watch.fulness on the part of their preceptors. The correctness of the tr answers and general demeanour of the pupils refiect the highest credit SI an the Sisters. 'y '*A little after twelve a recess taok place till one, when His Excel- p lency and family attended. The utmost interest was manifested by the S. it audience, and the educational exercises seerned ta affard general delight.\" The list of prizes shows that the plan af education, which at first n had been only such as would suit the simple requirements of half-breeds e emerging from aboriginal surraundings, was suddenly raised ta the plane n af city schools on the Atlantic board. g d For a period, of forty-five years St. Ann's Academy had its own independent curriculum, but in 1905 it adoptee that followed in the -. Province of British Columbia. The change was a loss and a gain. A loss ini so much as perfection of detail was sacrificed to the exigencies t of a heavy course. A gain. because it strengthened the confidence - of the public to sec Convent studies run parallel with those of the public school. [Page 51",
         "A CHAPLET 0F YEARS AN ODD REMEDY Quiet, retiring, made to be a saint-such we rerr.ember Teresa McCabe of the 70's, who in after life enjoyed telling her experience with a mustard plaster. She became Mrs. O'Donnell, and writing in 1908 tells the incident: I was pleased to note among your stili active sisters, Sister Mary Bridget. Her dear naine recaîls to my mind a littie in.cident in school life. I was suffcring from a cold on my lungs and was ordered to report tcG Sister M. Bridget, who had charge of the Infirmary, a short time before the regular hour for retiring. I went to hier and she handed me a mustard plaster, arranged upon a neat littie board about 5x10. It was my first experience with a mustard plaster, and being slightly \"verdant,\" I asked, \"Do-s the board go on, too?\" Sister simply smiled, but Cecile Burleigh and Eliza Bond, who were present, said, \"Yes! Yes !\" So, without any suspicion of mischief, I wended my way to the Dormitory, and prepared to retire. When in bed, I reached for my plaster, and laboured earnestly to get it on without separating it from the board. Truly she must have thought I had begun to ossify, when later she came to remove it, and encountered the hard substance. I shall neyer forget the surprised and mirthful expression on lier countenance, and whenever I sec a mustard plaster, 1 always think of lier., Another dear old friend of our school days, who, I amn delighted to hear, is stili living, is Dr. Helmcken, Sr. Many times though hie upset our plans, when we were suffering from sore throat, and there was every indication that we might have a couple of days' rest in the Infirniary, by thrusting a spoon down our throats and declaring, \"Not much the matter with lier, Sister.\" I love to revert to those happy days, although I must say I have nlot yet known an unhappy one. A MIDNIGHT SUPPER On the whole there was a goodly sprinkling of mischief-innocent mischief-among Victoria St.. Ann's girls. Judge for yourselves by the following admissions: \"Silence, silence everywhere, on the earth and in the air.\" Silence, especially in the air that circulated the earth where stood St. Mary's dorniitory. A silence unbroken except by the somewhat tuneful breath- ing of some of the St. Ann seniors. It was the glorious night-the last night to be spent in those simple alcoves, which if to us were somewhat condemnable in architecture, Page 52] r ~. s ti 1 S in bi ea wl",
         "HAPPY TIMES off ered us night after night the salace of sweet sl-am-ber., The following day wouid be the \"Commencement Day.\" the preface ta a long summner vacation. What girl amang us could but be jubilant? For ta especially commemarate the great event we-well, flot all of us, but some-were ta indulge in that forbidden pleasure sa weil known ta ail school-girls (in or out of fiction\u003e \"A Midnight Supper.\" Hence the silence, I wiil flot speak of the many stolen minutes in which we planned the event;' of the seriousness with which we painted out the delights and vice versas of the situation, aisa the secrecy. flot anly f romn the mighty ones in authority, but fromn certain of the girls who-well, in such delicate matters, everyone cannet be admitted, can they? The chosen ones from bath dormitories, about twenty-three. aIl Most holy and upriglit Academicians, were ready for the fray. Fray, indeed? Why we scorned the term-everything was sa well established, every- thing sa well councilled, that fear of discovery was beyond aur wildest imagination. - Being loyers of nature, we decided ta have aur \"spread\" an the fiat roof of the music raoms, which were an the second story of the aId build- ing and commanded an extensive and diversified view of variaus abjects. S such as the Mayor's residence, the bridge, a bachelor's domicile. and aur '~own schooi iawn and surnmer-house. 1 I rentioned befare that many of the girls were ta camne from the Holy Angeis' dorrnitory which, alas, was separated from ours by a smnall S hall and twa doors. Across the hall was a ricke'y folding door, only six feet high. erected just a short time previaus, supposedîy for the purpose S of cutting off the dark stairway leading down ta the business part of $the building-school-rooms, music rooms. etc.-for the dormitories were on the fourth fiat., Just an the outside of this inconvenient door was ~' anotner door leading into the alcove of aur Directress. Easy i ndeed -~would it have been for ail af us ta go pcacefully out of aur dormitories '~into the hall, dawn stairs inta a lavatory, and step out an the -roof\".- S but aur Directress, with kind solicitude for aur \"nocturnal slumbers,\" each night locked that littie door from the outside. I may alsa mention that frequently the doors leading inta the hall were alsa lacked. Ail this did flot facîlitate matters. Another plan was a dopted. I happened ta be the happy possessor of a corner alcove with French windows which led an a tiny balcony. merely arnamental, but which proved very useful ta us on this occasion. This balcony ran along * [Page 53",
         "A CHAPLET OF YEARS ~~~ the front of the building to an alcove in the other dorînitory. Any 2Oth Century girl could climb from that alcove window over the railing to the balcony and along to mny alcove and-well, so it was decided. The girl who had occupied this friendly littie cubicle had greatly accom- modated us by leaving schiool the day previous. So ail was serene. for the window was carefully left open that night. Being quite up-to-date, we scorned the primeval. idea of signais, such as coughs, and that noisy clearing of the throat which is at times so disastrous-and flot only ta the throat. The hour was fixed for 11.30 p.m., and at that time 1 was to welcome our jaurneying friends, and we would cross aur dormitory to the opposite corner alcove. in which was sleeping the sleep of the just the dearcst girl in the Academy, beloved by ail who knew ber and a helprnate to us ail. She has now joined the fold of God's chosen ones. Of course, we wanted her to joi aur supper party but she refused;, and flot one of us could blame ber, for were we not sure that of the many honours tornorrow would bring, on her would be conferred the highest, \"The Governor-General's Medal !\" Yes, she surely wouid be the lucky girl, and we ail knew how well she deserved it. However, when she began to have scruples about letting us use her sleeping compartment as a convenience, we were a littie disturbed, for ber alcove was just over the \"roof,\" and the fire escape ladder would just reach. We gently chid ber about her ignorance of the Scriptures, suggesting that she learn \"Charity covereth a multitude of sins,\" and at last mentioning that if she wrapped berseif in the sweet mantde of sleep, how could she know if we were passing through. True, she mnight feel the zephyrs kissing ber cheek when ber French window was opened -but that was an insignificant detail. We ail went to bed as usual, but not to sleep. The hylo ligbt was dimly burning (1 shall always dislike hylo lights). My windows were opened, and 1 robed for the festive scene in wrapper and slippers, and lay on my littie cot awaiting \"The Time, the Place and the Girls.\" I heard Sister moving about her alcove for sarne time-then, silence. She was either praying or asleep. I have a faint idea of wondering why nuns do Sa much praying, and wishing she migbt take a night off. 1 could also ber the nielodious-wehl. 1 will caîl it breathing, of Edith Dunn, and as sbe was bidden to the feast, I pondered upon the mi sery of those souls wbo would rattier wander in drearnland than keep awake and get a sub- stantial meal. To tel] the truth, 1 fell asleep mnybelf, and was awakened by the sonorous whispers of a French-Canadian girl, answering ta the Page 54] s' 9 r ai Sc a w Co S ta wi ou ta th, tic",
         "HAPPY TIMES -laine of -Romnea.\" \"Connie, Connie, wake up!, It's time, the other girls are on the roof !\" Had flot the case been so imperative. I should have cast a withering glance upon her, and explained that 1 was only medi- 9 tating upon the temptations flesh is heir to, but I didn't. 1 got Up, grabbed my pillows and quit, and was dowri the ladder in a short tîme. Ail our girls were there. also somne of the \"Private Room\" girls frorn the second flat. They ail looked quite pleased to see me, and I felt as if I had been on a voyage. 1 told themn I'd like to stay, but I mnust really go back and awaken the other girls, but before I went, I would go for the vital necessity to our eveninig's enjoyment-\"the food.\" It sounds rather prosai c, but could yau know ail the goodies we bought, well, they really were fit to cali \"gastronomnical delights.\" I stcpped into the lavatory, out of the door, down the hall into Sr. Mary Mildred's school-roorn, under whose desk the aforesaid delights were hidden. I wished at the timne that paper bags wcre flot invented;- they do make such a noise-so also do wooden floors-but I got back ta the roof in safety, shut the door and window, and proceeded to ascend j the ladder. 1 sat at my door impatiently awaiting those girls, and the most horrible suppositions occurred to me. \"Why didn't they corne ?\" eA Well,\" I thought, \"ll walk down the halcony and see if they are bestirring themnselvcs.\" 1 got within six feet of the window and leaned over the rail to peer when. horror of horrors! there at the window in glorified distinctness and actually fastening it, was-a Sister. Oh- Have you ever been spell-bound? 1 was, positively incapable of any- thing. \"Could she sec me, or was it too dark? Yes, she must sce me. S Oh! but no!! She stood there looking a moment longer, then dis- appeared-so did 1. 1 made for the ladder and told the girls what I had ;~seen. We all discusscd the subject at once, and came to the conclusion that a Sister had noticed a draught, had got up to investigate, locked the window, and now, even if the girls could unlock it without making, a noise, they wouldn't dare ta rise from their beds with a Sister up and walking about. Oh, it was pitiful! We decided, though, that the Sister could flot have scen me, so we wcre safe, and as the others were doomed ta disappointment, we would do the best wc coul d by having the feast without themn. 0f course, they would be with us in spirit, so we spread aut Our rugs. etc., over the tin roof and were just opening the bags, when ta our delighted wonder and surprise, crawling down the ladder came the girls. We cmbraced the flrst one, and smothered thern with ques- tions. \"How did they get here? Who was the Sister? Where did [Page 55",
         "A CHAPLET 0F VEARS they corne from? Did they know a Sister was walking about? Well, ce'Il ail be caught. Why weren't they careful?\" And, if you please, ail through our breathiess queries those terrible girls serenely srniled at us and said everything was ail right. The idea! We demanded an explanation. We got it. Not ail at once but beautifully chopped up and seasoned with pauses 'dA contradictions. When the tîme carne for the Sister in their dorrnitory to turn on the hylo light she did so, but after a tirne returned and, standing under it, began hier Spiritual Reading. Hazel Hoyt, a particular friend of mine, had bier alcove just opposite this light, and could see the Sister's back and hear her beads movîng. 'How long would she stay there?\" Hazel peeped out through ber curtain and saw that the Sister was particularly attentive to~hfor she was going to the different alcoves, pulli ng the curtains dloser and making herseif generally unuseful. The time was drawing near but-cruel fate !-the Sîster didn't seerni to be any nearer the end of that reading. Weil, Hazel could only watch and wait, and know she was flot the only one doing so.a Haif sleepily she looked as the Nun was rnaking the Sign of the ' Cross. At last !-No, flot at iast, at first;' for the Sister kept on praying ' and crossing herseif to such an extent that Hazel becane alarnxed and was about to prepare for a fit of nervous prostration, when, with a vigor- ous sweep of the arrn for another cross, the Nun turned a little more toa ~, c the light, and there, to Hazel's intense chagrin. stood no other than Minnie Williams, ont of the uninvited. She and Mary Lamb had some- how suspected our affair and had dressed up as Nuns to help fool the , O girls. So the Sister who was so gravely contempiating the night, and b so carefully shutting the windows and scaring me beyond measure, was ~ none other than that \"uninvited.\"IV - à ai Hazel got up and told the other girls of the trick, that ail was safe, --l and here they were. Only Hazel, who was the Sherlock Hoîrnes of the occasion, had flot yet put in an appearance, but they said she was coming, . e)t so we were ail rnerry. g We arranged ourselves in a circle, and opened the bags again. The T: saited wafers and pickles were passed around, and we were about to bring the cold harn and pork on view, when-Oh! I shudder even now- lai the lavatory door was tried! (Why don't they teach in schools or la somewhere what to do in a great ernergency?) Ail the younger girls tc jumped up, scared to death. Think of it, jumped up on a tin roof! '~th; Page 55]j",
         "HAPPY TIMES Oh! Oh!! Oh!!! One of the girls just about ran off, but was caught in time. Then we ail stood motionless, and said \"Ssh-ssh !\" as if 'sshing\" would do any good now. We could see through the transomn of the door the hall light, which sorne one had switched on. \"Who?-Who was the someone?\" The door was rattling furiously, yet we didn't dare stir. After what seemed an unmeasurable length of time. someone said, \"What'll we do?\" The answer came back 'twixt a sob and a sigh, -We'd better open the door..\" So Polly Carrol, one of the girls who was supposed to be beyond frivolity because she taught book-keeping, stepped into the lavatory and turned the key. Fain would I draw a veil across the terrible passage. 0f ail the people in the world-of aIl the Sisters in the building- who should stand there looking out upon us in our agony but \"The Prefect of Studies,\" and Sr. Mary Augustine. Can you conceive such a situation? One with a lamp held aloft. thc other with a water-jug held aloof. Even so! Truly, sanie \"good shepherds\" mind not the dark and the cold, mind flot the discomforts of midnight when looking after Ssheep that were flot even stolen, but had only strayed. While we were trying to collect our scattered wits. we were aware l of a volley of stern and commanding questions coming from the lips J of our avenging deities. 1 don't think we were quite capable of hearing ail of theni, but some sounded like this, \"What are you doiix out there?\" SOh! what were we doing? \"Does your Directress know you are here?\" ,è. Now I, who have a rnost unhappy knack of seeing something funriy a n most solemn occasions, became aware of a mnost acute desire ta laugh, ýk but sornething more acute warned me flot to. just about this urne I saw Sa bunch of humanity about to approach us froni the top of the ladder. ~.My goodness! it was Hazel. \"Would she see in time?\" Yes, she did, and gently withdrew. During these moments- (hours-years, to us)-while Sîster stood Seyeing us in a very unfriendly manner, we must have looked an incori- gruous spectacle, each with a salted wafer and a pickle in hier hand. pThen Sister said, \"Corne in.\" I laugh every time I think of what we did. We made a dash up the ladder, but-none of us got up. No! we were ta pass thraugh the lavatory and up the stairs. As each girl went by Sister said, *'One, two,\" etc., alternating the numerals by a remark savauring of sarcasm. \"Hum. this is a young lady who couldn't get up for Mass, because she had a cold. [Page 57",
         "A CHAPLET OF YEARS No stockings on. Three, four. No wo-ider we feel tired in the morning,\" etc. I came.. \"Six.\" And 1 actualiy got past without a remark, but as 1 passed Sr. M.. Augustinie, 1Ilcoked at her. and, oh! I'11 never, never forget the look in her eye. I think of ail the Sisters 1 have ever known. Sr. M. Augustine has the greatest Eense of humour, and ber look that night proved it. But 'twas in the eye alone. We scampered up the stairs faster than ever before, intent only on hiding, ourselves, but alas! that folding door barred our way. It was wîth a feeling akin to tenderness that we huddled together agaînst it. Then came Romnea. Oh, that girl! Not beîng the lightest of humans. nor the most graceful, she presented an appearance that would really make a Saint laugh. She wore, in lieu of bedroomn slippers, heavy boots. With the pickle stili clasped in fond embrace. and looking like a heroine, she came stamping up the stairs, reached the top, looked at us, and then, in a fit of sheer terror, climbed up the door, shaking and rattling it terribly, and when on the top fell over on the other side-Bump !- Such a crash! But Remnea didn't wait to hear our solicitous inquiries. She fled. Just then dear old Mary opened the folding door for us. Have you ever seen a herd of sheep driven through a narrow gate? Well, we al went into the virtuous atmosphere of our alcoves with a decidedly bask- ing inclination. We ail heard a murmur of the conversation between the Sisters, and we ail knew what it meant. A hush lay on the multitude. Well, it was over. I lay awake for some tâme listening to my thoughts and those of a few girls who had participated in the feast \"*that did flot occur.\" There was silence again, but somehow it was different. I feIl asleep. In the morning we were awakened as usual. and went down to Mass, then into the Refectory, and on the way the Directress gave us the full benefit of \"the eye that hath seen and the car that hath heard.\" Break- fast that morning was a restful meal, for very few of us cared to disturb our thoughts. The last morning we were to be together, and to think this cloud o'ershadowed us. If somneone would only scold us and take the weight of this uncertainty off our niind, but no. Not a word was spoken about the escapade. Before going to the Academy Hall to help decorate for the afternoon reception and exercises, a few of us stole down to look upon the scene of our midnight revels, wondering if anything had been removed. The \"gastronomnical delights\" had disappeared, and Page 58]",
         "HAPPY TIMES L the only thing left was my piliow iying pure and white, like a Martyr's monument, to tell the tale. Somehow a rumour went around that dear Mary. whosc alcove we had used, would on that account forfeit her hono-urs. Oh! the pity of it. Fýor ourselves-well, we deserved whatever punishment we would receive. But Mary! 0f course we would ail go to Reverend Mother. We assembled in *the \"Blue Room\" and awaited her, with a mixture of fear. shame, and *love. She camne., And oh, the sweet greeting she gave us. How kindly, -how motherly she spoke to us:' her vtry tenderness made us feel like deep-dyed criminals. How disgraccd would the Academy have been had the Mayor passed by and see-i us! (Now, I feel sure that if that undisturbed, well-reputed Citizea who used to bow so graciously to us when we were on parade, had seen us, he would have wished he hlad a daughter there that she might enjoy such fun.) As to the honours. Reverend Mother said we had ail forfeited Testimonials of Menit, etc., and even Mary could flot receive one, for what young lady deserving a I~certificate of exemplary conducc would have condoned such a deed. As to the other honours, well, Mother would see. After the interview we jý, breathe d a sigh of relief and went about our various duties. We assembled about 2 o'clock and greeted the Archbishop, several of the priests, and a number of Sisters from St. Joseph's Hospital. They would ail see our shame when the awards were distnibuted.. We were Sresigned. It was a revelation to us ail, the way those prizes went. tGirls who we were sure would receive certain honours were passed over. and others received them. As to the Governor General's Medal, it was drawn for by Mary and anot)'er girl who chose to sleep the previous _night, and she won it., We ail feit very sorry for Mary, and decidedly disgusted with ourselves. Most of us left for home that niglit, nznd among the many incidents -~which occurred in our happy school life, I'm sure the memory of that faMluchm Ado l About Nothin, and . Shesp eas I ookth bckd uof fatl chem wjl Abvur remin adi frsh. Shakseas Iwok thecmd uof this event, that the dear Sisters intentionally raised our serio-comnic prank to the melodi-amatic. However, it was a lesson which will ever bring a CONSTANC LUCAS.h o s l a smile aCONaSTAhCto usCail [Page 59",
         "MIDNIGHT MASS AT ST. ANN'S Her starry curtain Night has drawn o'er silent Convent wall, From Heaven's turret windows high, the ange) sentries peep, As tender loving watch o'er sluznbering martals there they keep- With angry nioan, the winds recoil from poplars grim and tai). When la! as on that Christmas long aga, there steals a sound 0f mnusic soit and sweet. The sicepers wake and jain the strain, The \"Gloria in Excelsis\" echaes loud in glad refrain, And proudly ring rejaicing belis for eartb a Saviour's found. A thausand tapers bright, and flowers fair the sitar grace, The Chapel windows glow with light, the organ loudly peals: A bush, as Midnight Mass begins. falis a'er the throng that kneels- Our Saviorr's birth and death are blent in ane grand act ai praise. And bending low when silvery chimces thc Elevatian tell, 'Neath mnystlc veil, the eyes ai Faith Mount Thabor's spiendours see, Fram out each heart gaes up the cr' \"My jesus. came ta me, W:thin the temple ai mny heart, my Lord, my God, ta dwell!\" When Jesus cames-O mystic union! glimpse ai Heaven's blissi In converse sweet with Him, how swdft the golden moments spetd! Thro' Mary's spatless bands, flaws precious grace for f-very need. Oh, what can lufe or riches give ta equal jay ai this! Ere dawn ai day the Mass is o'er. But like a golden strand. The memary ai that haur wîll run thro' warp and woi ai lif-. 'Twill cheer the weary soul-when almast crushed 'neath care and strif e, WVhen even Faith seems growing dim-this memory sweet and grand. FRANCES HEALY.",
         "ARCHBISHOP SEGHERS",
         "PART IV. SRED LETTER DAYS 4 FROM THE OLD TO THE NEW 'J~~491RST arnong the Red Letter Days of St. Ann's are those on ~ ('~which the March of Progress, sent its personnel from out- grown buildings ta new and larger ones. The first exodus Z c of this nature was August 26. 1860. from the Cabin Convent on Beacon Hill Park to the newly erected Convent on View Street. The building was 50 by 36 feet. on grounds 100 by 60. It had the distinction of bei ng one of the first brick buildings in Victoria. The next move, in 1871, was towards Humboldt Street. the site of the prescrnt Acaderny. NUCLEUS 0F ST ANN*S ACADEMY. 18-,1 'l The nucleus of the frontage now seen was 50 feet: in 1886. 10G fecet X were added on the east end. At this time. too. St. Andrew's pro.cathedral on the opposite side of Humboldt Street, was rolled over to the Convent Sgrounds and hecame the chapel of St. Ann's Sisterhood. There arc many reasons ta justify its clain- to being a precious historical monu- ment. but il suffi%,es to say that the Martyr-Apostle. Bishop Seghers. was ane of three bishops consecrated within ils walls. The other two Swere Bishop d'Herbomez. first Bishop of New Westminster. and Bishop SBrondel, who, in 1880, succeeded Bishop Seghers in the Sec of Victoria. Twenty-four more years of quiet increasc. and again it becamne '~imperative to enlarge the Academy building. A four-story wiflg. 126 feet long, was attached ta the west end. An auditorium, with threr hundred sealing capacity. c-xtends south of this 1910 erection. fPage 63",
         "A CHAPLET 0F VEARS wm Each variety of these Convent dwellings, from the 20 foot cabin to the 50 foot brick Convent, and the 300 foot length of the modern Academy, has its loyal, proud adherents. They are those who profited by their preparation for life's dutics. If you meet them in Europe, or South America, or sce them whitened by age, you hear their happy reminiscences. Clara K. Campbell will tell you: \"In 1867, I miade my first appear- ance on the stage of the 'Red Brick Convent' on View Street. It was then I first learned that oid Convent song, 'Corne, came, over the his, free from care.' \"I made rny Retreat befôre my First Communion and Confirmation under the instructions of aur beioved martyred Archbishop Seghers. 1 have with me here, in this gay capital of Paris, the holy pictures given to me on that day, and aisa on different birthdays, from nly teachers, Sister Mary Providence, Sister Mary Patrick, Sister Mary of the Cross. Sister Mary Bridget, Sisttr Mary Beatrice and Sister Mary Sophie. \"I have such pleasant recoliections of the hours spent in the Coin- munity with other pupils, doing different kînds of fancy work for the Bazaars, to be held in aid of St. Joseph's Hospital and the Orphans. I think I may truthfuliy say that hardly a week passes, that Martba and I do flot speak of some of the Sisters, and of aur schooldays. We are so far away from you ail, yet we are very often with you in aur thoughts.\" FROM VIEW STREET TO BEACON HILL, 1867 Mrs. Flood, nee Susan Suckley, Hope, B.C., draws from her \"Niche in Memory's Wall\": \"Mother Mary Providence and hier able assistants, who were Sr. M. Angela, Sr. M. Virginia. Sr. M. Lumina. Sr. M. Lucy, Sr. M. Sacred Heart, and Sr. M.. Clemnent, conducted the 'Red Brick Convent' on the royal raad ta iearning through most pleasant fields. -We used ta bail with deiight an auting to Beacon Hill, adorned then only by Nature's garb and two rustic benches on the brow of the hili. From baskets prepared by goad Sr. M. Angela, of the 'cuisine' departmnent, we partook of a bounteous lunch. and then prevailed on Miss Mary Mainville ta spin Fairy Tales, as only Miss Mary couid. \"«The sun receding in the wcst wauld find us homeward bound, wending aur way to View Street across Church Hill, then bare of buildings. \"Others who carried the palm of Story Telling were Sister M. Patrick and Sister M. Romuald. Tbey could hold us spellbound at a whole week's recreation period, with ane story alane-the longer, the better; the greater the suspense. the greater the fascination.\" Page 641",
         "- RED LETTER DAYS A ROYAL VISITOR The ioftiest event which ever took place in St. Ann's Convent-or S Academy-.-one which stili remains unparalleled in its history. is the honour conferred on it by the visit of Her Royal Highness, Princess Louise. Neyer before, for since. did St. Ann's make such elaborate prepara- tions ini music and singing, poetry and prose, mural decorations and school girl attire. The Daily Colonist records the event in its issue of Saturday. October 28, 1882. \"Precisely at 4 o'clock His Excellency and H.R.H. the Princess * Louise and suite drove into the well-kept grounds of St. Ann's Convent, Humboldt Street. The Union jack and British Ensign were suspended across the carrnage way near the main building, over the door of which was a welcoming motto. School and classrooms were tastefully * decorated, and the music-room, in which the distinguished visitors were received, was a picture of beautiful festooning. In this were suspended appropriate mottoes in Latin and English. The raised dais and the canopy above it for 1-is Excellency and the Princess wcre muchi admired. After the Royal visitors were seated, an address of welcome was read, * to which H-is Excellency made a most appropniate and happy reply. \"About 130 young girls. varying frorn 4 or 5 to 16 or 17, ail beauti- f ully and similarly dresscd in white with blue sashes. were ranged in order in front of the Vice-Regal part3, and several of thcm presented Her Royal Highness with choice bouquets. Bishop Brondel. Fr. * Lemmens, and a large number of Sisters were also prescrnt. After a few vocal and instrumental pieces of music had been excellently rendered by the pupîls, they rnarched out and ranged themselves on both sides of the gravel swecp in front of the building. and sang 'God Save tht Qucen' in fine style as the carniage conveyed away the Vice-Regal party and suite. Everything in connection with this visit was rnost happily con- * ceived and admirably carried out by the painstaking and devoted Sisters Who have charge of this useful institution.\" Another account, from Nellie Wilsori's school girl point of view. is equally interesting:, \"hI was in the faîl of 1882. when after almost a Month's hard preparation and drilling to walk backwards, that we at last had our curioshy gratified by having a glimpse of Royalty, I remember well my partner on that auspicious occasion was Dora Elliott. a young [Page 65",
         "A CHAPLET 0F YEARS lady from Seattle, who, like myseif, was always looking for fun or trouble, and we had quite a time of it trying to keep ourselves from falling on the eventfui day. as often we had done on previous days when wc were rehearsing. Clara Garesche had the honour of reading the officiai address to His Excellency, which was composed by our very dearly beloved Sister Mary Anne-a part of which I can stili remember., \"The Princess singled me out of the whole school and asked my -xame and admired my singing, which was a French piece entitled 'Les Oiseaux du Paradis.' I also sang a duet with Lucy Bate of Nanaimo. ? and I can assure you I felt pretty proud of myself to be so honoured by such a distinguished lady. \"Grace Cameron, who is now Mrs. E. J. McFeely, read thr- address to Her Royal Highness. Their Excellencies congratulated us on the success of our reception and ýon leaving granted us a holiday in honour of their vîsit.\" Mrs. G. Stelly, formerly Mary Ann Draut, also tells us things I we like to, hear about the Royal Visit: \"The one event I remember so well, was the visit of the Princess Louise and the Marquis of Lorne. For days before. after school was out, we children would stand watching - the workrnen make the big entrance-gate larger. so as to allow the 2 carniage containing the Royal party to pass through. \"The Sisters and older pupils had decorated the big hall with ever- greens, the windows being covered with richi pink curtaîns. over which hung beautiful white, casting a rose shade ovcr the entire place. -After a deiightful programme had been rendered, Her Royal High- ness and the Marquis were escorted around the hall by Mother M. Providence. and Princess Louise gave ber hand to each of the singers.. How proud and happy I felt at being pointed out to them as a littie German girl, whereupon they bowcd and addressed a few words to me,. They then passed on to speak to two little Russian girls, Nija and Xenîa Metropolsky. -During the programme Clemence Coakes. a most playful iittle chîld, finding it rather duil to keep still so long. shortly began to nod and nod. and soon fell sound asiccp. Being in the front row, she was hope- lessly in evidence. Smilingly. the kind Princess, with ail the sweetness of fai ry book princesses. said to the Marquis. 'Do look an-d se how that dear littie child is enjoying her nap.' Page 661",
         "RED LETTER DAYS \"Ali we talked of for days and days afterwards. as we had for days and days before. was this great event.\" The hall in which this auspiciouis reception was held no longer stands. It had been an extension of the \"nucleus- building, time and wear began to tell on its safety, so it was reluctantly levelled to the ground and its place taken by the west wing of the Academy. VICE-REGAL VISIT When the walls of the good old hall feUl. they carried many an honour with them. One, the remnembrance of which will last through indefinite time, is the right royal welcome extended to Lord and Lady Aberdeen. In the autumn of 1894, Lord Aberdeen, Governor-General of Canada. visited the Prairie and Coast Provinces in the full power of a representa- tive of our Gracious Sovereign. The quiet and beauty of Canada's western capital favoured I-is Excellency's purpose of rnaking a deliberate study of British Colunibia conditions in regard to agriculture. mining and education, hence he made a prolonged sojourn in the West. St. Ann's Convent-Academy, advantageouslv situatcd near the harbour, conspicuous for its proportions. and crowned with years. could * not fail to attract the intercst of so keeni an observer as Lord Aberdeen. One afternoon. scon after the arrivai of the Vice-Regal visitors iii Vic- toria. while Sister Superior sat in the parlour comforting a poor old womnan, a mnajor-domo rang the doý,r bell and presented the portress with a letter for the Lady Superior. Its contents were to t'ie effect that. if agreeable to the Lady Superior. H -is Excellcncy and suite would visit the Academy at 2 o'clock next day. S It was just before school disrnissal. but in their enthusiasm over the message. the pupils were only too delighted to stay over hours. and make ready for the morrow's visitors. Thcir loyal. enthusiastic prepara- tions were put on record in most gratifying terms by The Colonist. thc ;Z trusty historian of St.. Ann's for nearly threc score years. Re-reading the description is renewing the pleasure and the glory of that hour. \"The Vice-Regal party visited St. Ann's Acadexny yestcrday after- * noon, the reception being one of the rnost pleasant and perhaps the prettiest of those tendered during the stay in Victoria. The long hall of the Academy was gracefully decorated. and grouped upon the platfcrm were nearly une hundred young ladies, aIl dressed becomningly in white., iPage 67",
         "A CHAPLET 0F YEARS j_ At a short distance were armnchairs for the illlistrious visitors, while in the audience behind were a host of little boys and girls from the kinder- garten. The effect was enhanced by the use of gas lights, the closely curtained windows excluding the daylight. \"As the visitors entered the cbildren rose, and an orchestra of pianos, harps, guitars and violins sent forth a joyous welcornc Besides the Governor-General and the Countess of Aberdeen, with Lady Marjorie and Hon. Archie Gordon, thcre were the Lieutenant-Governor and Mrs. Dewdney and Miss Wilson., Hon. Theodore Davie. Premier; Hon. Col. Baker. Minister of Education;ý Capt. Urquhart. A.D.C., and Mr. Camp- bell. private secretary to His Excellency. When the visitors were seated, tbe pupils sang 'Our Loyal Hearts Your Presence Greet' with delightful effect.. Then four young ladies advanced to the front of the platform, and one of them (Miss Evelyn Johnson) read clearly and with good elocutionary style the follclwing address:. \"'May It Please Your Excellency and Lady Aberdeen: - Victoria, exulting in the honour conferred upon it by your visit, greeted your arrival with the entbusiasm that loyal devotion inspired. The echoes of these joyous acclamations penetrated into our quiet home. Sharing in our city's julîlee, we cberished the hope that these precinctýs, within which we haiied the advent of many distinguaished visitors. would likewise be honoured by the presence of Vour Excellency. \"'n your great condescension you have gratified our desire, and witb youthful jubilation we tender you our welcome. - Here assembled are pupils of various nationalities and different govcrnments. yet as members of the same family all unite on this occasion to offer to our Gracious Sovereign. in the person of ber noble and worthy representative, our respectful bornage and wisbes of happi- ness. May this feeble tribute prove agreeable to our beloved Queen and our illustrious Governor-General. \"'The fame of your noble deeds bas preceded you in our Western home, and iii our minds with the names of Lord and Lady Aberdeen are allied those sterling qualities. and elevated feelings, that add a special lustre to noble birth and exalted station. -We have learned that ini Your Excellency Canada bas a gifted ruler who wields tbe baton of autbority with a powerful band, and who by word and deed will further its interests. Page 68]",
         "R~ED LETTER DAYS 'Every shrine of learnîng throughout the broad Dominion cherishes the name of Lady Aberdeen. Thc vouthful rnid. struggling through the labyrinth of science, rejoices that in Your Ladyship it has a protector, a niodel and a guide.. Morcover, wve have been laught that Your Excellency, and worthy consort. posscss the priceiess charrn of shedding happiness on those around you., Kind and conciiiating, the poor and the afflicted may with confidence appeal to you for sympathy and relief., - In a word, your lives may be justiy conipared to the fcrtilizing strean that fiows through the desert, clothing it with verdure and gem- ming it 'with fragrant flowers. With pride and love your honoured names will be handed down to future generations. \"For noble narnes wheni nobly borne Live within a nation's heart.- '-With united voice we re-echo the earnest wish asccrxding from each Canadian hearth and home, that abundant beriedictions attend your labours. May your rule be associated with ail that is most prosperous, great and glorious in the history o! the Dominion over whose destiny you have corne to preside. \" 'May the Supreme Ruler reserve for you an exalted station, in the heavenly kingdom, where ail nations and peoples will foîim but one family, united by the golden link of divine charity. - THE PUPIL-S 0F ST. ANN'S ACADEMY.' \"The four young ladies then advanced and presented bouquets and baEkets of flowers to the Countess and Lady Marjorie. His Excellency and littie Hon.. Archie were flot forgotten, for each had a buttonhole bouquet pinned to bis coat. After a harp solo by a young lady pupil (Miss Lizzie Styles), and a Latin anther. *Laudate Pueri,' sung by a group of the pupils, His Excellency mnade gratifying acknowledgrnents. \"He said: 'We often have an opportunity of visiting an academy or Convent of this description in Canada. and on #-ery occasion wc have found one comrnon element and characteristic. namely. that of loyalty. expressed in rnost kindly and most cordial terms. But while this char- acteristic, and no doubt many others apply to ail. there has on each occasion been sorne distinctive feature, so that the interest has neyer flagged.. - Lady Aberdeen and 1 naturally expected that on corning here today we should have sorne very agreeable experience. Our expectations I (Page 69",
         "A CHAPLET 0F YEARS have been more than fulfilled, for the first thing I noticed on coming in was the attractive appearance presented by these young people, adorned as they are in such a very becoming and graceful manner. -Another thing was flot only the extremely loyal and cordial terms in which this charmîng address is expressed, but also the excellent manner in which it was read. I think good reading is an art which, perhaps, has not been so carefully studied as it might be, or at any rate flot so successfully acquired as could be wished. \"'It is a privilege for me to have the opportunity of seeing what is here done in the ail-important mnatter of education, and of realizing that you are being ably and effectively taught. I arn told that Her Royal Highness, the Prîncess Louise, wife of an able Governor-General, visited this institution and offered a medal for competition arnong the pup ils. -'I arn, therefore, followîng a good precedent, in offering a medal to be cornpeted for in such a way as shall elicit the ail-round excellences of this Academy. In conclusion. I beg to off cr my own and Lady Aber- deen's congratulations to the ladies who conduct this institution.' \"A musical medley of harps. pianos, guitars, mandolins and har- monium cornbined, and the singing of 'God Save the Queen,' brought the proceedings to a close.\" The namnes of the young ladies ifiserted ini this reproduction do flot appear in the original copy. The explanation honours character- building. Mother M. Providence. so long at the head of the Academny, neyer forgot that she was moulciing women for the future. In this matter there was no exception to her princîples of procedure, flot even on s0 extraordinary an occasion as that of a Vice-Regal visit te the school. During the reception, somewhat in the background of the hall, a reporter politely asked for the names of the young ladies who took lead- ing parts. Mother M. Providence replied. \"Dear Sir. scnting our little girls before the public eye is flot our way of bringing themn up. You have a programme, say ail you can about our honoured guests.\" FuWl grown young ladies about to graduate were \"our lîttle girls\" in the mind of the motherly nun.. The pupils' -iddress tu, 1-lisExcellency was liere reproduced in com- pliment to the class of '94, which was se proud to repeat that it had been univcrsally acknowledged the best among the many read to the Vice- Regal visitors. Page 70]",
         "RED LETTER DAYS THE DUKE 0F DEVONSHIRE AT ST. ANN'S A third time St. Ann's Academy was made illustrious by the pres- ence of a representative of His Majesty. This was Thtirsday, November 22, 1917, on the occasion of the vivit to British Columbia of the Duke of Devonshire, Governor-General. In contrast to previous Vice-Regal visits made in the peaceful reigns of Queen Victoria and Edward VIL., this visit occuired during the World War in the time of George V. With militarismr and democracy engaged in deadly strife, there was all the more reason for demonstra- tions of Ioyalty to the Empire and its rulers. And, is patriotismn ever so truc as when every home courits a soldier, and evcry heart pays a war toil? Another feature of this reception which differed froni the preceding is that the students appeared in navy blue dresses, and white ribbon, instead of in traditional white. Yet another. that because of the many demands on H-is Excellency's time, the reception programme was limiled to a quarter of an hour. In that bni time St. Arin's compassed a hearty. glorious tribute to him who came in the name of the King. Ht was received in the main entry of the new wing by His Lordship, Bishop MacDonald, Monsignor Leterme, V.G., Mr. F, J. Sehi, Mother Mary Philip, Provincial Superior. and her assistants. The visiting party was conducted immediately Io t',.e Auditorium. where the teaching faculty and students to the number of threr~ huindred were gathered. Bishop MacDonald presented the School to tht distinguished visîtor. The pupils then sang their greetings in a spirited cantata by W. H. Palmer, in which the following solo was introduced: \"~Loyal, gratefui, sincere is our welcome. Your honoured presence wc joyful!y sing, Pledging our fealty deep and undying To the higher narne of our Kinig. Gaily peals our song of gladness. Whilc the mirthful echoes singing. Chme the message, free from sadness, This day we bail with delight.\" Miss Edith Lineham voiced the grcctings f rom the School ini these ternis: \"To Your Exceilency, the Governor-General and Commander-in- Chief in and over the Dominion of Canada, welcome as representative of the Throncl a thousand welcomes froni the faculty and students of St. Ann's Academy. [Page 7.",
         "1 ý,A CHAPLET 0F YEARS \"During a period such as this of world upheaval, ail hopes are placed ini the leaders. We, as a School. wish to express to you aur trust and confidence, and with thrilling hearts to pledge our love and loyalty to the Motherland. -To Your Grace. the Duke of Devonshire, welcome as the worthy hcad of a noble family. whose traditions for three hiundred years have paralleled the growth of constitutional monarchy in England. A hundred thousand welcamnes from hearts which would fain tell their appreciatian and gratitude for the honour which today's presence confers on their Aimna Mater and an us. her favoured children, yet 'What we have of feeling mnost intense Outstrips our faint expression,' and adopting the Cavendish mnotta, 'Cavendo Tutus,' we simply beg you ta believe in the fealty of 'ITIE TEACHERS AND PUPILS 0F ST. ANNS ACADEMY..\" When the welcorne had been acknowledged. the girls sang as a chorus, the sang \"0 Canada,\" the original words of which were written by one of the Sisters. Manuella Colbert then presented a boakiet ta His Excellency. On the parchment caver, in a cluster of sof t rases set in Louis XIV.. decara- tian, were the dedicatian lines. On the inner pages a vignette af maple leaves and music scrolls framned the words af the sang, \"0 Canada.\" As His Grace with attending gentlemen passed out of the Audi- torium, little Justa McKenna came forward holding the Visitar's Book. The signatures of these great men are registered as follaws- Devonshire - - - - Gavernor-General. F. S. Barnard - - - - Lieutenant- Governor. H. C. Brewster - - - - Prime Minister of B. C. Ed., Gawler Prior, Col.. - - Privy Councillor of Canada. Vivian Buckley-Johnson, Capt. - A.D.C. Alexander MacDonald - - Bishap af Victoria. J. Leterme, P.D., V.G. Frank J. Sehl - - - Sec. Canadian Club. The august persanages stepped into the Art Studio where they leisurely cxamined the drawings and paintings of teacher and students. Taking his farewell in the Academy Parlour, the Duke walked down the avenue ai poplars ta St. Joseph's Hospital. As he did so, Bishop Mac- Donald pointed aut a pear tree in full bloom, against the Convent wall.. It was a rare sight for a November day. The phenomenon was regarded as a delicate contribution from Nature ta the tribute paid by St. Ann's Academy ta the Duke of Devonshire., Page 72]",
         "RED LETTER DAYS HONOUR TO WHOM HONOUR IS DUE The dominant note in the Red Letter Days described was in major chords- -resonant, joyful, exuberant. It was St. Ann's comning forward ta give whole-hearted homage ta the niost exalted represenitatives of God and King. September 21, 1903, witnessed z Red Letter Day in which this order was reversed. On this occasion it was now the honoured of the land, who camne ta St. Ann's, almost sacredly, ta pay honour ta one of the religious of the Sisterhood. One, who in her early years, had chosen a vocation in which she would live unknown ta the world in the exercise of free service ta the young. But this was not ta be quite as the humble nurn had outhined., Soan her exectitive ability and resourceful syinpathy, joined ta her influence as a teaclier, penetrated thraugh the narraw sphere within which she would have bound them, and Mother Mary Providence. stoad rcvealed ta twa Provinccs-Quebec on the Atlantic, and British Columbia on the Pacific.. She belongs ta Victoria; ta it she gave farty.five years of her life. She rarely Ieft the city, and when she did sa it was for duty. neyer for pleasure, neyer for a vacation. It might almost bc said that Victoria was her awn, sa rnuch she loved and admired it. so mnuch she rejoiced in its developmnent. liad she flot counted its fevv houses in 1859, seen them rnultiply, and rnoted their nurnberless increase? Was her perspective magnified when an a certain day, while driving around the city, she said, 'Victoria affords scupe for another London.\" The j .oys, the sorraws, the gains, the lasses of Victorians passed through her heart, affecting her as much as if they had been those of a brother or a sister. ~Inreconition of :his symp:thy, which took tangible form, as well as for the wide-spread good which. from the retirement of the Convent, she had accomplished in the country, the \"elite\" of the city resolved ta makteFiftieth Anvrayo etkighevows of relig.,ion, in a raanner worthy of ane so highly esteemed. In a representative meeting of the Aluxwnae. it was decided that the tribute would take the form of a public receptian. The Reveiend Jubilarian disapprovcd the suggestion. saying that a private affair was mare in keeping with her holy calling. However. her hast of friends were too glad of this oppartunity offered by her Golden Jubilee ta yïield the point of giving her public appreciatian.. Every heart and hand lent itself ta love's labour. [ a e7",
         "A CHAPT.ET 0F VEARS The reception hall was transformed into a veritable fairyland. Sailors canopied the ceiling, and draped doors and windows with flags furnished by Admirai Bickford.. The ladies enhancedl the walls with soft white material, over which trailed ivy mingied with golden glow. On one side they erected a platformi bearing a throne, above which glearned a golden Cross. To this, Mother M., Providence was lovingly led on entering the roomn at threc o'clock. Gathered in the hall were young. rniddle-aged, and elderly women. ail former pupils corne with hallowed affection to express their congratu- lations to one vhom it was an honour to honour. Among the guests were Lord and Lady Lyveden; Lord and Lady Brae. and several members of the parltamentary party, Admiral Bick- ford, C.M.G., Mrs. and Miss Bickford; His Excellency. Sir Henri Joly de Lothiniere.His Worship the Mayor; the Hon. H. D. Helmcken, the doctors of the city, and nlany other persons of distiit non. As the names of the guests were announced, the beloved jubilarian ackriowledged each introduction with the innate dignity of her lineage. and the spirit of her sublime calling. When that of the octogenarian Bi shop Cridge, Christ Church. was given. Mother M. Providence rose, and advanced a few steps before this venerable figure of grand age. TI-e picture made an impression on the spectators. In it, they saw nobiity of soui paying respect to nobilitv of purpose. A short programme was perfc .,ed. After a jubilee Chorus. Mrs. judge Harrison (pupil of 1873) was introduccd as reader of the address. Two little girls next presentcd an illurninated scroll. containing the names of those wvho had contributed to the gift of a gold purse. to be applied to a chi!dren's ward in the hospital. Among the choral pieces was Gounod's «'Hymn of Praise- and a beautifully rendered Magnificat. Many. many of Mother M. Providence's -little girls\" of bygone years laid their ripened taler-~ before ber on this mcmorable day-somne as singers and pianists. others as organizers. and one with the cxceptional accomplishment of bird imitation. This was Marie Beckingham (1887). who. in the course of the afiernoon. rendered several warl.ling selections. ber birdlike notes and soft trilîs calling forth praist and wonder from ail. 0f ai the social functions ai Si. Ann's. that of Mdother M. Provi- dence's Fîftieth Anniversary of religious profession stands out as the expression of profound reverence to immecasurable influence. fi was a loving testimony of the good done by the gifted religiaus who~e solIe ambition through a long life was to lead hrartN to the feen of God. Page -41",
         "AT CANA IN GALILEE. Two days haci bloomed as swectly as the rose And dropped their petalb in the urn of Time: And now a third was fading fast aw-.y. The alumbrous strearmers of the setting sun Came softly steahing through the festive room, To weave of mist and light a halo meet About the face of onc so spotless fair, That c'en the rad.ant starlight's glittering beam, Caressing virgin.snows on Alpine heights, Would scem a tainted thing. unclean. impure. The Qucen of Angels. Queen of men was she. And Queen o'er Christ's own heart-His Mother blest. Ah. this the richest feast tha* e'er hath been, For He was therc. the Maker of thRe world, And she was there. who gave that Maker birth! Wath trustful srnile, she turned and soitly, said. \"Tney have no wine\"-, then called a steward nigh. Sh- knew His hour had flot yet come for this. Bt weil she knew His mnercy and Hîs love. \"Do thou what He shall tell thee.\" thus she spoke. Nor doubted once the want would be supplied. And so the tender heart of God was; touchcd. And for His MAother waq thc marvel wrought. 'Tjs thus. dear Motiier. aow my life flows on, As sweetly as the marrnage fcast of c'ld; But when the wir.c of gladnesb ha-, run out. Ah. summnon the'i tLy Ange)-stewards nigh: And bid ilhem fil] my hcart wzth tears of love. So itather Thou miy grief, the whilc 1 mourfi. And have it changcd tu wine. that I again May l:now the joy of lufe in~ loving lH:m. K^rI-ERINE LYTER.",
         "z,",
         "PART V. SHITHER AND YON ST. ANN'S ACADEMY AND THE ORPHANS v HERE was a varicty of work for the Sisters to do ini Victoria ~Gi ~\u003e-a boarding and day school to conduct. a protectorate for jlittie boys, a school for coloured children, night wa tches Swith the sick, and caring for the orphans. Looking at St., Ann's Academy such ,, it is today. long and high. set i the foliage of a hundred trees, and admiring its old pines and maples, the aged holly hed1ges. the long poplar avenue, the spaciuus grounds- may we flot say. this is the benediction of the orphans? This is the return made to the Sisters. as welI as to the better conditioned pupils. for bringing the homeless into their own lives, and regardless of caste, sharing roof ard educational advantage-, with them. The Academy opened with ten pupils. il has now a roll of three hundred. In the beginning there were thrcc orphans and seven boarders. the orphans being the first to corne. After a few years these figures balanced. there being twenty-six of the one and twentv-six of the other. A littie further on we find the orphans outnurnbering the boarders. the former being 32 in nurmb\"r. the latter 23. In 18-16. conditions mp.de il necessary to provide more tdequate accommodations for thcse wards of St. Ann's. When land was one dollar an acre in Vancouver Island. the Sisters had bought four hundred acres in Cowichan district- Much of it was mountainous. sonie barren, somne fertile, but the whole a beautiful. heaithy locality. The orphans wcrc put in possession of the place, and there led ideal child life. They studied, they worked. they roanied fields and meadows. and climbed mounitains. They lived with Nature. When they \"r old enough. they wcnt to take their place in the big outside wvorld. Sornetimes there was a wedding frorn St. Ann's Orphanage for Girls. Then the Sisters lent ready hands in fittirg out the young couple. For the btndes trousseau. selection was made of the finest articles which were occasionally sent by charitable Victorians to Cowichan-now calied Tzouhaiemn. Thcse were adjusted according to requir-ements. But it would neyer do for a girl to wed in a second-hartd dress. so the Sist-.rs would buy everythl.-g ncw. fromn shoes to hat. Those pioncer Sisters belonged io the practical. old-fashioned school. hence they thoughl of the hit home. To it the bride conveyed a feather-bed. blankets. quilts. sheets. etc.. as ber dowry froni thc Sisters-and-a fine cow. IPage 77",
         "A CHAPLET 0F YEARS There mnay bc some who will say. \"The Sisters can afford such generosity.' 0f course they can, because they believe in the theory, \"God helps those who help themnselves.\" God helped them because they prayed an-d put their entire trust in Him. They helped thernselves by doing farm work to raîse the mneans of housing and feeding their charges. Who were these charges of St. Ann's Sisters, and whence did they corne? They were everybody and they came from everywhere. Any gi rl from the age of two an-d upwarcls was received at St. Ann's Orphanage. Sometimes they were deposited there with the honest understanding that nothing could be paid towards their board and clothing. Oftener the children were thrown on the care of the Sisters through dishonest representations. Ini this case the person introducing a ward wouid mnake a deposit, promise another, and then disappear altogether. Unfortunate half-breeds were the most frequent victims of this fraud. In British Columbia. a half-breed means the offspring of whites an-d Indians. Prom the 50's tc the 90's, seventy-five per cent. of the girls at the Orphanage belonged to that class. The others were whites. Mexicans, Creoles from Alaska, Kanakas from the Sandwich Islands, and at one time there was a Chinese girl from 1Hong Kong. and a coloured girl from flot very far away. The story of both these children is sad-sad above the story of the rnajority of the children in that institution. The extenu- ating feature which dispels the pitiful facts is that these victims of evil intentions found the happiness suited te their years under that charitable roof. KIDNAPPED IN HONG KONG The Chinese girl was called Ah Fah. Now. this is really flot Chinesc at ail. bi' an attempt at English. When the worst of her misfortunes was over and she had recovered enough spirit to notice things. she saw some flowers. The sight pleased her se that she exclaimed, \"Ah Fah,- the first English word she had tried to say. Nobody could understand her real Chinese name. so she wern hy thae of Ah Fah. One day when she was in Hong Kong she went inte the yard around her home te pick flowers. She does flot know how old she was. but the Sisters made out later on that she may have been eight or nine. Tempted by the gay flowers which she saw further off. Ah Fahi forgot her mother's injunction flot te leave the yard. She opened the gate and followed whcrever the beautieul flowers lured her. When she had enough of Page 781",
         "HITHER AND YONu' them., she looked up and arouind, but she could flot see her home. Every. thing was strange. She went this way and that, but could flot find the way back. She was lost. Crying bitterly. sho\u003e continued to walk up and dowri in the vain search. Presently a well-dressed Chinese wonr came along. arnd seeing the unhappy little girl. stopped and asked her what was the matter. -1 want my marna, and I cannot find the way home.\" The woman talked to her a litie, and then said. -I know where your house is, corne with me and 1 will take you there.\" At once cornforted, Ah Fah trustingly took the wornan's hand. They both walked on through streets that were more and more crowded. and along houscs that were closer and closer together. It was ail riew to the child. and flot at ail as she had seen things on ber way to the fields to pick flowers. She could flot understand why she had to walk so far to get back to her home. As they kept hurrying on. Ah Fah becarne frightened, for the womari led her down a wharf and into a big steamship. To the littie girl'-- horror, the steamer began to move, and from the shelved bed upon which the womnan had told ber to lie down and sleep. she saw more and more of the water. TMien she knew slie had been kidnapped. She wvould neyer. neyer see her father and mother. nor her brothers and sisters. For three days she did nothing but cry. but after that she consented to make the acquaintance of other children. and whiled away the long rnontb at sea ini playing cats'-cradle. She was Ianded in Victoria. B.C., and taken to people she did flot knowv. Besides. they wotild flot let ber go out of doors. nor out of their sight even in the bouse. Pining ail the mnore for her home bccause of the crossness of tho:,e who kept her so imprisoned, Ah Fah made up her mind to run away and drown herself.. It v/as flot easy to escape the constant vigil- ance of the old mnan. who took turns with an old woman. to prevent ber escape. But she rnanaged it one evening, just wben it was growing dark and she had been left alone fcr a minute, for if the old people kept strict watcb on her movements. she did on theirs. always studying ber opportunity. Frarfui of being pursueci.bile kept away frorn bouses. and made for the open. hiding behind trees or rocks when she saw anyone i! the distance. Night came on and it was very dark. because Vic-.oria was flot yet ligh3Ud with etectricity. Tired. sleepy, Ah Fah lay down in the sheltcr of a rock and slept tili cold wakened ber about daylight. She liPage 79",
         "A CHAPLET 0F YEARS wanted to find thie water, an easy scarch in this city which is almost sea-girt, but this poor imprisoned child had neyer been out in the streets since her arrivai in Victoria from China., Getting up, she resumed her cautious walk and came to the water. Without hesitation shte went in and contintied on to a considerable depth. Some boys who Nvere having an early swim perceived a \"something\" in the water. and recognized it to be a drowned or drowning person. They raised shout after shout, tili policemen appeared upon the scene. With men around. the littie girl was soon drawn out of the bay. As nobody could understand the girl's language, she was carried to the biouse of Mr. Gabriel. This gentleman had spent several years in China and Japan, and it was conjectured that he mnight make out Ah Fah's dialect.. His bouse, which was near St. Ann's Acadcmy. was a gem of good taste, and as he had no children. everything was always kept in perfect order. And now, he answers a door-bell ring to find two policemen supporting a Chinese-featured littie girl in a drenched and dirty dress. She had a scared expression and wai shivering from head to foot. His, wife, hearing unusual sounds, hastened to the door. As soon as she sam the miserable child she said. 'Bring that poor creature in the house ai. once, she must not stay in those wct clothes, she will catch ber death of cold. Sie must. be attended to before s'ae does any talking.\" Mrs. Gabriel was the swectcst. kindest lady to be met. Helping Ah Fah into her nicely carpeted rooms, she took 1, r at once to the bath- roorr, and filled the tub with hot watcr. Then she got some of her own garmnents to put on the child. Having put her eo bcd in nice soft blankets. she fetcbed bey something to eat, then let her sleep. No wonder the would-b)e suicide was reconciled tu life wher l1ie woke up and saw the deir lady. with golden hair and soft eyes. . 'tting quietly near., Later on in the day. when Ah Fah waE interviewcd she uncon- sciously made disclosures which revealed much wickedness th-at was going on in tbe place from which she had escaped. Investigations fol- lowed. and for several weeks Ah Fah had to appear in court, Though sbe did flot understand the weight of her tcstimony. it had the effect \u003ef stopping considerabIc evii in the Chinese quarter. But where was she to stay? There were no houses of detention for children in those times, and no Cbristian Aid Societies. The faci. that Page 80]",
         "HITHER AND YON shc had been bro-aght to Mr. and Mrs. Gabriel to be interpreted in her language. was no reason why they should even have let her corne into their house, still less keep there indefinitely. But Mrs. Gabriel. in her great goodness, offered to keep ber tili the Court had Occided what was to bc donce. Lcgally. Ah Fahi belonged to nobody, It was a case in which the judge assumes supreme jurisfiiction. When the question arose as to how the vagrant should be disposed of, he said that anybody who was willing to assume the right of guardian over the Chir.ese gi rl mighit do so by paying fifteen dollars. otherwise she would belong to those who had sheltered her since her arrivai in Victoria. This was a sad fate, but after ail. who wanted to be burdened with a littie Chinese girl? The Sisters were willîng to receive her in their Orphanage. but the law could flot sanction this. unless she was entered there by a person acting as her recognized guardian. Fifteen dollars did not mean mnuch to many people. but care of a kidnapped Chinese girl meant a great deal. However. Mr, Gabriel, urged by bis gentle wife. and seeing no other way of saving the child fromn a horrible fate, con- sented to pay the qum. Henceforth. the littie Chinese waif was his. In time. she took the liberty to call theni father and mother, Contrary to the saying that charity brîngs its own rewai d, the good couple found their house under ill-concealed Chinese custody. as was St. Ann's Acaderny. Lt was only too apparent that the Chinese were trying to wreak vengeance on poor Ah Fah. Durîng the trial. which lasted tbree months, hardly an hour in the day passed but what they were seen hovcrir.g about both places. The timne came when she could be sent to the Orphanage at Tzouhalem. though she hai] to corne back to Victoria for the next assizes. Ah Fah was a pp-an. and notwithstanding that she was at a pliable age. she did flot readiiy beconie a Christian. She wa% left free on the subject. until one day she requestcd of h,:- cwi ac-ord to bc baptizcd. She adored Mr. and Mlr!F. Gabriel. and ber one clesirc in life was to go and live with thern. In their greai j,ýty. the good couple gratified her desire. wben she left the Orphanage. Her exact age was neyer known. but at that time she may have been eighteen. Later on, she rnarried one of her race. and now bas grown up sons and daughters. There is no doubt that Ah Fah taught her children the lesson of obedience. for she always rernembered that the tragedy of her 1-fe was a consequente of having gone out of the homne yard against her rnother's recommendation.. \"But 1 did s0 without thinking.\" she would say sorrowf uliy. iPage 81",
         "A CHAPLET 0F YEARS MAROONED AT FIVE At the Orphanage, sitting next to the Chinese girl, was a wooly- headed coloured girl. Her hair preferred to grow in horizontal rather than in vertical lines. Do what one would, it bulged out in impene- trahie thickness. Her features were typical of the African-high receding forehead, over-fuil lips, and black iris in a big white orbit. But Elizabeth, the coloured girl, did flot know this-she had neyer seen herseif, and for this very simple reason, that she had neyer seen a looking-glass. Advertently or inadvertently, as you choose to exple:ii, the Sisters had neyer included a mirror in their purchases. The day carne when they thought they could indulge ini this extrava- gance to please the girls. So to celebrate Dominion Day, or the Fourth of July. they hought a lookir.g-glass. 16 inches by 20. It was hung in the orphan's dormitory, with neyer a thought that it might be an unknown article to some one or other of their charges. Elizabeth, who was about thirteen, strayed into the apartment where the rnirror had been installed, and her quick eye soon caught sight of an unfamiliar frarne on the wall. She went up to see what it was. Poor girl, she screanied with fright. What she saw was so black, so different from anything she could rememnber having seen. Then she began to cry. She knew she was unlîke the other girls ini the Orphanage. But. as is the case ini so rnany unpleasant things in life. the effect of the startling discovcry wore off. and Elizabeth becarne a regular patron of that mirror. Like Ah Fah's story, Elizabeth's is sad, and it is too true. Her father was a negro, her mother a native, and at four or five a squaw step-niother entered her life. But that is not the saddest part, One day her father and this woman took her with themn in the row- boat-they liv'ed on an island. Elizabeth enjoyed the boat ride very rnuch. By and by the boat was beached and her father said. \"Elizabeth. you mnay pick bernies whîle wc sit hcre.\" Off she went, looking for thern in among the brush and trees. Bei ng only five years old. she certainly did flot go far. for stay away a long tîme, but when she carne back 1'-r father, and the wornan. and the boat were flot to be seen. She look, ap and down, and away off where the water stretched into a big bay. she saw the boat., It was going out. farther and farther. She ran about and screarned with aIl her might. then she waited to sec if the boat would corne back. but it did not. She screamed louder as the boat Page 821",
         "HITHER AND YOrT becarne a speck, and finally disappeared in the distance. The child threw herself on the pebbly beach and cried witb ail her might. Only the wood rchoes of the uninhabited island responded ta hier distress. Ail around there was nothing ta sec but islands. darkened with tali pine trees. One must live in British Columbia ta knaw how much of this earth remains untouched by civilization. The child of five was alane, ail alone with owls and squirrels. She had been marooned! Left ta die, starved and exhausted! And we know by whom. Must Elizabeth die? No. A canoeist was paddling througli the labyrinth of islands. Perhaps he was the only persan who entered that kingdom of silence. Oh, the solemnness of that quiet! The canoeist let his boat drift with the tide. He often did that ta say his brcviary, for he was the missionary pricst of those parts. Accustomned ta the least of Nature's disturbances. bis sharpened hearing caught a faint, far-away sound. He listened, and studied the direction fromn which it came. The sound grew more distinct., There was no mistaking that it was the vaice of a child struck with borror and despair. It guided with the accuracy of a magnet. The missianary, who knew every nook and cranny along that waterway, soan reached the spot where the maroaned child still lay venting hcr desperation on the beach. He picked her up. and placing bier in the canoe, plieO. the paddles quickly homeward. On arriving lie brought ber ta the Orphan- age, where shie was campassianately received. The district was not so peopled as ta rnake it difficuit ta find out ta whomn the castaway child had belanged. Henceforth, she belonged ta the Sisters. Though lier father owned a fine farm flot farty miles from the Orphanage, he neyer concerned himnself in the least about the little girl. In fact, it was as if he. and she. had ceased ta exisi. But he knew very well that she was safe with the Sisters. Elizabeth grew ta wornanhood, niarried a coloured mani. and is the mother of a large family. Like most Convent girls. 3he bad her \"*special\" Sister, When duty takes this Sister through the city wbere Elizabeth lîves, the grateful womnaî cames ta pay ber a visit at the Convent. with her children. Each time the well-known introduction is repeated with utmaost reverence- -Chuldrcn. this is the Sister who was sa good ta miother when she was small. She is like your grandmother.- The dear. little darkies look respectfully up. and the fair, blue-eyed Sister looks smilingly down, and the bystander says, -A penny for your thoughts.\" [Page 83",
         "A CHAPLET OF YEARS BOYS' PROTECTORATE Aftcr the opening of the View Street building, the Cabin Convent was not left unoccupicd. Indeed, there was stili much good work for it to do. The first was to serve as a protectorate for littie boys. They were the lucky boys, for they iiad Sister M. Angela to look after themn. This Sister had big pockcts. and a large apron, and the boys knew that these articles alway-- buiged out with somnething ready for themn to eat there and then. Deprived of the liboerty to give. Sister M. Angela wouid have been like a plant in a cellar. She might take fromn Peter to give to Paul, but give she mnust. Nobody knew the high position this good Sister had heid before coming to Victoria. To have let out the secret, or intimated it remotely, would have so wounded hier that nobody dared breathe a word about it. They' can now.. It was this-she had been Mother General of the Sisterhood. Gentle and lovable ruier, unerring reader of character, clear adviser in difficulty, she had shed happiness on ail those who were under lier sway. And if external appearances are to be put in the balance, Sister M. Angela had a queenly portion. But this Mother General, so beioved by ail, who made others so happy, was unhappy herseif. The votes of the Sisters had elected hier to the loftiest of positions, but she preferred the lowiiest. Her first terni of office was just finished when the call came for volunteers for the semi-Indian missionary work in Vancouver Island. Hers was the first namne thrown in the box. The protest from young and oid was strong, but by long and earnest entreaty she prevailed, and her self-sacrificing offer accepted. This gained, she took measures to guard against future possible honours.. She elicited a promise from the Administration, in the form of a favour, that thcy would neyer appoint hier Superior in any establishment, be it ever so unimportktnt. -Thcre will be a great deal of heavy work in those pioneer Convents of the West,\" she said, 'allow me to do the domestic part.\" The iequest was bard to grant, and. because of the dignity of the person who tcndered it, hard to refuse. Having chosen to bc \"an object in the house of the Lord.\" Sister M. Angela was -ien at ail sorts of occupations. But truc menit and magnetic personality cannot be hidden under a bushel. so in spite of the humble Page 84]",
         "w HITHER AND YON duties she had assumned, Sister M. Angela wvas held on an equality with those who governed. She was always first councillor. and she occupied the scat next the Superior in highest authority. Besides drawing incessantly from ber apron and ample pockets in behaif of those around her, this S.ste- had another characteristic dear to young hearts. She believed in picnics, in holidays, in excursions- and her actions accorded with her belief. The littie boys of St, Ann's Protectorate liked those teii. -s. After several years' existence, the boys' school was discontinued for a long interval. In 1898, the same object was resumed, and carried on in connection with the day school at St. Louis College.. The Sisters rented a bouse on Mason Street for the paying boarders and poor boys. The place was called St. Aloysius Protectorate. From this hemmed-in city place, the boys were removed to the big Tzouhalem farrn in Cowichan district, the orphan girls once again gîving themi rigbt of way by vacating thc house in 1904, and going to St. Ann's Convent in Nanaimo. Since then, St. Ann's Girls' Orphanage has becn happilv pursuing its course in that charitable littie city. St. Ann's boys remain attached to the Sisters who zook care of them.. Only a few weeks ago. one of these grateful lads, in soldier's uniform, lingered around the Convent as long as he dould. Me was about to leave for that abstract. though tragic, \"Somewhere in France.\" The Sisters had been like mothers to hiîn, and his heart ached on1 leavîng therr. Like his father who, f romi the age of two, had been cared for by the Sisters of the Cabin Convent in Victoria, this boy had known no home but that of St. Ann's Boys' School in Tzouhalemn. ST. ANN'S SCHOOL FOR THE ('ÇLOURED The school for coloured childreri was of short duration from lack of co-operation rather on the part of parents than on that of the Sisters. During the Civil War in the United States, a number of coloured families had made their way as far north as Vancouver Island. They were high-strung and sensitive on the point of equal rights, and they wanted their children to be educated with the whites. They sent a spokesman ta the Convent ta inquire if coloured children would be admtted ii the school. The vocation of the Sisters ignores race dis- tinctions, but flot necessariiy such as are social. Mr-ther M. Providence happened to be out that day inspecting a farmr, which Bishop Derners had put up for sale to raise funds for View Street Convent. about ta be IPa1-e 85",
         "A CHAPLET 0FYEARSK erectc.d. The Sister who answered the parlour cali, more zealous for Christ's work than for the world's Uine of demarkation, answered] posi- tively that the coloured children would be received.. Not so the white pupils. They. of course. did not want to associate with the negresses. who had Iost no time in presenting thernselves inta the school. The Sisters made a compromise., T}iey announced that a special school would be opened for coloured pupils alone. Rebellion among the dark element followed, and for some tinie the atrnosphere over St. Ann's Con- vent was ominous. The Sisters opened the school, and exerted them- selves in every way ta make things agreeable and advantageous ta the ostracised ch:idren, but the offended negroes neyer recovered froin the affront of not being classified with the whites. and gradually withdrew froni St. Ann's School. SISTER M.. CONCEPTION NARROWLY ESCAPES JAIL The Sisters of St. Anri were introduced ta the people of Victoria by Bishop Deniers, in 1858, as -Teacherts and Sisters of Charîty.\" To carry out the double work with only a sniall staff. required that the sarne Sister be frequently called upon ta do double work-teach within class hours, visit the sick at the recess period, and keep night watches at their bedsides. The annual appointments of the Sisters show the naine of Sister M. Conception followed. for six consecutive years by the daily avocations. -Teaching and Visitation of the Sick.\" Being strang. composed and resourceful. her presence in a household was a blessing. In the summer of 1867. sht carne froni St. Mary's Indian Mission on the Fraser. for a well-earned vacation in Victoria. Greetings over. Mother Mary Providence said ta her, -Mrs. Martin's baby is dying. and the poor wornan is distracted with grief. Will you go and sec her? Your visit would bc a comfort. and you might be able ta do sornething for the child.. Then you may go to Mr. and Mrs. Chauvaux. They are bath very sick.- When Sister M. Conception. accompanied by ont of the larger orphans. entered tht house sht found tht anguished mother gazing in dry-tycd misiery on a whtezing skeleton baby on her lap. -Poor litile one.* said tht kind nun. pityingly. -it is very sick.- -Sistcr dear.- interposed thc haggard niother. -he is dying of dyscntery. Tht doctor said if thîs could bc checked. niy child had3 a chance, but I have had three doctors. and flane o! theni have donc baby any gaod. and it's dying.. Oh. my child !- Page 86)",
         "W11 HIT'HER AND YON \"I remember something my mother used to give the childrcn when they were teething,\" said the good nun. \"suppose we trl i Send a bone of fresh pork up to the Convent arcd 1 shall prepare a mixture. of which you will give haif a teaspooriful in a little rnilk Io the baby.\" Hope gave energy to the faint wornan. and in a short time the Sister received the bone. Immediately Sistcr calcined it. and next ground it to finest powder. After this she made a syrup of the powder mixed with milk and sugar. A messenger was sent with the cordial to the anxicus rnother. The baby swallowcd a few drops. and at intervals a littie more. Its whistling breath softened perceptibly. and in less than an hour it fell asleep., The saving doses were repeatcd. with the resuit that in the moi ning when the Doctors Davie and Helmckcen called., they were astonished to -se the littie one was resting, and that it had a hint of reviving colour in its emaciated features. 'Your baby is better,\"' they sakl. Insane with the sudden revulsion of feeling. the woman forgot prudence. civility. patient service, and exclaimed. \"Yes. it is better. but no thanks to either of you. If Sister had not gîven me her own pre- scription, my child would be dead now.\" *'What !\" shouted Doctor Davie. \"*Sister gave you medicine. What business had she doctoring? By jove. if àhe cannot produce her doctor's certificate. she vwill sleep in jail tontight.\" \"Corne. Doctor. cool off.\" coaxed Dr. Helmncken. always a friend to the Sisters. through thick and thin. \"Ves. she will.\" declared the wrathful doctor. **111 sec her in jail this very night. uniess she show.. her license..\" Meanwhile. Sister M. Conception. passing frorn one good work to another. was spending the night at the bedside of Mr. and Mrs. Chau- vaux. who. inseparable through life. werc now dying in separat roorns. cach ignorant of the other's condition. \"*Why does flot niy wife corne to sec me? She neyer stayed away like this before.\" wailed the dying husband. After soothîng him for a brief time. the Sister would pass into the adjoit'ing chamber. whcrc shc wvas met by the piteous inquiry. \"Sister. what does it mean? I arn dying and my husband. who was neyer absent from me for any length of timc. has flot been here for days.\" It was a very busy night. Besides caring for the bodilv rclief of thest dying persons. there wvas a soul for Sister to reason away frorn (Page 87",
         "A CHAPLET 0F YEARS zý the meshes of a secret saciety.. This being satisfactarily accornplished. the priest was sent for and the sacraments were administered ta the reconciled saul. About midnight, it went ta nicet his merciful God. I-lis wife, with eyes fixed on the door, kept asking for the husband whose devotion ta her, had made his negligence ta Churcli so liard to bear. Towards rnarning, she went to perpetuate with hirn in a better land, the beautiful unian begun twenty years before when she had become his bride. In thase days the Sisters did rnuch of the enshrouding. Sa Sister staycd ta attend ta this work af rnercy. The forenoon was over by the time the two corpses were laid out. Sister was putting the finishing touch ini tht apartment when Doctor Helrncken dropped in, as if casually. After his bratherly remarks, hie asked, \"You saw Mrs. Martin's baby yesterday?\" Upon Sister's affirmative answer, lie said. \"It is much better today., It appears yon gave it some medicine. What was it?\" \"Not medicine, Doctor, but a cordial made frorn a calcined bone, sugar and milk, which my mother used ta give the children at home.\" \"That is it,\" said the doctor reflectively, as if speaking ta hirnself, \"the lime in the banc of course acted ail right. Nothing ta find fault with there.\" Doctar bowed himself away withaut alluding ta prison bars. Even if lie had, Sister would flot have been alarmed, for did flot every Sister of St. Ann feel protection with Dr. Heirncken in the Province? Towards sunset, Sister being relieved frorn duty in the bouse cf rnaurning, retumned ta the Convent. Mother Mary Pravidence accosted lier smilingly with the words, *\"WeIl, Sister, what is this we hear? You are going ta sleep in jail toniglit.\" \"Arn I indeed.\" pleasantly rejoined the hard-worked nun, \"what have I donc now?\" \"You restored a baby ta if e. thaugh you had na doctor's certificate entitlinr, you ta professianal practice. The doctors are going ta have you arrested.\" **If I am, and I have ta go ta jail, you corne tao, because 1 was under your arders in visiting the sick.\" Then they bath laughed, as twa gaod- souled Irish nuns can. Ail the sanie, there had been excitement in M.D. circles that day. Du. Helrncken did the work cf pacification with the Doctors Davie, father and son. No mare was said about the Sister gaing to jail. The baby lived, and its mother neyer ceased ta exait the skill of the Sisters. Page 881",
         "* h c/2 o c,\u003e 'n o , -ýw *e _ ___",
         "A CHAPLET 0F YEARS ST. JOSEPH'S HOSPITAL As time went on the need of a hospital under the management of Sisters was more and more feit. Bishop Seghers had the project greatly at heart, and began substantial operations by contributing six thousand dollars fromn his patrimony., The Sisters were most enthusiastic on the subject and noted every incident bearing upon it. March 27, 1875, their diary contains this entry: \"The first patient for the proposed hospital, a poor paralytic.\" Further on, \"The foundation is laid for Bishop has formed a comrnittee. Mr. Garesche, banker. belongs to it. and is one of the strong advocates of the new enterprise.\" Again. 'Bishop is joyful to see everybody so much in favour of the undertaking.\" It is the ever-recurring -,opic. for we go on reading. \"Doctor Davie, senior, lent us a book dealing with the hospitals of France and England. We have had an hour's reading from it daily for a week.\" \"Centract is given-it calls for $là,9OO (thirteen thousand, rne hundred dollars)e It is exorbitant! Mr. Syme is the architect.\" So far. these entries are very business-like, but we corne to others which quite overwhelm our fastidiousness. The diary continues: \"In preparation for the home manufacture of the hospital mattresses, ail hands are at work pickîng the wool from off sheepskins. Thirty-six were plucked today. Seventy-five still remain to be donc. The work is repugnant to touch and smell. but the motive is proof agrainst this objection.\" This sort of hospital preparation goes on many days. because the diary continues: \"Sixty-five amnong us, including Sisters, orphans. and even boarders. sat courageously before the task of picking two hundred and fifty pounds of wool. while two Sisters made up thc mattresses. Our fun was spoiied by the excessive heat..\" In present-day language. wc would say. \"THAT was surely 'sorne' Red Cross work.\" So cager was St. Ann's for the openi ng of the hospîtal that they began these prernature preparations before tht excavations were started. The corner-stone was laid on August 21. 1875, by Dr. J. S. Helmcken, Memnber of Parliament. Bishop Seghers presented him with the trowel in these eulogistc terms: «*In selecting you, honourable Sir. to lay the comner-stone of this charitable institution, our object is to honour in you Page 901",
         "HITHER AND YON » the friend of the poor. and the humane deliverer af humnan suffering and misery in its rnultiplied formns. More than a rnere allus.on ta your well- known charity would doubtless off end your modesty, but a due apprecia- tion of it is stored up in the minds and hearts of many. On me devolves the welcome honaur of giving ta tliat sulent appreciation1 a public expres- sion, and ta your unremitting benevolence, a grateful and well deserved acknowledgment.\" Then the Bishop makes known the two aims of the hospital under erection-one divine, the other humanitarian. \"Therefore, for the greater glory of God and of His Saints, for the relief of suffering humanity, and in the riame of the heaven-born virtue of charity. 1 have the pleasure of requesting you. assisted by the rnembers of the medical profession. ta lay the foundation stone of St.: joseph's Hospital.\" In the dactor's reply we find these words. which from that time up ta his ninety-third year, were the keynote of his regard for the Sisters: \"As 1 look upon the Church, the Convent, the Hospital, 1 cannot but feel that they are :nstitutions for the cure and education of humanity. from the cradie to the grave. In erecting buildings for such purposes as this, we are placing money out at interest for the good of posterity. ht is a great point in favour of this particular institution that it will be under the care of the Sisters of St Ann, as that will guarantee good nursing, which is of more importance than medicine. This hospital would bc valuable, if only as a school for nurses.\" Finally. on Navember 9, 1875, the hospital is ready for a \"house- warming\" and a bazaar is held. The city had entered into the spirit of the chat itable event. Donations came fromn known and unknown friends. One persan among these latter gave a chair worth two hundred and fifty dollars. But when the days of the great bazaar came, grave fears were entertained that it would be a failure. Not that the sentiment of the citizens had changed. but a great catastrophe had happened and a pal overhung the city. Yhe steamer -Pacific,\" on her way south ta San Francisco. had !:ank saine miles out froin Victoria, and two hundred and seventy-five pe -sons, mostly of the city. were lost. Arnong the victims was the guardian of a littie eight year old orphan.. The man had enttred the child amnong St. Ann's highest paying boarders in june, five rnonth-, before the disaster. With his drowning disappeared ail trace of ten thousknd dollars in gold, which had been left the 1ittle Cgirl by her deceased par1s jPage 91",
         "A CHAPLET 0F YEARS ~1~ Was the guardian on lus way to California to invest the money to greater advantage there, than could have been done in British Columbia, or-who can tell? The sweet, gentle girl. deprived of father, mother and fortune, f ound a home with the Sisters. She left only to be married, and good to say, \"lived happy ever afterwards\". not in the matter of riches but ini the priceless wealth of domnestic happiness. Notwithstanding the general mourning over the great loss of the .\"Pacific,\" the proceeds of the Hospital bazaar amounted ta two thousand three hundred dollars. St. Joseph's Hospital pursued its course with satisfaction ta the doctors and ta the public ail through twenty-two years, without that accessory, an operating room. Indeed, it was looked upon as a great stride towards progress, when provision was made for one bo late down as 1898. Prior ta that tinue, surgical work was performed in any room. If the case was to be serious, the surgeon required the roorn ta be pre- viously white-washed. The word calcimine was not yet in vogue. At the present timne, when surgery, in great measure, rules the day, it is amnusing ta recail the interest which then centred about a major operation. The first case of this kind at St. Joseph's Hospital was that of a sailor called Martin. Synipathy, anxiety, suspense, %vere keyed high, before, during, and after the operation. Martin recovered. After a long convalescence he took his place with ordinary martals, but whers he passed by, people would say, \"Oh, look, there goes the sailor who had that extraordinary operation.\" Such an operation is certainly nat w..usual nowadays. St. Joseph's 11ospital opened with a staff of four Sisters and a handy-man. The present corps consists of a chaplain, two resident doctors, twenty-four Sisters, fifty nurses in training, stewards, etc. The first building, which was only thirty feet wide, now stretches, in the forn of the letter \"H,\" from Collinson Street ta Humboldt. Always the demand is, \"More apartrnents nceded.\" St. joseph'-- has its Hanour Rail of trained nurses at the front. Here, at home, it is privilcged ta place its wvards, rooms and services for the relief of the returned soldiers. Page 92]",
         "IL HITHER AND YON BEYOND VICTORIA Full of the purpose which had brought them to Vancouver Island, the Sisters did flot confine their labours to the population of Victoria. As soon as their numbers made it possible, they were happy to ce- operate in the project of Bishop Demers te open a school for the Indian girls of Cowichan district. The refusai of the House of Assemnbly to grant pecuniary aid for the erection of the school, mereiy served te set more in evidence that the missionary Bishop would go the even tenor of his ways. As one of the honourable members said, \"The Right Rev. Bishop Demers will carry out his object regardless of ail opposition, because it bas originated from ne other or foreign cause, but fromn a pure motive of doit- - - n actual and real good.. In a few months we shall see the Sister's perr.ianently established at Cowichan.\" And so it happened. The school was also for the children of the settiers in the valley- The prospect of a good schooi in their mnidst appeared so great a boon that they ail expressed their willingness te help by se mnany days' work towards the building of the house. Attracted by novelty, the Indian girls flocked to the school to the number of forty. They came te stay. Each carried ber bedding and a pack of fish on her back. The better off had feather beds. the others mats. After evening prayers, each girl mnade herseif comfortable for the night on the school-room floor.. The ciothes worn during the day did duty for a pillow. These Indian girls boardcd themnselves. Wh( -i their pro-isions ran short-and by this is meant fish-they went home te thc ledges for more. Ail went weil for six months. Thon the dusky maids thought they had had eneugb of education and civilization., By degrees they went back te lounge by their smeky fires in the camps, or sun themselves on the beach. Seven years the Sisters kept their doors invitîngiy open for the Indian girls, and by friendly advances, tried te induce themn te attend the school. It was aIl in vain. Subsequent work of the Sisters of St. Ann among the Indians has been done through the Government Schools. St. Mary's Mission on the Fraser was the first boarding school for Indian boys and girls, in which the Sisters were employed. Mission City, on the C.P.R. line, takes its name from that establishment. [Page 93",
         "A CHAPLET 0F YEARS In 1876, three Sisters went to William's Lake, rxear Cariboo. to direct a boarding school for the Indiari and the half-breed girls ini that far and cold part of British Columbia. The Sisters were next requested to share wort. in the Indian Indus- trial School near the Reserve in Kamloops. The third of the Indian Industrial Schools in which the Sisters are engaged, is on Kuper Island, in the Straits of Georgia. The school is famed far and wide for its beautiful ç -e, its modern buildings, and model management. Indian Day Schools have been conducted by the Sisters at the Songhees Reserve in Victoria, and the Quamichan Camp in Cowichan district. Branches of St. Ann's Academy. Victoria, are:. A kindergarten on Blanshard Street, Convent Schools for boarders and day scholars at New Westminster, Kamloops, Nanaimo and, Vancouver-the chief cities in the Province of British Columbia. It also sends its contingent of Sisters to Alaska to conduct schools and hospitals in Juneau and Douglas. The four pioneer Sisters of the back street Cabin Convent had not idled time nor wasted opportunities. Page 91]",
         "LOST OR POUND? Lines in reply to the question:. \"Is there any poetry in Alaska?\" Rhyme and rhythm, rhythm and rhyme, Are thcy lost in this Arctic clime? Ask the stars, as they twinkle bright, Changing darkness of Arctic night, Measure keeping with instinct true.- God's own summons to light the blue. Rhyr'ie and rhythm, rhythm and rhyme, Are they tusi in this Arctic clime? Ask the snows as their diamonds shine Bright as crystal of Afric*s mine, Snows and hoar-frost, bless the Lord, Sing His praises with sweet accord! Rhyme and rhythm, rhythm and rhyme, Are they lost in this Arctic clime? Ask the winds, as the Arctic breeze Sounds the chords upon minior keys. Sighing, sobbing,-a plaintive wail, Over the strctch of the Yukon vale,- Changing swiftly f rom note of dirge Unto the decp of the ocean surge. Rhyme and rhythm, rhythm and rhymne, Are they found in this Arctic clime? Found ini the fal! of the snowflake light. Blessing God wjth its sou! so white,- Found in the chant of the Arctic breeze Making music in minor keys,- Found in the dream of the Vesper-star, Heaven is near-and its gates ajar! Nulato, Alaska. \"MIRIAM.\"",
         "THE PROGRESS OF YEARS GOLDEN JUBILEE SOUVENIR, 1908",
         "PART VI. * THE GOLDEN * CROWNING INNER LIFE WO hundred and ninety-six Sisters have followed in the lead ~ of the four piont er Sisters of St. Ann, who came to British W;Columbia sixty years ago. Their aim has neyer changed. Inpoor or in commodjous establishments, the one pur- pose which each bas had ini mind is the glory of God and the welfare of humanity., The 'reward to, which they aspire is cona!.:ed in the scrip- tural motto of their escutcheon, \"They that shall do and teach shall be called great in the kingdom of heaven.\" Many names which stand for the talent of administration, the art of teaching, and the faculty of joy-giving, are found arnong the builders of St. Ann's in the West. As is apparent throughout these pages. foremost in the construction was Mother M. Providence. Every phase presented by the work of St. Ann's today is ber eulc'gy. As bas been fittingly said of her:, \"Hallowed was the day of hier landing on our shores; blessed the hour wben bier name, as a benediction, first fell upon tbis city. For wbo bas since approacbed ber but to be thereby benefited? Who afflicted, that she did flot console? Dejected. that she did flot comfort? Homne- less, that she did not harbour? She bas been a ricb berit-ige to our land.\" What was the inner life of t1iis truly great woman, who was as a shininpg light to the public? Mother M. Providence witbin ber co,iventual walls, was as rnuch a beacon for ber religious community, as she was a guide for the outside world. She led her Sisters by bier own example of cxceeding punctuality to the minutest observances of hier holy vocation.. The impulsiveness of ber strong spirit was directed by unvarying good judgment. Her dis- cretion was unsurpassed. Tbough she met rnany people, and bad long sittings in the parlour, worldly talk neyer penetrated into the community circle.. If she had heard sometbing exceptionally distressing, the only hint she gave of it was a sigh, and the remark, \"Let us thank God that He has called us into His holy bouse.\" If a visitor began to gossip, she would immediately check the trend by saying, \"You and I are flot here for tbut; let us talk of somnetbing pleasant.\" [Page 97",
         "z, ta t,: N j z z '-s. v - -t * ~ ''",
         "THE GOLDEN CROWNING 1 Mother M. Providence was one of God's holy wornen. who worked for His honour and glory through her every thought, deed, and intention. She depended on Divine support with childlike trust and living faîth. One of the Sisters in Nanaimo had been quite overcome by the immense loss of life in a coal mine explosion. Mother M.. Providence reasoned with her in these beautiful words: \"Do you flot know that tbis is God's world? He takes care of it after His way. flot after ours.\" Her life abounds with incidents of prudence, charity. and motherly care of the Sisters. From 1859 ta hier death in 1904, Mother M.. Providence was provincial superior over St. Ann's in the West. or superior of St. Joseph's Hospital. When she had finished the termn set by the Constitutions at one post, she passed over to the other. In either position she absented herseif no more from the building than if she had been a cloistered nun. In July. 1900. despite bier failing strength, she was again appointcd Superior of St. Joseph's. and was still admirably filling the duties of this office when she was stricken with paralysis. After four days' illness. she went on May 29, 1904. ta give an account to God of the faith in her that had been so productive of good. MOTHER M. ANNE 0F JESUS The Sisters of St. Ann, like other Institutes, bave their constitutions and laws. called rules. an executive body, and defined periods of office tenure. These points may not ail be adaptable in the earlier stages of a foundation. buw they corne into force as soon as conditions permit. Motbcr M. Providence bad been provincial superirr five consecutive terms beyond tbe number fixed by tbe constitutions. before the time was deemed ripe for adhering to the regulation period. But this time came in 1881. and the second provincial was appointed.. Tbe choice fell on Sister M. Anne of jesus, who so far had been on the teaching staff. Against tbe ripened age of ber predecessor. she could offer only the inexperience of ber twenty-six years. The contrast in external advantages was equally great. But here the difference ended. Neyer were two souls, two minds. more identical. Neyer was friendship more Ioveiy ta look upon. Admiration on the part of tbe senior pro- vincial. reverence on the part of the younger: and on botb sides. a mnutual leaning on the superior ability of the other. It was the harmony of heaven. [page 99",
         "I kl_ A CHAPLET 0F YEARS For twenty ycars they altei-nated in the office of provincial buperior of the British Columbia and Alaska branch houses, and that of superior of -St. Jaseph's Hospital. The younger was the first ta go ta her etemnal reward. Mother M. Anne of Jesus' motta was, \"Ail the pleasure for others, the pain for myseif.\" There are many who can testify that these words with her were flot mere formula. She specia!ized in giving pleasant sur- prises. To give but ane instance. Whcn she was Superior at the Hospital she used ta shine the boots for the old men, and then be brightly puzzlcd with themn as ta who could have donc it so secretly. It would be too long ta tell her qualifications as educator, as religiaus, and as provincial, for- The \"valiant wamnan\" sung in prov\u003crb's tome Was faund in ber, whose evMr deed and care Was sanctificd by purest intoent formed, The warp of duty, silver-waofed with prayer. But Mother M. Anne of Jesus' devotion ta St. joseph, as illustrated in the following occurrence, is too intcresting ta be passed aver. Her confidence in hilm was absolute. To him she cntrusted ail ber business affairs, and wben she had ta go anywherc, she timed the trip so as ta lcave on a Wednesday., On anc occasion St. joseph gave her proof that he can make conductors serve bis purpose. ST. JOSEPH CONTROLS THE E. \u0026 N. RAILWAY In the spring of 1887, Mother M. Anne cf Jesus %vas duc in Nanaimo on important business. As usual she arrangcd ta leave on Wednesday. To afford a much needed outing ta Sister M. Sacred Heart a hospital Sister closely wedded ta ber work, Mother Provincial invited her as a travelling companion. The E. \u0026 N. Railway bad recently been open ta traffic. but it was flot yet connected witb Victoria. The draw-bnidge off tbe present Vic- toria station, which spans the arm of the Gorge and is tbe southern terminus of the line, was flot yct finishcd. Consequently, up to 1888. city passengers were obliged ta go further, and cross ta Point Ellice bridge to rnake connections with thc train at Russell station. The distance from the Academny was about two miles. Sister M. Sacred Heart was too advanced in years ta walk it, so a hack was engaged for the early morning. But when the trne came, the conveyance did net Page 1001",
         "THE GOLDEN CROWNING appear. Five minutes, ten minutes, and stili no slgn of the hack. There were no telephenes nor automobiles ini those days. The two travellers became restiess; the Sisters, who had gathered on the porch to sec themn off, began to say, **You may as well give up the thought of going today. for you wiii sureiy miss the train.\" Mother M. Anne of Jesus only said, \"St. joseph wili sec that the train wajts for us.\" After dciaying a littie longer, as the hack was not yet in sight. Mother Provincial said, -Let us start, for 1 amn sure we shall soon meet the driver, and then, I beg you to believe. hie wili make his horses fly.\" The Sisters who surrounded hier were flot se hopeful. Again they urged, saying, \"Do corne in, you can go tomorrow. It is eut cf the question that yeu catch the train today.\" The Mother provincials repiy was, -Corne, Sister M. Sacred Heart, we wili be in Nanaimo today. if St. joseph has to hold the train for us.\" Sister M. Sacred Heart was seventy years aid, and flot any tee sprightiy as one may believe, but she was too, respectful to demur, so she hurried after Mother. The Sisters looked at thern tîli they were out of sight. hoping. but in vain, that a conveyance of saine sort would pass by, so as te be haiied by the Sisters who were quickly speeding aloflg. On and on wcnt Mother, saying alternatcly to St. joseph, -HoId that train for us,\" and te her poor panting companion, \"Corne, Sister, we'Ul get there. St. joseph wiil see us through.\" Every once in a while Sister M. Sacred Hcart would say. -You sec, Mother, it is no use going on, sec how far we are frein the station. and there is flot a cab or cart of any kind te be scen.\" But Mother would say ail the more brightly. -Cerne on; St. joseph will get us there.\" As Mother said later on, she neyer for a moment thought when they left the Convent that they would walk ail that distance. She expected every instant and at every corner, that a hack would turn up; but there was not one on the road that merning. for as was afterwards learned, they had ail been hired for a bail some great distance away.. Panting and hurrying. and with ejaculatiens te St. joseph, the Sisters kepi. on. and at last were in sight of the station. Yes, the train was there, thrce blocks away-they covered one biock-.-and then. oh. for [Page 101",
         "A CHAPLET 0F YEARS disappointrnent! The whistle blew, the bell rang, and the train obediently stearned out, gaining speed with every puif. Like a mighty giant, it seerned to defy the companion nuns two blocks away. Dismayed, Sister M. Sacred Heart stood stock stili on the sidewalk, and said reproachfully, \"You see, Mother, how useless it was to corne on; the train has gone.\" 'Never tmiid,\" said Mother cheerfuliy, without slackening pace, \"hurry along, it will corne back for us. St. joseph will taire us to Nanaimo today.\" She continued to walk rapidly on for a minute or so, when, would you believe it-the train came back. It began to move backwards, and backwards towards the station, and slowing up, stopped at the platforrn. \"Quick, quick,\" said Mother, \"the train has corne back for us.\" The two Sisters fairly ran. Tbey reached the train and had barely boarded it, when it was off again. When they were in their seats, the Mother Provincial said to her cornpanion, \"Did 1 flot say ail along that St. joseph would see us through, though we did run through town like John Gilpin?\" Mother always had a keeri sense of tht ludicreus, and she evtr after enjoyed comnparing ber race to Russell station v-ith that of Cowpcr's hero, John Gilpin, through London town. Although the confident Mother knew that St. joseph had brought the train back for her accommnodatio\u003en, she was too practical flot te know likewise tIva there was some natural cause for the immediate return te tht station of a moving train. She soon got the explanatic'n. The con- ductor had forgotten his clearance papers and bis ticket-bock-an unheard of thing-and the train carne back that he might ge~ theni. It is mrore than probable that Conductor Black repropched himself for his forgetfulriess that day, with never a suspicion that St. 'oseph, looking screnely down fro.n heaven, alone was responsible. Neither did the good conductor lay the disturbance to the pertinacity of the two nuns, who demurely paid bim their fart. Meanwbilc they went on rejoic-ing within tbemnselves that they had compelled St. joseph to send the E. \u0026 N. train back for theni. Page 1021",
         "THE GOLDEN CROWNING AN IDEAL TEACHER The central figure in St. Ann's corps of teachers was Sibter M.. Lorctto. She was born at Lacolle, P.Q., and came to Victoria in 1882, being then in her twentieth year. A brow of superior intellect displayed her nch endowments. Sistei M. Loretto was one of Nature's noblest women;' affable and generous, a deep student, and refined scholar. To hier learning was added a charmn of manner, a subtle attraction in conversation, by which those who came under hier influence always experienced pleasure and profit. Combined with hier rare gifts and talents was a deep-rojoted humility. which caused bier at all times ta regard herseif as \"the feeble handmaid of the Lord.\" Though hier attainiments and participation in the government of the Sisterhood raised bier ta an elevated plane, love of paverty and docility to the slightest wish of bier superior. were ber distinctive traits. According ta human views, so valuable a career should have been prolonged inta the years, but Sister M. Loretto was stilli n hier prime, having taught twenty-two years and been Superior three, when the Divine Master called hier to the reward promised those who leave father and niother, homne and country for His sake. MOTHER M. GUARDIAN ANGEL Six provincial superiors have guided the destinies of St. Ann's Insti- tute in the West. 0f these, four are living. Mother M. Guardian Angel. knawn as the \"gracious French lady,\"* was the tbird provincial. Sbe came ta British Calumnbia in 1901, on the campletian of a second terrn in the onerous charge of Superiar General, witb beadquarters in che Motber House, at Lachine, P.Q. Sa esteemed is bier wortb as a gentle and efficient ruler that forty- nine years. out afilber fifty-one in religiaus life, have been spent as Superior in the mast important Canvents of St. Ann's Institute. MOTHER M. DES CINQ PLAIES The fourth provincial superior was Mather M. des Cinq Plaies, an energetic wornan, full af initiative, and prompt in executian. The period af ber succeP3sfui adniinistratian-1908-1914-was marked by the erectian of new Convents in Kamloops and Nanaima. and by considerable extensions ta St. Ann's Academy in Victoria, and the Convent in New Westminster. [Page 103",
         "A CHAPLET 0F YEARS MOTHER M. CHARLES Miss Cecilia McQuade, in religion Sister M. Charles, came ta her Aima Mater ta be its fifth provincial superior. She was the first Victoria young lady ta join the Sisters of St. Ann. In 1866, with hier sister, Miss Anna (Sister M. Agnes), she made the long voyage, via Panama, to Lachine that she might there make her novitiate. Twenty years later, they bath paid a visit ta their Western home, and while there, they had the sad consolation of seeing their mother laid in âer last resting place. Owing ta il-health, Mother M. Charles could continue in office only ane.termn. Her cautious management suited war-time conditions. She was succeeded, in 1917, by Mother M. Philip, who, after having skilfully directed variaus houses in the East, is now in office. BEARING THE HEAT AND THE BURDEN 0F THE DAY There are in active service several Sigters who have borne the heat and the burden of the day, during forty years and more. Sister M. Bridget camne ta Victoria in 1866, and has neyer ceased ta pour out the treasures of hier golden heart on the young, the sicl, the wayfarer. Sister M. Lucy was of the saine pax-ty. The domnestic training which she inculcated in the girls when Directress of boarders, has made her narne a household word. She taught music ail adown the years. Sister M. Zenon, the p7ogressive organizer of St. Ann's schools and hospitals in Alaska; Sister M. Catherine of Sienna, whose career, divided bctween the piano and an accountant's desk, demonstrates that art and mathematics are quite compatible; Sister M. Infant jesus, who admirahly blends teaching with the government of local establish- ments; Sister M. Albert, ta whorn clings the office of infirmari an, whether she is at the Academny or at an inrian Industrial school. Sister M. Octavia, who almost as soon as she had pronounced her vows, buried ber Teacher's Diploma in a dark recess, and forgetting ail about it, took up the occupation of convent coak. Ye girls of St. Ann's. formn in line for the procession, which opens at \"1876\" and, swelling along its course, pauses at \"1918.,, Camne into the Academy kitchen. You will there see Sister M. Octavia. Make known your wants, real or imaginary, as you did of yore, and you will find ber ever and always dispensing delectables ta each and all. with the solicitous attention of a tnother for an only childI. Page 104]",
         "X THE GOLDEN CROWNING W Sister M. Octavia is the best French writer among the Sisters of St. Ann in the West. Of ten she is called upon for an article., She will flot let this delay the meals of her family of ninety or a hundred. There lies a piece of wrapping paper lef t by the butcher; a stubby lead pencil is found. Sister goes from the pantry ta the pots on the stove, then she jots lines an the brown paper. The fire needs poking, and the stew needs stirring; she sees ta that, and adds ta ber lines on the brown paper. Sa with cooking the dinner, and answering calls at the wickets, she writes a production which baffles competition. Sister M. Octavia is anothler of thosc Sisters whose theory Icans taward holidays, but not holidays for herseif. Logic falis flat when she lays down the argument !or letting the \"Chinese help\" off for the day. TEE GOLDEN JUBILEE With the ca-operation of Sisters of such calibre, the goad and able Superiors of St. Ann's were able ta conduct the Academy steadily onward ta its fiftieth milestone. This was reached in june. 1908, and the event was made the occasion of a three days' jubilee celebration. In accord with the words in Leviticus, -Ye shall sanctify the fiftieth year. Ye shall cause the trumpets of jubilee ta sound, for it is the year af jubilee,\" the Sisters, the pupils, and the city at large entered inta the spirit of festivity. Everything proclairned joy. On the grounds, flags floated evcry.. where. The mnen from the British man-of-war, 'Shearwater\" (Admirai Bickford) of the Imperial Navy, spent a week hanging the avenue with row upon row of the Riags of ail nations, which harnionious union of flags is the highest compliment. we are tald, that can bt paid ta an insti- tution. The avenue from the gate ta the entrance was imposing, and the effect of light and colar, gorgeaus. The superb illuminations an the grounds and facade were the tribute af the Corporation. The doors were thrown wide open and streams of people promen- aded the grounds, the Convent corridors, and the whole building. Al the apartments were hung with garlands, streamners, synxbolic chains, mottoes, a-id \"50's.\" The public came and went with cordiality and an -at home\" feeling, which praved the friendly relations existing between the Sistect. of St. Ann and the people cf Victoria. LrPage 105",
         "IWIA CHAPLET 0F YEARS The exercises of the first day consisted of a commeniorative pro- gramme. The numbers comprised niusic-Slavischc Tanze (Brahms), Invitation a la Valse (Weber), chorus,-\"Golden Beils of jubilee\" (Kuecken), 'Crowning of Aima Mater\" (Chaminade), a poem-\"The Record of Fifty Years,\" a dramna-tableau--A Scene ini the Life of St. Ann,\" addresses by Very Rev. A. J. Brabant, D.D., and A. E. McPbillips, IC.C., M.P.P. A reception of friends pleasantly occupied the second day. Three hundred persans were present, and one hundred former pupils registered. The third day was given ta solemn thanksgiving exercises. Amnong numerous marks of favour bestowcd on St. Ann's Academy was the loan, for decorative purposes, of immense shields of the Irzov- inces, made for Sir Wilfrid Laurier's visit. They were lent, as no small honour, by the Provincial Government. A service, to be ail the more appreciated that it was done withauxt asi -ntation, and its intrinsic value unknown, was that of Mr. H. D. }belmcken, who went bond for the flags of the \"Shearwater,\" and took out an insurance on the sanie. Mr. Kent, Victoria's fine singer, sang \"The Flight of Ages,\" in comnpliment ta his mother, who had sung it at the opening of the Hum- boldt Street Convent, in 1871, and who was present at this Jubilee, 1908. St. Ann's Academy received new inipetus f romn the survey of what had been accomplished in its first half-century. Rejuvenated, it entered upon a new era, confident that in the future, as in the past, the Lord would be niindful of thase who place their trust in Hini. Ten years have passed since the Golden jubilee--years of blessings. On this, its sixtieth anniversary, St. Ann's Academy uplifts its horn of plenty, offcring thanks for the fair harvest which it hath pleased God ta yield on the tiny seed cast in Victoria by the SISTERS 0F ST. ANN Page 106]",
         "p y .1 ~",
         "ALMA MATER'S RETROSPECT Enibowered in her graves of purest gret-i. Her rev'rent brow aglow with jay and pride, Stands ALMA MATER,-noblc mather she,- And views ber children far dispersed and wide. In retraspect she scans the decades pact,- Six gloriaus chapters in her book of years- Each ane a poem.-each an epic grand- Each consccratcd with bath joy and tears. From distant East she sees how cali divine Hath drawn a noble band of women truc, To work for Gad and souls 'neath Western surn, Devoting life and strength each day arnew. She views the prompt response of ready minds Who cager were ta fit themselves for life, And learning at ber shrine the lessons deep, Went farth, strong in ber strength, to meet the strife. Where are they now-those girls of yesteryears? Full-grawn they entered Life's Arena vast, Prepared ta brave the sting of Sarraw's dart, Upheld throughaut by mern'ries of the past. Same few there were who laid life*s burdens down Ere yet thear brows were furrowed with a care; And some there were wha trod the lofty mounit And pledged themselves ta God in endlesý prayer., The many !eft ber sheltering .îrms, and found Anather haven, loving and secure, The -queens of hame\"-ennobling motherhood- Who spread abroad an influence sweet and pure. Some, too, have learned the preciaus art ta heal And cornfort he!plcss, suffering, wounded man,- And overseas where waves of battie surge, Are fornd foul oft th--se children of \"St. Ann.\" Yea, reverently we raîse her \"service flag' And drape it prcudly, gcntly, o'er the dead, For some have paid the sacrifice supreme, And for their country *heir young life-blood shed. And others spend their days in leading youtb. Thro' paths af knawledge, teaching useful lare; While some wield skilfully the artist's brush, Or far alait on Music's pinions soar. Another noble army stîli she scans. The dauntless daughtcrs she sa well bath trained, To take their rank uplifting toil thereby, These students which commiercial life bath gained. AUl honour ta them,-Girls of former days! Who love ta live througl, reminiscent haurs, And pledging loyalty and trust anew, Stl linger aft in spirit 'neath these bovers. Our Mother hath a message too for us, The girls af nineteen eight-en, as we staî.-l Upon Life's thrashold, waiting for the word To speed us forth fram her protectîng hancl. \"No toil is base when duty points the wayz \"No fame is true if flot inspired by worth;, \"No happiness can ever long endure \"Unless it seeks a H-eaven beyond this earth!\" Victoria, B.C.",
         "C 0- PART l., A CHAPLET 0F YEARS Page Origin of the Sistez s of St.. Ann .7 Training for the Sisterhoeid 10 First Fruit.... ..... 10 Marie Esther, the Fouridress il Two Priceless Gifts . .:....14 Our Aima Mater's jubilee (Poemn) 17 PART Il. THE CALL TO VICTORIA, The Voyage t... ...1 The Cabin Convent .. .... Sixty Ycars Ago (Poem) Healing by Faith.. j.... Sowing and Reaping. The Marble Heart..... The Rescued Child..... The Work of Faith (Poem) PART Ill. HAPPY TIMES B.C. *20 25 27 28 *29 40 42 Then and Now ....... Hallowed Because of Hîis Mother Typical Life at St. Ann's .... Examination Day...... An Odd Rernedy....... A Midnight Supper...... Midnight Mass at St. Ann's (Pocm) PART IV. RF.D LETTER DAYS Frorm the Old to the New. From View Street to Beacon Hill. 1867 . . . . . . . . . . Page A Royal Visitor........65 Vice-Regal Visit . . 67 The Duke of Devonshire at St. Anns............71 H-onour to Whom Honour is Due 73 At Cana in Galilee (Pocen) ...75 PART V. HITHER AND YON St Ann's Academy and the Orphans ... .........77 Kidnapped in Hong Kong . 78 Marooned at Five.........2 Boys Protectorate.......84 St. Ann's School for the Coloured 85 Sister M. Conception Narrowly Escapes Jail........ 86 St. Joseph's Hospital. ......90 Beyond Victoria........93 Lost or Found (Poemn) .. 95 PART VI. THE GOLDEN CROWNING lIner Life .,. e..,.:.ý..97 Muther M. Anne of jesus ... 99 St. joseph Controls the E. \u0026 N. Railway..........100 An Ideal Teacier....... 103 Mother M. Guardian Angel .103 Mother M. Des Cinq Plaies .103 Mother M. Charles .. .....104 Bearing the Heat and the Burden of the Day . . .. .,104 The Golden jubîlce.......105 Aima Mater's Retroý,pect (Poem) 108 ILLUSTRATIONS page Frontispiece, St. Ann, Patroness of the Acadeny ..ý........1 Rt. Rev. Modeste Demers ,18 The Convert Jewess .......30 Girls on the Playground . 3 Academy Chapel....... 46 Sister Mary Loretto . .47 Archbishop Seghers . .64 Page Nucleus of St. Ann's Academy. 1871..............63 St. Ann's Academy........76 St. Joseph's Hospital . .89 The Progress of Ycars . ..96 Mothe-r Mary Providence .. 98 Mother Mary Anne of Jesus ..98 Pupils of St. Ann's Academy, jurie, 1918 .... ......107 I ~ \"Y.",
         "CoLoNLsr PIFINrNCÇ ^NID PUER ISHINC. CO -VI :TOi? BJ C"
      ],
      "type" : "document",
      "title" : [
         "A chaplet of years : St. Ann's Academy : to the pupils past and present of the Sisters of St. Ann, Victoria, B.C., 1858-1918."
      ],
      "subject" : [
         "Sisters of Saint Anne -- British Columbia -- Victoria -- History.",
         "Soeurs de Sainte-Anne -- Colombie-Britannique -- Victoria -- Histoire.",
         "Monasticism and religious orders for women -- British Columbia -- Victoria.",
         "Monachisme et ordres religieux féminins -- Colombie-Britannique -- Victoria."
      ]
   },
   "version" : "0.4"
}
{
   "doc" : {
      "contributor" : "oocihm",
      "location" : "http://eco.canadiana.ca/view/oocihm.77347",
      "label" : "The money master",
      "key" : "oocihm.77347",
      "media" : [
         "text"
      ],
      "creator" : [
         "Parker, Gilbert, 1862-1932."
      ],
      "lang" : [
         "eng"
      ],
      "published" : [
         "Toronto : Copp, Clark, c1915."
      ],
      "note" : [
         "5 microfiches (207 fr.) : ill.",
         "Novel.",
         "359, [1] p., [8] leaves of plates : ill. ; 20 cm."
      ],
      "text" : [
         "CIHM Microfiche Series (i\\/lonographs) ICIVIH Collection de microfiches (monographies) m\\ Camdian InttituM for Hittorical Microraproductiom / Inttitut Canadian da microraproductioni hiatoriquat",
         "1995 Technical and Bibliographic Notes / Notes technique et bibliographiques The Institute has attempted to obtain the best original copy available for filnnlng. Features of this copy which may be bibliographically unique, which may alter any of the images in the reproduction, or which may significantly change the usual method of filming are checked below. ^ D D D D Coloured covers / Couverture de couleur I I Covers damaged / ' — ' Couverture endommagee I I Covers restored and/or laminated / ' — ' Couverture restauree et/ou pellicula I I Cover title missing / Le titre de couverture marique I I Coloured maps / Cartes geographiques en couleur r/i Coloured ink (i.e. other than blue or black) / — Encre de couleur (i.e. autre que bleue ou noire) FT] Coloured plates and/or illustrations / ^^^ Planches et/ou illustrations en couleur I I Bound with other material / ' — ' Relie avec d'autres documents Only edition available / Seule edition disponible Tight binding may cause shadows or distortion along interior margin / La reliure serree peut causer de I'ombre ou de la distorsion le long de la marge interieure. Blank leaves added dunng restorations may appear within the text. Whenever possible, these have been omitted from filming / II se peut que certaines pages blanches ajout^s lors d'une restauratjon apparaissent dans le texte, mais, lorsque cela etait possible, ces pages n'ont pas ete film^es. Addhiona] comments / Commentaires suppl^mentaires: L'Institut a microfilm^ le meilleur examplaire qu'il lui a ete possible de se procurer. Les details de cet exem- plaire qui sont peut-Stre uniques du point de vue bibli- ographique, qui peuvent modifier une image reproduite, ou qui peuvent exiger une modifications dans la meth- ode normale de filmage sont indiques ci-dessous. I I Coloured pages / Pages de couleur I j Pages damaged / Pages endommagees I I Pages restored and/or laminated / — ' Pages reslaurees et/ou pelliculies 0 Pages discoloured, stained or foxed / Pages decolorees, tachetees ou piquees I I Pages detached / Pages detachees r~7 Showthrough / Transparence I I Quality of print varies / I — I Quality inhale de I'impression I I Includes supplementary material / — Comprend du materiel suppl^mentaire j I Pages wholly or partially obscured by errata slips, tissues, etc., have been refilmed to ensure the best possible image / Les pages totalement ou partiellement obscurcies par un feuillet d'errata, une pelure, etc., ont iti filmdes a nouveau de fa;on i obtenir la meilleure image possible. I I Opposing pages with varying colouration or ' — ' discolourations are filmed twice to ensure the best possible image / Les pages s'opposant ayant des colorations variatiles ou des decol-orations sont filmees deux fois afin d'obtenir la meilleur image possible. This ittm is filmed at th« rtduction ratio diickMj bttow/ Ceda 10X cumtf It est fiimi •uut 14X •«de tMue tton indiqui ci-dcssous 18X 22X 2«X »X J 12X 16X 20X 24 X 28 X 32",
         "X Tha copy fllmtd h«r* hat b««n raproducad thanki to tha ganarosity of: National Library of Canada L'axacnplaira film* fut raproduit griea i la gAntroiit* da: Blbllothequa natlonale du Ciuuida Tha imagaa appaaring hara ara tha bait quality poaaibia eonaidaring tha condition and lagibility of tha original copy and in kaaping with tha filming eenwaet apacificationa. Laa imaga* suivantai ont iti raproduitat avac la plua grand lOin, compta tanu da la condition at da la nattafA da I'axamplaira film*, at an conformiM avac laa condition* du contrat da fllmaga. Original copiaa in printad papar covara ara fllmad baginning with tha front covar and anding on tha laat paga with a printad or illuatratad impraa- aion, or tha bacit covar whan appropriata. All othar original copiaa ara filmad baginning on th* firat paga with a printad or illuatratad impraa- aion, and anding on tha laat paga with a printad or illuatratad impraaaion. Tha laat racordad frama on aach microficha ihall contain tha lymbol -^ I moaning \"CON-TINUED\"), or tha symbol ▼ Imaaning 'END\"), whiehavar appliaa. Mapa, plataa. charts, ate, may ba filmad at diffarant raduction ratios. Thosa too larga to ba antiraly includad in ona axposura ara filmad baginning in tha uppar lafi hand cornar, laft to right and top to bottom, as many framas a* raquirad. Tha following diagrams illustrata tha mathod: Laa axamplairaa originaux dont la couvortura an papiar aat ImprimAa sent filmts an commancant par la pramiar plat at an tarminant soit par la darniira paga qui comporta una amprainta d'impraaslon ou d'illustration, soit par la sacond plat, salon la eas. Toua laa autras axamplairas originauii sont fllmta an commandant par Is prsmiAra paga qui comporta una amprainta d'imprassion ou d'illustration at an tarminant par la darnitra paga qui comporta una talla amprainta. Un daa aymbolaa suivants apparaitra sur la darnitra imaga da chaqua microficha. salon la caa: la symbola —^ aignifia \"A SUIVRE\". la symbols ▼ signifia \"FIN\". Laa eanaa. planchaa, tablaaux. ate. pauvant atra filmta t das taux da reduction diff*rants. Lorsqua la documant aat trop grand pour atra raproduit an un saul clich*. il ast film* * partir da I'angla sup*riaur gaucha. da gauchs i droits, at da haul an baa, an pranant la nombra d'imagaa n*cassaira. Laa diagrammaa suivants illustrant la mMhoda. 1 2 3 1 2 3 4 5",
         "6 MICTOCOrr HSOIUTION TBI CHA«T (ANSI and ISO TEST CHART No. 2) ^ APPLIED \\t\\MC3E In '653 East Main Stre Rochester. Net* York (716) 462 - 0300 -- (716) 288-5989",
         "-Ft ^m ^^^^^^B ^w Hffi^H^H iTi n'^AvVlk^B wit ■'' ^H' 1 Wj^ m jmMM m\u0026 Wm",
         "LKER THE MONEY",
         "MASTER BOOKS BY GILBERT PARKER PUBLISHKII HY THK COPP, CLARK COMPANY, LIMITKD THK MOVEY MASTEH. Ilhi,tr.t«l ,^I?«v'?.V.'*\"*'«='''T HOUSE. lllu,tr.U.-.l CUMNKKM SON. lllimtratwl NOIITIIKIIN UQBTS. Illu.lrat«J THK WEAVKItS. IlhiHtraliHi THK moHT OF WAY. Illurtnitod A LADDER OP HWORD* Ill,i«lmt«J THE LANK THAT HAD NO TURNINO THE BATTLE OF THE STRONO. IIIu»trat«d PIERRE AND HIS PEOPLE A ROMANY OF THK SNOWS WHEN VALMOND CAMB TO I-ONTIAO MRS. FALCHION THE TRESPASSER THK TRANSLATION OF A SAVAGE THE TRAIL 01 THE SWORD. Illii.lmtert THK SKATS OF THK MIGHTY. Illu.lmt.»I DONOVAN PASHA OLD gUKBKC. (In oolUboratlon wllh C. G.",
         "Bry«n) ISif piigf .IS THE ISIAL PKOCKSS OF ROMANCK HAD BEEN HKVKK.SK[\u003e— HE HAD NOT SAVED HER LIFE, BUT SHE HAD SAVED",
         "HIS THE MONEY MASTER BEING THE CURIOUS HISTORY OF JEAN JACQUES BARBILLE, HIS LABOURS HIS LOVES AND HIS LADIES BY GILBERT PARKER „ AUTHOR or THB SKAIS or THB MIGHTV\" \"THK BIGHT OF WAY\" 'THB JUDGMENT BOUSB\" btc. ILLUSTRATED BY ANDR^ CASTAIGNB THE COPP, CLARK CO., LIMITED",
         "TORONTO 145155 PS?h2| Asi M(f Coprright, CuAda, 1916, by Gilbut Pareme. The Copp, Clark",
         "Prtt$. CHAP. I. ir. III. IV. V. VI. VII. VIII. IX. X. XI. XII. XIII. XIV. XV. XVI. XVII. XVIII, XIX. XX. XXI. XXII. XXIII. XXIV. XXV. CONTENTS The Gkand Tour OF Jean Jacques Bahbh-lb . . '\"\"' \"The Rest of the Story To-morrow\" .... jj \"To-morrow\" . . . 33 Thirteen Years After and the Clerk of the Court Tells a Story The Clerk of the Court Ends His Story . . 57 Jean Jacques Had Had a Great Day .... 7, Jean Jacques Awakes from Sleep gg The Gate In the Wall \"Moi— Je Suis Philosophe\" \"QuiEN Sabe\"— Who Knows! ,,g The Clerk of the Court Keeps a Promise . . no The Master-carpenter Has a Problem ... 139 The Man from Outside \"I Do Not Want to Go\" ...... '''' Bon Marche af Misfortunes Come Not Singly His Greatest Asset • • 09 Jean Jacques Has an Offer ' ^ Sebastian Dolores Does Not Sleep .... , ^ \"Au 'Voir, M'siEu' Jean Jacques\" . . . . . xla If She Had Known In Time Bells of Memory Jean Jacques Has Work to Do ... . Jean Jacques Encamped a What Would You Have Done? . Tr Epilogue ... *^",
         "355 TO P. M. AND D. M. IN THEIR HOME BETWEEN THE MOUNTAINS AND THE",
         "SEA ILLUSTRATIONS The Usual Process or Romance Had Been Re-versed—He Had Not Saved Her Life, But She Had Saved H.S ,,^^ He Admired, Yet He Wished to Be Admired; He Simply Wanted People to Say, \"Here Comes Jean Jacques BARBiLLb\" ^^^^^ g \"Moi—JeSuisM'sieu' Jean Jacques, Philosophe\" \" 44 \"To-morrow Evening, By the Flume— Come. I Want to Speak with You. Will You Come?\" He Whispered ,, At the Sight of the Cock of Beaugard, Upright IN THE Ruins, Jean Jacques' Head Went Up. Too. \"I Will Build the Mill Again\" ...\" j-q \"Stand Back. I Won't Have My Child Dis- turbed\" ...",
         "342 EPOCH THE",
         "FIRST THE MONEY MASTER CHAPTER I THE GRAND TOUR OF JEAN JACQUES BARBILLE \"DEACE and plenty, peace and plenty \"-that Jl,» \",'''\" P*\"\"\"^^ ^- J^^n Jacques Barbille mUler and money-master, applied to h^ homeLene' when he was at the height of his career. BoTh S and sm.mer the place had a lock of contenTand hkf a LTf 't ^\"\"^ °' ^P\"'^\"'^^- There is nothing winf« ^T \"^ -P'\"^\" '° 2i^^ ^ sense of waimth in slightest breeze make the pine-needles swish Uke the ?f?enT r-,, ^\"' '.° ^^^ ^^\"«- ^he- pini made ^nH V u^ back-ground, there were added oak, ash and hickory trees, though in less quantity on th; sMe and Lr' T^r r^-^f \" J\"'^^\"^^ Barbille-s hous^ sTdt ^L n'^ nT\"'^.\"'^ '^''^y °\" the opposite th^m^~\"°'^u'^''*' ^ ™^' \"°^ ^lently away through long reaches of country. Here the land was -gged and bold while fartheTon it ^e gen'l and spacious, and was flecked or striped with farms",
         "3 The Money Master on which low, white houses with dormer-windows and b,g stoops flashed to the passer-by the message A ..^Tf '■• ^^' '^ '\"'\"=• I triumph.\" ^ At the Manor Cartier. not far from the town of V.lray where Jean Jaeques was master, and Zve?t and below ,t, there had been battles and the ra™ of war. At the time of the Conquest thestubbo™ h-buants refusing to accept the yielding of Que^ as the end of French power in their proud province had remained in arms and active, and had onTv yielded when the musket and the torch had done theX work, and smoking ruins marked the places wS homes had been. They took their fortune S something of the heroic calm of men to whom an 7dea grandfather, a. d great-great-grandfather had lived here, no one of them rising far, but none worthless or unno iceablc. They all had had \"a way of their own as their neighbours said, and had been p ov ' dent on the whole. Thus it was that when Jeln Jaeques father died, and he came into his own he found himself at thirty a man of substance un! Snt .\"'th- '\"\"\"^ T^ '^^'^ '\"\"^ P-k of the province. This was what the Old Cur6 said in sibfthin H-^'\"\" ^■^^T' ^''^ *»^« incomprehen i cie\" ^;i,^\", .'\"^\"'\"'^ i'£^Pag«.fe, or \"the Span- ^^Z '^u ^^T^ '^ \"^^^ spring-time, and aU the sTn H J ^\"'^'^'\"g;, ^''\"ding joy and hope, with the sun dancing over all. It was the time between the sowing and the hay-time, and there was aTeeling",
         "4 ^Tf^nd tour of Jean Jacques Barbillc of alertness in everything that had life, w\u003e ile even the rocks and solid earth seemed to stir. The air was fill. ,i with the long happy drone of the mill-stone: as they ground the grain; and from farther away came the soft, stinging cry of a saw-mill. Its keen buzzing complaint was harmonious with the grumble of the mill-stones, as though a supreme maker of music had tuned it. So said a master- musician and his friend, a philosopher from Nantes, who came to St. Saviour's in the summer just before the marriage, and lodged with Jean Jacques. Jean Jacques, having spent a year at Laval Uni-versity at Quebec, had almost a gift of thought, or thinking: and he never ceased to ply the visiting philosopher and musician with questions which he proceeded to answer himself before they could do so; his quaint, sentimental, meretricious observa-tions on hfe saddening while they amused his guests, rhey saddened the musician more than the other because he knew life, while the philosopher only thought it and saw it. But even the musician would probably have smiled in hope that day when the young \"Spanische\" came dnving up the nver-road from the steamboat-land-ing miles away. She arrived just when the clock struck noon in the big living-room of the Manor. As she reached the open doorway and the wide win-dows of the house which gaped with shady coolness, she heard the bell summoning the wo-'-rs in the mills and on the farm— yes, M. Barb .- a farm er, too—for the welcome home to ' .leu' Jean Jacques.\" as he was called by everyone.",
         "S The Money Master almost a scandal' anH ^»,r- f ■ * '^P'^ch and It was bad enot^^h to nlSl^e S^\"' T^*\"°*- many outside one's own Sh and'^\"^'''. *'\"' *° arish and its younrS of Thl '^\"J?\"^*' **'*' which a wedding and thTroL ! ^^''^^ ««'^'y- tour through the parish hw^^\"'\"* Procession and treason. But\\te ?wa, fndTa'''f '\"^ '\"\"'^ a man who had power to hurt^o v J^ •^''^''\"^' \"^^^ good thing X^tLn *\"^ °*''''' ^\"'^ ^^^dit is a aTabroal^TlVwe'ddTnginGTS:\"' Tk' ^''\"^^ tended by the usual f, nl\" ^^^P^''?'! \"ot been at- hurriediy^aSnged as th' • ^°' '' ^^^ «\" ^een of the wooiTfeq'irTd RomT'\"' r\".'\"^'^\"'=^^ so remarkable that th^m=.\"^•^'\"'^^^^ '' ^^as; have found a^EltrTcfm'ednrt \"''^Ij' ^^^''^ the philosopher would have 3^1- \"^^'^^^^'''^ defiance it offered totht^j^^fotrhin'S '' \"^ Of St^-'S turl'uTmrf H^' ^':r\"^\"\" ^'\"^^^^'^^H niany legends hanrinrtovJl^'^ ^^^°'^'^ ^\"^ has Even the Cu 6 of t?dal 1 ' 'r^'^ '\"^ ^ ^\"\"-^^i\"- truth, findsU hSd to^^' ''*°.°V«'\u003et to know all the for the hSoA. of Te° T'\"' ''4\" ''' ^^'^ ^'^'\"^nts.- history SSyl S iTsa '^'\"'^ ^^^^^'^ '»\u003e« befel him. whether of p\"h ^™^^'- «\"d all that parish in a th^tlnd inlTsfblTtrreadr '^'^\"\"^'^ '^^ What had happened was this. After the visit",
         "of Grand tour of Jean Jacques Bjirl)illc the musician and the philosopher, Jean Jacques, to sustain his reputation and to incicase it, had de-cided to visit that Normandy from which his people had come at the time of Frontenac. He set forth with much Mat and a little innocent posturing and ntual, in which a comet and a violin figured, to-gether with a farewell oration by the Cur6. In Paris Jean Jacques had found him elf bewil-dered and engulfed. He had no idea that life could be so overbearing, and he was inclined to resent his own insipificance. However, in Normandy, when he read the names on the tombstones and saw the rec-ords in the baptismal register of other Jean Jacques Barbilles, who had come and gone generations be- lore, his self-respect was somewhat restored. This pleasure was dashed, however, by the quizzical atti-tude of the natives of his ancestral parish, wi.j walked round about inspecting him as though he were a zoological specimen, and who criticized his accent-he who *.ad been at Laval for one whole term; who had had special instruction before that TlTu^^^ °'*^ ^\"\"^ ^\"\u003c^ « J«««it brother; and here! *\"^ ^\"^\"\"^ °^ musicians and philoso- «,;fl!'^^ffi^'/\"'' ?''\"'^^y self-assurance stood the test with difficulty, but it became a kind of ceremonial with him, whenever he was discomfited, to read some pages of a little dun-coloured book of philosophy ^n^i\" n^^°\" }^1 \"^\"\"^y ^' ^^^ J\"«t before he sailed and called, Meditations in Philosophy.\" He had been warned by the bookseller that the Church had no love for philosophy; but while at Laval he had",
         "7 The Money Master met the independent minds that, at eighteen to twenty-two, frequent academic groves; and he wis not to be put off by the pious bookselle -had he no also had a philosopher in his house the year before and was he not going to Nantes to see this same pS- \"'\"™\"^ '\" ^'^ *^^'°^^'^ St- s^-i°-'' =.K^\"J/*\"}^^\"'^ ^^\"*^' ^\"d Rouen and Havre abashed and discomfited him, played havoc with lis ol^S'f ^w \"^T'^T ^\"' ^y '^'\" indifference to himself. He admired, yet he wished to be ad-mired; he was humble, but he wished all people and things to be humble with him. When he Tahed he wanted the world to halt; when he enter:d a eaihe! ing-the Law Courts at Rouen or any other- he or at least the cloister, to whisper to itself, \"Here comes Jean Jacques Barbille.\" suffic.1 ^H ^' ^l^^\"\"'^^- and that would have sufficed. He would not have had them whisoer t^. If ^?f \"i\"*^ \"'^'\"'^ ^^ ™^ant t° build, the hrne-kilns he had started even before he left, and the general store he mtended to open when he returned to St. Saviour s. Not even his modesty was recog- Z.nH ^t .T' ^'^^^P' °\"\u003c=^- An ancestor, a grandmother of his, had come from the Basque country; and so down to St. Jean Pied de PoX went; for he came of a race who set great store by",
         "O p nr. f •• ! f. ri ^1 ; ¥■ I ; I \"^^. j'i ?c HE ADMIRED, VET HE WISHED TO BE ADMIRED; HE SIMPLY",
         "WAN SIMPLY WA^ED PEOPLE TO SAY, \"hEKE COMES JEAN JACQUES",
         "BA Grand tour of Jean Jacques Barbille mothers and grandmothers. At St. Jean Pied de Port he was more at home. He was, in a sense, a loreigner among foreigners there, and the people were not quizzical, since he was an outsider in any case and not a native retu.-ned, as he had been in Normandy. He learned to play pelota, the Basque game taken from the Spaniards, and he even al-lowed hmiself a little of that oratory which, as they say has Its habitat chiefly in Gascony. And because ne nad found an audience at last, he became a liberal host, and spent freely of his dollars, as he had never done in either Normandy. Paris, or elsewhere. So freely did he spend, that when he again embarked at Bordeaux for Qu-bec, he had only enough cash left to see him through the remainder of his journey m the great world. Yet he left France with his self- respect restored, and he even waved her a fond adieu as the creaking Antoine broke heavily into the waters of the Bay of Biscay, while he cried- \"My Uttle ship, It bears me far From lights of home To alien star. 0 vierge Marie, Pour moi priez Dieul Adieu, dear land, Provence, adieu.\" Then a further wave of sentiment swept over him and he was vaguely conscious of a desire to share the pains of parting which he saw in labour around hun-children from parents, lovers from loved He could not imagine the parting from a parent, for",
         "o The Money Master bo h of his were in the bosom of heaven, having followed his five brothers, all of whom had died in infancy, to his good fortune, for otherwise his estate would now be only one-sixth of what it was. But he could imagine a parting with some sweet daughter of France, and he added another verse to the thrill- ing of the heart of Casimir Delavigne: \"Beloved Isaure, Her hand makes sign — No more, no more. To rest in mine. 0 vierge Marie, Pour mot priez Dieul Adieu, dear land, Isaure, adieu!\" As he mu5 mured with limpid eye the last words, he saw m the forecastle not far from him a girl look-ing at him. There was unmistakable sadness in her glance of interest. In truth she was thinking of just such a man as Jean Jacques, whom she could never see any more, for he had paid with his life the penalty of the conspiracy in which her father standing now behind her on the leaky Antoine, had been a tool, and an evil tool. Here in Jean Jacques was the same ruddy brown face, black restless eye and young, silken brown beard. Also there was an air of certainty and universal comprehension, and though assertion and vanity were apparent, there was no self-consciousness. The girl's dead and gone conspirator had not the same honesty of face the same curve of the ideal in the broad forehead' the same poetry of rich wavy brown hair, the same",
         "good- I Grand tour of Jean Jacques Barbille wnere taint red roses came and went a\u003c! it .r^viT* seem at will; with a deep brown ^y\" a„d IhK . she was erandlv tnll_=,^ T„ \"\"\" ^y^- and eh,",
         "but The Money Master S^rnL^'\"\"\" ^\"f long-limbed Diana, with fine lines and a bosom of extreme youth, though she must have been twenty-one her last birthday. The eown she wore was a dark green well-worn velvet, which seemed of too good a make and quality for her class; and there was no decoration about her anywhere save at the ears where two drops of gold hung on little links an inch and a half long .t,-^r\\-^^''''\"^' Barbille's eyes took it all in with that observation of which he was so proud and confident, and rested finally on the drops of goM ^nM ' ^u\\ I\"i*'\"'=tively he fingered the heavy gold watch-Cham he had bought in Paris to replac^ the silver chain with a little crucifix dangling, which his father and even his great-grandfather had worn before him He had kept the watch, however- the great fat-bellied thing which had never run TnT '\"»,\\'^\"\"dred years. It was his mascot. To lose that watch would be like losing his share in the promises of the Church. So his fineers ran along the new gold-fourteen-carat-chairto he watch at the end of it; and he took it out a little ostentatiously, since he saw that the eyes of the eirl were on him. Involuntarily he wished to imprfss He might have saved himself the trouble She was impressed It was quite another matter. know that the impression was due to his resemblance to a bpanish conspirator, whose object was to destroy the Monarchy and the Church, as had been the object of the middle-aged conspirator-the \"iri's",
         "TO Grand tour of Jean Jacques Barbille father— who had the good fortune to escape from justice. It is probable that if Jean Jacques had known these facts, his story would never have been written, and he would have died in course of time with twenty children and a seat in the legislature; for, in spite of his ardent devotion to philosophy and its accompanying rationalism, he was a devout monarchist and a child of the Church. Sad enough it was that, as he shifted his glance from the watch, which ticked loud enough to wake a farm-hand in the middle of the day, he found those Spanish eyes which had been so lost in studying him. In the glow and glisten of the evening sun setting on the shores of Bordeaux, and flashing reflected golden light to the girl's face, he saw that they were shining with tears, and though looking at him, ap-peared not to see him. In that moment the scrutiny of the little man's mind was volatilized, and the Spanische, as she was ultimately called, began her career in the life of the money-master of St. Saviour's. It began by his immediately resenting the fact that she should be travelling in the forecastle. His mind imagined misfortune and a lost home through political troubles, for he quickly came to know that the girl and her father were Spanish; and to him, Spain was a place of martyrs and criminals. Crim-inals these could not b^-one had but to look at the giri's face ; while the face of her worthless father might have been that of a friend of Philip IV. in the Escorial. so quiet and oppressed it seemed. Nobility was wntten on the placid, apathetic countenance, except when it was not under observation, and then the",
         "13 The Money Master look of Cam took its place. Jean Jacques, however was not hkely to sec that look; since Sebastian t^? TT.\"\"^' r\" ^'' \"^'\"e-had observed from the first how the master-miller was impressed by Norfw';.'\"^ !l\" \"\"\"' ^' '° *\"™ '' '° ^'^'^\"\"\"t^ ,-n„ ^.u fu ^^ Z*'*)^'\" ^\"'^'■^'^ '\"'o «n understand- Ho hT^ ^' f\"- \"' ''\"\"* '^'^'- '°« ^«\" ior that. He had a wholesome respect, not to say fear, of her- SnJiJT'\" '■'\" ^'^ ^\"\"^'^' •' ^^« she who had ar-' rZS^ r ''^Pf ^T*\" ^P^'\"' ^\"'l ^J^o ^Iniost saved Cajmllho Gonzales from being shot. She could have ^Zi v°\"^1, J T^''' •'^^^ '^^'^'l ^™' ^°\"ld have father ?' ^f ^' \"°* '^^ \"^\"g-^d to save her tatner. Jn the circumstances she could not save ses2°of iT''' ^^' °\"/ J'^ J«^^\"^^ ^^« Pos- m,nH .n M \"^- ^ *^^ °^ P°\"*'^^' persecution as nowLv '°f '\"T- ^*^' '°^\u003c^ ^ ■' ^^^ by Sebastian Dolores, his daughter did not seek to alter it, for Tlti % \"■ °'^' P\"T\u003eoses, and they were mixed. 1^ r^n2\"^''\u003er'^t'^ ^ ^\"\"\"'^' ^°^ '^-^y ^°\"ld land m Canada with only a few dollars, and Carmen Dolores loved her father well enough not to wish in cLi^ If\" i\" '\"^ *^''''^'^ ^ ^^ had endured in Cadiz. Also, Jean Jacques, the young, verdant impre^ionable French Catholic, was likf'her S her own '' ^\"^ ^^ ^^^ ^°^^^ ^^' Carvillho in her own way very passionately, and-this much to her credit-quite chastely. So that she had no com s.dr.'nH T '^'''S '^^ y°\"\"2 moneymaster to her s^de, and keeping him there by such arts as such a woman posses.ses. These are remarkable after their",
         "14 Grand tour of Jean Jacques Barbille kind. They are combined of a frankness as to the emotions, and such outer concessions to physical sensations, as make a painful combination against a mere man's caution; even when that caution has a Norman origin. More than once Jean Jacques was moved to tears, as the Ananias of Cadiz told his stories of persecu-tion. So that one day, in sudden generosity, he paid the captain the necessary sum to transfer the ref-ugees from the forecastle to his own select portion of the steamer, where he was so conspicuous a figure among a handful of lower-level merchant folk and others of little mark who were going to Quebec. To these latter Jean Jacques was a gift of heaven, for he knew so much, and seemed to know so much more, and could give them the information they de-sired. His importance lured him to pose as a seig-neur, though he had no claim to the title. He did not call himself Seigneur in so many words, but when others referred to him as the Seigneur, and it came to his ears, he did not correct it; and when he was addressed as such he did not reprove. Thus, when he brought the two refugees from the forecastle and assured his fellow-passengers tl'at they were Spanish folk of good family exiled by persecu-tion, his generosity was acclaimed, even while all saw he was enamoured of Carmen. Once among the first-class passengers, father and daughter main-tained reserve, and though there were a few who saw that they were not very far removed above peasants, still the dress of the girt, which was good —she had been a maid in a great nobleman's family",
         "IS The Money Master —was evidence in favour of the father's story. Sebastian Dolores explained his own workman's dress as having been necessary /or his escape. Only one person gave Jean Jacques any warning. This was the captain of the Antoine. He was a Basque, he knew the Spanish people well — the types, the character, the idiosyncrasies; and he was sure that Sebastian Dolores and his daughter belonged to the lower clerical or higher working class, and he greatly inclined towards the former. In that he was right, because Dolores, and his father before him, had been employed in the office of a great com-mercial firm in Cadiz, and had repaid much con-sideration by stirring up strife and disloyalty in the establishment. But before the anarchist subtracted himself from his occupation, he had appropriated certain sums of money, and these had helpea lo carry him on, when he attached himself to the revo-lutionaries. It was on his daughter's savings that he was now travelling, with the only thing he had saved from the downfall, which was his head. It was of sufficient personal value to make him quite cheerful as the Antoine plunged and shivered on her way to the country where he could have no steady work as a revolutionist. With reserve and caution the Basque captain felt it his duty to tell Jean Jacques of his suspicions, warning him that the Spaniards were the choicest liars in the world, and were not ashamed of it; but had the same pride in it as had their greatest rivals, the Arabs and the Egyptians. His discreet confidences, however, were of no avail ;",
         "i6 Grand tour of Jean Jncqucs Barbiilc he was not discreet enough. If he h.id challenged the bona fides of Sebastian Dolores only, he might have been convincing, but he used the word \"they\" constantly, and that roused the chivalry of Jean Jacques. That the comely, careful Carmen should be party to an imposture was intolerable. Every-thing about her gave it the lie. Her body was so perfect and complete, so finely contrived and bal-anced, so cunningly curved with every line filled in; her eye was so full of lustre and half-melancholy too; her voice had such a melodious monotone; her mouth was so riijc and yet so distant in its luxury, that imposture was out of the question. Ah, but Jean Jacques was a champion worth while! He did nothing by halves. He was of the breed of men who grow more intense, more con-vinced, more thorough, ;is they talk. On'\u003e .vljective begets another, one warm allusion gives birth to a warmer, one flashing impulse evokes a brighter con-fidence, till the atmosphere is flaming with con-viction. If Jean Jacques started with faint doubt regarding anything, and allowed himself betimes the flush of a declaration of belief, there could be but one end. He gathered fire as he moved, im-pulse expanded into momentum, and momentum became an Ariel fleeing before the dark. He would start by offering a finger to be pricked, and would end by presenting his own head on a charger. He was of those who hypnotize themselves, who glow with self-creation, who flower and bloom without pollen. His rejection of the captain's confidence even had a 2",
         "17 The Money Master dignity. He took out his watch which represented so many laborious hours of other BarbiUes and with a decision in which the strong pulse of chivalry was beating hard, he said : \"I can never speak well till I have ate. That is my hobby. Well, so it is. And I like good company. So that is why I sit beside Senor and Seiiorita Do- ores at table-the one on the right, the other on the left, myself between, like this, like that It IS dinner-time now here, and my friends— my dear fnends of Cadiz-they wait me. Have you heard the Senonta sing the song of Spain, m'sieu' ? What It must be with the guitar, I know not; but with voice alone it is ravishing. I have learned it also. 1 he Senonta has taught me. It is a song of Aragon It IS sung m high places. It belongs to the nobility. , r, ^\"u ^o\" ^^^^ \"°* ^\"\"\"^\"^ ^t-but it is not too iate! Ihe Senonta, the unhappy ma'm'selle, driven lrom_ her ancestral home by persecution, she will sing It to you as she has sung it to me. It is your due. You are the master of the ship. But, yes she shall of her kindness and of her grace sing it to you. You do not know how it mns? Well it is ike this-listen and tell me if it does not speak of things that belong to the old regime, the ancient noblesse— listen, m'sieu' le capitaine, how it runs: \"Have you not heard of mad Murcie? Granada gay and And'lousie? There's where you'll see the joyous rout, When patios pour their beauties out; Come, children, come, the night gain's fast And Time's a jade too fair to last. '",
         "i8 Grand tour of Jean Jacques Barbille \"My flower o{ Spai-, .-„, T.ja^e^^ Away, away to yjoca; Come forth mj ,w.\u003e t, aw.y, y,y queen, Though daybre. ^ ,.orns, t!,e .ighfs between. 1 he Ftte's afoot -ah: :.l,; a'l! ahl De la Jota Ar'gon^sa. Ah! ah! ah! ah! ah! ah! ah! ahl De la Jota Ar'gon(5sa.\" Before he had finished, the captain was more than ready to go, for he had no patience with uch creduhty, simplicity and sentimentalism. He was Basque, and to be Basque is to lack sentiment and feel none, to play ever for the safe thing, to get with-out g,v:ng, and to mind your own business. It had only been an excessive sense of duty which had made the captain move in this, for he^iked Jean Jacques as everyone aboard his Antoinc did and he was convmced that the Spaniards would' play the Seigneur\" to the brink of disaster at least though It would have been hard to detect any £ ment of mtngue oi coquetry in Carmen Dolores in VrtfTr t' ^A'\"^ \\° '^^ ^^'' '^^' «he was still verf^fJi ;■ ^°\"'^'''' ^^\"\"^ ^^^'' had been of CuSd h^H Z°'' \"^'\"\"\"^ ^\"\"\u003c='^ ^' the arrows ot Cupid had perforated it in his short, gay hfo of adventure and anarchy; also partly b^cluse there was no coquetry needed to interest Jean Jacques nytrei;\"'\"\"''' ''-\"^^ \"°' \"— ^ t° ^\"t-'t ma?v™w f \"^'^\" \"P ^'' ™\"d from the first to marry Jean Jacques, and she deported herself ac-",
         "19 The Money Master cordingly — with modesty, circumspection and skill. It would be the easiest way out of all their diffi-culties. Since her heart, such as it was, fluttered, a mournful ghost, over the Place d'Armes, where her Gonzales was shot, it might better go to Jean Jacques than anyone else; Dr he was a man of parts, of money, and of looks, and she loved these all; and to her credit she loved his looks better than all the rest. She had no real cupidity, and she was not greatly enamoured of brains. She had some real philosophy of life learned in a hard school; and it was infinitely better founded than the smattering of conventional philosophy got by Jean Jacques from his compendium picked up on the quay at Quebec. Yet Jean Jacques' cruiser of life was not wholly unarmed. From his Norman forebears he had, be-neath all, a shrewdness and an elementary alertness not submerged by his vain, kind nature. He was quite a good business man, and had proved himself so before his father died — very quick to see a chance, and even quicker to see where the distant, sharp corners in the road were ; though not so quick to see the pitfalls, for his head was ever in the air. And here on the Antoinc, there crossed his mind often the vision of Carmen Dolores and himself in the parish of St. Saviour's, with the daily life of the Beau Cheval revolving about him. Flashes of dan-ger warned him now and then, just at the beginning of the journey, as it were; just before he had found it necessary to become her champion against the captain and his calumnies; but they were of the instant only. But champion as he became,",
         "and Grand tour of Jean Jacques Barbille i his 1 worshipping as his manner seemed, it all mi},.„ . have been put down to a wann, chivalrous, and spontaneous nature, which had not been bitted or bridled, and he might have landed at Quebec with-out committing himself, were it not for the fact that he was not to land at Quebec. That was the fact which controlled his destiny. He had spent many, many hours with the Dona Dolores, talking, talking, as he loved to talk, and only saving himself from the bMse of boring her by the fact that his enthusiasm had in it so fresh a quality, and because he was so like her Gonzales that she could always endure him. Besides, quick of intelligence as she was, she was by nature more material than she looked, and there was certainly something physically attractive in him— some curi-ous magnetism. She had a well of sensuousness which might one day become sensuality; she had a richness of feeling and a contour in harmony with It, which might expand into voluptuousness, if given too much sun, or if untamed by the normal restraints of a happy married life. There was an earthquake zone in her being which might shake down the whole structure of her existence. She was unsafe, not because she was deceiving Jean Jacques now as to her origin and as to her feelings for him; she was unsafe because of the natural strain of the light of love in her, joined to a passion for comfort and warmth and to a natural self-indulgence. She was determined to make Jean Jacques offer himself before they landed at Quebec. But they did not land at",
         "Quebec. CHAPTER II \"the rest op the story to-morrow\" 'T'HE journey wore on to the coast of Canada. A Gasp6 was not far off when, still held back by the constitutional tendency of the Norman not to close a bargain till compelled to do so, Jean Jacques sat with Carmen far forward on the deck, where the groaning Antoine broke the waters into sullen foam. There they silently watched the sunset, golden, pur-ple and splendid — and ominous, as the captain knew. \"Look, the end of life — like that!\" said Jean Jacques oratorically with a wave of the hand to-wards the prismatic radiance. \"All the way round, the whole circle — no, it would be too much,\" Carmen replied sadly. \"Better to go at noon — or soon after. Then the only memory of life would be of the gallop. No crawling into the night for me, if I can help it. Mother of Heaven, no! Let me go at the top of the flight.\" \"It is all the same to me,\" responded Jean Jacques, \"I want to know it all— to gallop, to trot, to walk, to crawl. Me, I'm a philosopher. I wait.\" \"But I thought you were a Catholic,\" she replied, with a kindly, lurking smile, which might easily have hardened into",
         "scofBng. \"The rest of the story to-morrow' \"First and last,\" he answered firmly. \"A Catholic and a philosopher — together in one?\" She shrugged a shoulder to incite him to argument, for he was interesting when excited; when spurting out little geysers of other people's cheap wisdom and philosophy, poured through the kind distortion of his own intelligence. Ke gave a toss of his head. \"Ah, that is my hobby —I reconcile, I unite, I adapt! It is all the nature of the mmd, the far-look, the all-round sight of the man. I have it all. I see.\" He gazed eloquently into the sunset, he swept the horizon with his hand. \"I have the all-round look I say the Man of Calvary, He is before all, the sun- but I say Socrates, Plato, Jean Jacques— that is my name, and it is not for nothing, that— Jean Jacques Rousseau, Descartes, Locke, they are stars that go round the sun. It is the same light, but not the same sound. I reconcile. In me all comes together like the spokes to the hub of a wheel. Me— I am a Chnstian, I am philosophe, also. In St. Saviour's, my home m Quebec, if the crops are good, what do men say? C est le bon Dieu— it is the good God,' that is what they say. If the crops are bad, what do they say? It is the good God,'— that is what they say. It IS the good God that makes crops good or bad and It IS the good God that makes men say, 'Cest le bonDteu.' The good God makes the philosophy. It is all one.\" ^ She appeared to grow agitated, and her voice shook as she spoke. \"I'sh, it is only a fool that says the good God does it, when the thing that is done",
         "23 The Money Master breaks you or that which you love all to pieces. No, no, no, it is not religion, it is not philosophy that makes one raise the head when the heart is bowed down, when everything is snatched away that was all in all. That the good God does it is a lie. Santa Maria, what a lie!\" \"Why 'Santa Maria,' then, if it is a lie?\" he asked triumphantly. He did not observe how her breast was heaving, how her hands were clenched; for she was really busy with thoughts of her dead Carvillho Gonzales; but for the moment he could only see the point of an argument. She made a gesture of despair. \"So — that's it. Habit in us is so strong. It comes through the veins of our mothers to us. Wc say that God is a lie one minute, and then the next minute we say, 'God guard you!' Always— always calling to something, for something outside ourselves. That is why I said Santa Maria, why I ask her to pray for the soul of my friend, to pray to the God that breaks me and mine, and sends us over the seas, beggars without a home.\" Now she had him back out of the vanities of his philosophy. He was up, inflamed, looking at her with an excitement on which she depended for her future. She knew the caution of his nature, she realized how he would take one step forward and another step back, and maybe get nowhere in the end; and she wanted him— for a home, for her fath-er's sake, for what he could do for them both. She had no compunctions. She thought herself too good for him, in a way, for in her day men of place and",
         "24 'The rest of the story to-morrow\" mark had taken notice of her; and if it had not liecn for her Gonzales she would no doubt have listened to one of them sometime or another. She knew she had ability, even though she was indolent, and she thought she could do as much for him as any other girl. If she gave him a handsome wife and handsome children, and made men envious of him, and filled him with good things,— for she could cook more than tortillas— she felt he would have no right to complain. She meant him to marry her— and Quebec was very near! \"A beggar in a strange land, without a home, without a friend— oh, my broken life!\" she whis-pered svistfuUy to the sunset. It was not all acting, for the past reached out and swept over her, throwing waves of its troubles upon the future. She was that saddest of human beings, a victim of dual forces which so fought for mastery with each other that, while the struggle went on the soui had no firm foothold anywhere. That' indeed, was why her Carvillho Gonzales, who also had l. en dual in nature, said to himself so often, I am a devil,\" and nearly as often, \"I have the heart of an angel.\" \"Tell me all about your life, my friend,\" Jean Jacques said eagerly. Now his eyes no longer hur-ried here and there, but fastened on hers and stayed thereabouts— ah, her face surely was hke pictures he had seen m the Louvre that day when he had ambled tirough the aisles of great men's glc.Ies with the teeling that he could not see too much for nothing m an hour.",
         "25 The Money Master \"My life? Ah, m'sieu', has not my father told you of it?\" she asked. He waved a hand in explanation, he cocked his head quizzically. \"Scraps — like the buttons on a coat here and there — that's all,\" he answered. \"Bom in Andalusia, lived in Cadiz, plenty of money, a beautiful home,\" — Carmen's eyes drooped, and her face flushed slightly — \"no brothers or sisters — visits to Madrid on political business — you at school — then the going of your mother, and you at home at the head of the house. So much on the young shoulders, the kitchen, the parlour, the market, the shop, society — and so on. That is the way it was, so he said, except in the last sad times, when your father, for the sake of Don Carlos and his rights near lost his life — ah, I can understand that: to stand by the thing you have sworn to! France is a republic, but I would give my Hfe to put a Napoleon or a Bourbon on the throne. It is my hobby to stand by the old ship, not sign on to a new captain every port.\" She raised her head and looked at him calmly now. The flush had gone from her face, and a light of determination was in her eyes. To that was added suddenly a certain tinge of recklessness and abandon in carriage and manner, as one flings the body loose from the restraints of clothes, and it expands in a free, careless, defiant joy. Jean Jacques' recital of her father's tale had con-fused her for a moment, it was so true yet so untrue, so full of lies and yet so solid in fact. \"The head of the house — visits to Madrid on political business —",
         "26 \"The rest of the story to-morrow\" the parlour, the market, society— all that!\" It sug-gested the picture of the life of a child of a great house; it made her a lady, and not a superior ser-vant as she had been- it tdomed her with a credit which was not hers; nnd for a moment she was ashamed. Yet from the first she had lent herself to the general imposture that they had fled from Spain for political reasons, having lost all and suffered greatly; and it was true while yet it was a lie. She had suffered, both her father and herself had suf-fered; she had been in danger, in agony, in sorrow m despair— It was only untrue that they were of good birth and blood, and had had position and comfort and much money. Well, what harm did that do anybody? What harm did it do this little brown seigneur from Quebec? Perhaps he too had made himself out to be more than he was. Perhaps he was no seigneur at all, she thought. When one is in distant seas and in danger of his life, one will hoist any flag sail to any por , pay homage to any king. t\u003eo would she. Anyhow, she was as good as this provincial, with his ancient silver watch, his plump little hands, and his book of philosophy. What did it matter, so all came right in the end' bhe would justify herself, if she had the chance. She was sick of conspiracy, and danger, and chicanery— and blood. She wanted her chance. She had been badly shaken m the last days in Spain, and she shrank trom more worry and misery. She wanted to have a home and not to wander. And here was a chance- now good a chance she was not sure; but it was a cnance. She would not hesitate to make it hers",
         "27 The Money Master After all, self-preservation was the thing which mat-tered. She wanted a bright -.Ire, a good table, a horse, a cow, and all such simple things. She wanted a roof over her and a warm bed at night. She wanted a warm bed at night — but a warm bed at night atone. It was the price she would have to pay for her imposture, that if she had all these things, she could not be alone in the slccp-tirne. She had not thought of this in the days when she looked forward to a home with her Gonzales. To be near him was everything; but that was all dead and done for; and now — it was at this point that, shrinking, she suddenly thrc\\ iff all restraining thoughts. With abandon of lV., mind came a recklessness of body, which gave her, all at once, a voluptuousness more in keeping with the typical maid of Andalusia. It got into the eyes and senses of Jean Jacques, in a way which had nothing to do with the philosophy of Descartes, or Kant, or Aristotle, or Hegel. \"It was beautiful in much — my childhood,\" she said in a low voice, dropping her eyes before his ardent gaze, \"as my father said. My mother was lovely to see, but not bigger than I was at twelve — so petite, ana yet so perfect in form — like a lark or a canary. Yes, and she could sing — anything. Not like me with a voice which has the note of a drum or an organ \" \"Of a flute, bright Senorita,\" interposed Jean Jacques. \"But high, and with the trills in the skies, and all like a laugh with a tear in it. When she went to the river to wash \"",
         "28 \"The rest of the story to-morrow \" She was going to say \"wash the clothes,\" but she stopped m t,me and said instead, \"wash her spaniel and her pony -her faee was flushed again^wTth shame, for to lie about one's mother is a sickening ^.ng, and her mother never had a spaniel of pony- the women on the shore wringing their ctothes, used to beg her to sing. To the hum of thej^ she would make the^usic whichThey -M ; r T^*^^^fi\"\u003c=songasyousingit.\" nJt f tT,\"- ^* °\"^\"^ °^ a different sort- m Love of Isabella, The Flight of Bobadil, Saranosse MyUttle Danderillero, and so on, and aU so sweet that the women used to cry. Always, always she a rebel. Then she used to en/ too; and she would rj Z T'i \"\"^ ^^'^^ '\"y father'was putaSst raL 1 ? r^°'' \"\"^ ^^\" '\" '^\"^ ^^'^ ^heli the^rifle rang out, she came at the moment, and seeing him £r Jfm d:si'f ^ \"^ '- ^-^^- -^ ^ \"do'- ''The poor little senora, dead too \" Not dead too— that was the pity of it You see my father was not dead. The^fficer --J? ^d not say sergeant-' -^ho commanded the firing squad hewas what is called a contpadre of my fathfr^\" an oath \"h\" u'u-'*\",'^~^ made-brother, sealed with ItYtSa u'ot \"• ^ ^'\"\" ^'^\" ^ blood-brother. \"So -like that. Well, the contpadre had nut blank eartndges in their rifles, and my father",
         "pre- The Money Master tended to fall dead; and the soldiers were marched away; and my father, with my mother, was carried to his home, still pretending to be dead. It had been all arranged except the awful thing, my mother's death. Who could foresee that? She ought to have been told; but who could guess that she would hear of it all, and come at the moment like that? So, that was the way she went, and 1 was left alone with my father.\" She had told the truth in all, except in conveying that her mother was not of the lower orders, and that she went to the river to wash her spaniel and her pony instead of her clothes. \"Your father — did they not arrest him again? Did they not know?\" She shrugged her shoulders. \"That is not the way in Spain. He was shot, as the orders were, with his back to the wall by a squad of soldiers with regulation bullets. If he chose to come to life again, th?t. woe his own affair. The Government would take no notice of him after he was dead. He could bury himself, or he could come alive — it was all the same to them. So he came alive again.\" \"That is a story which would make a man's name if he wrote it down,\" said Jean Jacques eloquently. \"And the poor little seiiora, but my heart bleeds for her! To go like that in such pain, and not to know! If she had been my wife I think I would have gone after her to tell her it was all right, and to be with her \" He paused confused, for that seemed like a reflec-tion on her father's chivalry, and for a man who had",
         "30 I \"The rest of the story to-morrow\" risked his life for his banished king — what would he have IhouKht if he had been told that Sebastian Dolores was an anarchist who loathed kings I— it was an insult to suggest that he did not know the right thing to do, or, knowing, had not done it. She saw the weakness of his case at once. ' ' There was his duty to the living,\" she said indignantly. \"Ah, forgive me — what a fool I am !\" Jean Jacques said repentantly at once. \"There was his little girl, his beloved child, his Carmen Dolores, so beautiful, with the voice like a flute, and \" He drew nearer to her, his hand was outstretched to take hers; his eyes were full of the passion of the moment; pity was drowning all caution, all the Norman shrewdness in him, when the Antoine sud-denly stopped almost dead with a sudden jolt and shock, then plunged sideways, jerked, and trembled. \"We've struck a sunk iceberg — the rest of the sto\"^ * - -T^TOw, Senorita,\" he cried, as they both n- -!-,\u003c' ' ■ feet. ' the story to-morrov/,\" she repeated, angry at ino i,croke of fate which had so interrupted the course of her fortune. She said it with a voice also charged with fear; for she was by nature a land- farer, not a sea-farer, though on the rivers of Spain she had lived almost as much as on land, and she was a good swimmer. \"The rest to-morrow,\" she repeated, controlling",
         "herself. CHAPTER III to-morrow\" T^„,T\\^^^ to-morrow. When the Antoine tJ.n \\ . T^^\" '\"\"^^'S she was not more 01 Oasp6. She had not struck it full on, or she would have crumpled up. but had struck and glanced mountmg the berg, and sliding away with a sS gapmg wound in her side, broken m^temaVwhei she had been weakest. Her condition was one rf extreme danger, and the captain was by no means sure that he could make the land. If a ston^or a heavy sea came on, they were doomed gateed^oTLT^*'' f ^v,\"\"'^' ^' '''' P\"\"\"?^ the water wo^d shor^\" T° '^' \"'^'J.* ^'t*^ \"° ^\"\"-^ty that she Spn /\"\"\"\"' '° th^ \"Sht of another day. Passengers and crew alike worked, and the few boats cTmefo th^ \"^ to lower away when the worst should come to the worst. Below, with the crew, the little money-master of St. Saviour's worked with \"n hardfn\"'' V ^'' ^^'^'^ ^t some generadons o\" SolL^r -J-l'' ^\"'^ ^\" the time he refused to be downcast. There was something in his nature or",
         "32 in his philosophy after all H» i, j voice, but it was lusty aJd f S of T. '\"\"^^ °^ ^ when cursing began when a .?t^ ^''\"\"«' ^\"^ curse his baptism-theTn^e of °' '^'\" '^\"'^ ^ mind-Jean Jacques beTan to *\"\"' '° ^ ^^^holic with which the haSan^f ^I '\"^ f \"^^^\"^ «°ng or their playtimesr ^^ ^°^' t^^''\" l^bouri 'Trrrs'fr;^''°'.'f^\"P°rt\u003cJemer, Trois gros navir's sont arrive l-harg\u0026 d avoin', chargds de bid- Tro,s dam's s-envontles marchander.\" And so on through many verses w,\u003ei, u ■ that was a good antidote to mShn ^^^^iness \u003et was no specific f^r ! t--'^\"\"^^' ^ven though part howeve'r.-lnd^hLt^S- '' f^'^' '^ he plunged into thaf Zu , Jacques fin shed it gay spin'ts. S/ £Sr\"'^\"-* °f the habitant's \"l^':''ezBouU,balchezBoul( ?SHS3-^' -th the' co^'rai t'oJotrd tv\"^'^ \"' ^^^ -- \"ot stop to think that ti^ '\"«' '\" ^''\"' he did been taken, and that L^ ^^^ ^^^'^^'^ ^^d all ■\"deed: foriasachild hehad br^^^K^\"\"^ ^\"''\"'\"-- 3 ia.fte^had been subject to",
         "cramp. The Money Master and so had made the Beau Cheval River less his friend than would have been useful now. He realized it, however, soon after daybreak when, within a few hundred yards of the shores of Gasp6, to which the good Basque captain had been slowly driving the Antoine all night, there came the cry, \"All hands on deck!\" and \"Lower the boats!\" for the Antoine's time had come, and within a hand- reach of shore almost she found the end of her rickety life. Not more than three-fourths of the passengers and crew were got into the boats. Jean Jacques was not one of these; but he saw Carmen Dolores and her father safely bestowed, though in different boats. To the girl's appeal to him to come, he gave a nod of assent, and said he would get in at the last moment; but this he did not do, pushing into the boat instead a crying lad of fifteen, who said he was afraid to die. So it was that Jean Jacques took to the water side by side with the Basque captain, when the Antoine groaned and shook, and then grew still, and presently, with some dignity, dipped her nose into the shallow sea and went down. \"The rest of the story to-morrow,\" Jean Jacques had said when the vessel struck the iceberg the night before: and so it was. The boat in which Carmen had been placed was swamped not far from shore, but she managed to lay hold of a piece of drifting wreckage, and began to fight steadily and easily landward. Presently she was aware, however, of a man struggling hard some",
         "34 'To-morrow' httle distance away to the left of her, and from the tousled hair shaking in the water she was sure that it was Jean Jacques. So it proved to be; and thus it was that, at his last gasp almost, when he felt he could keep up no longer, the wooden seat to which Carmen clung came to his hand, and a word of cheer from her drew his head up with what was almost a laugh. \"To think of this!\" he said presently wh n he was safe, with her swimming beside hir^ without support, for the wooden seat would not sustain the weight of two. \"To think that it is you who saves me!\" he again declared eloquently, as they made the shore in comparative ease, for she was a fine swimmer. \"It is the rest of the story,\" he said with great cheerfulness and aplomb as they stood on the shore in the morning sun, shoeless, coatless, but safe: and she understood. There was nothing else for him to do. The usual process of romance had been reversed. He had not saved her life, she had saved his. The least that he could do was to give her shelter at the Manor Cartier yonder at St. Saviour's, her and, if need be, her father. Human gratitude must have play. It was so strong in this case that it alone could have overcome the Norman caution of Jean Jacques, and all his worldly wisdom (so much in his own eyes). Added thereto was the thing which had been greatly stirred in him at the instant the Anioine struck; and now he kept picturing Carmen in the big living-room and the big bedroom of the house by the mill, where",
         "35 The Money Master li was the comfortable four-poster which had come from the mansion of the last Baron of Beaugard down by St. Laurent. Three days after the shipwreck of the Antoine, and as soon as sufficient finery could be got in Que-bec, it was accomplished, the fate of Jean Jacques. How proud he was to open his cheque-book be-fore the young Spanish maid, and write in cramped, characteristic hand a cheque for a hundred dollars or so at a time! A moiety of this money was given to Sebastian Dolores, who could scarcely believe his gjod fortune. A situation was got for him by the h. io of a good abb6 at Quebec, who was touched by ihe tale of the wreck of the Antoine, and by the no less wonderful tale of the refugees of Spain, who naturally belonged to the true faith which \"feared God and honoured the King.\" Sebastian Dolores was grateful for the post offered him, though he would rather have gone to St. Saviour's with his daughter, for he had lost the gift of work, and he desired peace after war. In other words he had that fatal trait of those who strive to make the world better by talk and violence, the vice of indolence. But when Jean Jacques and his handsome bride started for St. Saviour's, the new father-in-law did not despair of following soon. He would greatly have enjoyed the festivities which, after all, did follow the home-coming of Jean Jacques Barbille and his Spanische; for while they lacked enthusiasm because Carmen was a foreigner, the romance of the story gave the whole proceedings a spirit and interest which spread into adjoining parishes: so that people",
         "36 'To-i morrow came to mass from forty miles away to sec the oair who had been saved from the sea ^^c the pair intolri!\"*!?\" ^\"?'\" \"^^spapers found their way into the pansh, with a thrilling account of the last rouTac°t in rof \"'\"■\"'^' ^\"'^ °Uean Jacques' chiS IZ Tu \"\"\"^ *° «\"*'=^ a boat to save himself fhP ^.n ^; .^ ^\"\"^ ''^ '^\"g ^\"^ ^f^^ Bouli while the men .'orked at the pumps; they permitted the ttw^TTu^ ^''''='*' ^\"'^ Madame Je^Jacqies of Sv ' \"' •''\"\"'\"\"' \"^ ^\"\"Jd be. tith the help r, J^^ iniprovisation. Even speech-making S iater. This was followed by a feast of Spanish cake^ and meats made by the hands of Carm'TDoIoS the lady saved from the sea \"-as they called ht not knowing that she had saved heS and laved Jean Jacques as well. It was not qu te to llan ^nnTn .r*^'' *^^' ^^ ^^ \"°t set this error right and teU the world the whole exact truth. ^ '",
         "J m",
         "H EPOCH THE",
         "SECOND r' ill",
         "if CHAPTER IV THIRTEEN YEARS AFTER AND THE CLERK OF THE COURT TELLS A STORY JT was hard to say which was the more important J person m the parish, the New Cur6 or M^^' Jean Jacques BarbiUe. When the Old Curl was ?/T -^f^\"'' ^^ ^ 1^^^'- light, and he To cepted h,s degree of illumination ^^ith content But when PSre Lan^on was gathered to hisSers and thousands had turned awly from the^aveS' wSsed'rhet^'^'f 'f^i'l.'' ''''\"'' ^\"fi^ed tS messed them, comforted them, and firmly led them was laid to rest, they did not tuxt, To^S to h^ O^M sf '°\"''^\"^^ ^^ affection.°\"The New to be d.h,77' T ^°\"\"^= '^^ '^^^ Curd had lived to K eighty-five, beanng wherever he went a lamn sour'TV^M\"*'^^^ f' P^°P'^ «^hted Sir 3 ence bu^t n' u^\"\":^ \"\"\"^'^ ^°'\"'\"^\"'^ their obedi- iiaence until he had earned them So It was that, for a time, Jean Tacaues toot Se otthel-*?' P''^.^\"^ •\" the human Xo/the Un to f^ J'*\"^*' *^°^S^*^ ^ ^ ^^«y lesser degreT Up to the death of M. Lanjon, Je^ JacquesS",
         "41 The Money Master done very well in life, as things go in out-of-the-way places of the world. His mill which ground good flour brought him increasing pence; his saw-mill more than paid its way; his farms made a small profit, in spite of a cousin who worked one on halves, but who had a spendthrift wife; the ash-factory which his own initiative had started made no money, but the loss was only small; and he had even made profit out of his lime-kilns, although Sebastian Do-lores, Carmen's father, had at one time mismanaged them— but of that anon. Jean Jacques himself managed the business of money-lending and horse- dealing; and he also was agent for fire insurance and a dealer in lightning-rods. In the thirteen years since he married he had been able to keep a good many irons in the fire, and also keep them more or less hot. Many people in his and neighbouring parishes were indebted to him, and it was worth their while to stand well with him. If he insisted on debts being paid, he was never exacting or cruel. If he lent money, he never de-manded more than eight per cent., and he never pressed his debtors unduly. His cheerfulness sel-dom deserted him, and he was notably kind to the poor. Not seldom in the winter time a poor man, here and there in the parish, would find dumped down outside his 'oor in the early morning a half- cord of wood or a oag of flour. It could not be said that Jean Jacques did not enjoy his own generosity. His vanity, however, did not come from an increasing admiration of his own personal appearance, a weakness which often be-",
         "42 Thirteen years after longs to middle-age; but from the study of his so- called philosophy, which in time became an obsession with him. In vain the occasional college professors who spent summer months at St. Saviour's, sought to interest him in science and history, for his philoso-phy had large areas of boredom ; but science marched over too jagged a road for his tender intellectual feet; the wild places where it led dismayed him. History also meant numberless dates and facts. Perhaps he could have managed the dates, for he was quick at figures, but the facts were like bees m their hive,— he could scarcely tell one from an-other by looking at them. So it was that Jean Jacques kept turning his eyes as he thought, to the everlasting meaning of things to \"the laws of Life and the decrees of Destiny ' He was one of those who had found, as he thought what he could do, and was sensible enough to do it I.^t the poor fellows, who gave themselves to science, trouble their twisted minds with trigonometry and the formula of some grotesque chemical combination; let the dull people rub their noses in the ink of Greek and Latin, which was no use for everyday consump-tion ; let the heads of historians ache with the warring facts of the lives of nations; it all made for sleep, aut philosophy— ah, there was a field where a man could always use knowledge got from books or sorted out of his own experiences! It happened, therefore, that Jean Jacques, who not too vaguely realized that there was reputation to be got from being thought a philosopher, always earned about with him his little compendium from",
         "43 •\"^ The Money Master the quay at Quebec, which he had brought ashore inside his red-flannel shirt, with the antique silver watch, when the Antoine went down. Thus also it was that when a lawyer in court at Vilray, four miles from St. Saviour's, asked him one day, when he stepped into the witness-box, what he was, meaning what was his occupation, his reply was, \"Moi—je suis M'sicu' Jean Jacques, philosophe — (Me — l am M'sieu' Jean Jacques, philosopher).\" A little later outside the court-house, the Judge who had tried the case— M. Carcasson— said to the Clerk of the Court: \"A curious, interesting little man, that Monsieur Jean Jacques. What's his history?\" \"A character, a character, monsieur le juge,\" was the reply of M. Armand Fille. \"His family has bee? here since Frontenac's time. He is a figure in the district, with a hand in everything. He docs enough foolish things to ruin any man, yet swims along— swims along. He has many kinds of business- mills, stores, farms, lime-kilns, and all that, and keeps them all going; and as if he hadn't enough to do, and wasn't risking enough, he's now organiz-ing a cheese-factory on the co-operative principle, as in Upper Canada among the English.\" \"He has a touch of originality, that's sure,\" was the reply of the Judge. _ The Clerk of the Court nodded and sighed. Mon- seigneur Giron of Laval, the greatest scholar in Quebec, he said to me once that M'sieu' Jean Jacques missed being a genius by an inch. But monsieur le",
         "44 I -JE SUIS M SIKL JEAN JACl.U liS,",
         "flIIH)ht)I'HK' \u003e:",
         ";f Thirteen years after juge, not to have that inch is worse than to be an Ignoramus.\" Judge Carcasson nodded. \"Ah, surely' Your Jean Jacques lacks a balance-wheel. He has brains but not enough. He has vision, but it is not steady' he has argument, but it breaks down just where it should be most cohesive. He interested me I took note of every turn of his mind as he gave evi-dence. He will go on for a time, pulling his strings, domg th:s and domg that, and then, all at once when he has got a train of complications, his brain win not be big enough to see the way out. Tell me has he a balance-,- heel in his home-a sensible wife' perhaps?\" ' The Clerk of the Court shook his head mournfully and seemed to hesitate. Then he said, '^Comme ci comme fa-but no, I will speak the truth about it' She IS a Spaniard-the Spanische she is caUed by the neighbouij. I will tell you aU about that, and you will wonder that he has carried on as weU as ,}^;,T^^^ ^'^ ^^\"\"ty and his philosophy.\" He U have need of his philosophy before he's aone, or I don t know human nature; he'U get a bad iall one of these days, \" responded the Judge. \"'Mot jesuts M'sieu' Jean Jacques, philosophe '—that is what he said. Bumptious httle man, and yet-and yet there s something in him. There's a sense of things which everyone doesn't have -a glimmer ot life beyond his own orbit, a catching at the biggest elements of being, a hovering on the confines of d^ understanding, as it were. Somehow I feel almost sorry for him, though he annoyed me while he was",
         "43 The Money Master in the witness-box, in spite of myself. He was as the English say, so 'damn sure.'\" \"So damn sure always,\" agreed the Clerk of the Court, with a sense of pleasure that his great man, this wonderful aged little judge, should have shown himself so human as to use such a phrase. \"But, no doubt, the sureness has been a good servant in his business,\" returned the Judge. \"Con-fidence in a weak world gets unearned profit often. But tell me about his wife — the Spanische. Tell me the how and why, and everything. I'd like to trace our little money-man wise to his source.\" Again M. Fille was sensibly agitated. \"She is handsome, and she has great, good gifts when she likes to use them,\" he answered. \"She can do as much in an hour as most women can do in two ; but then she will not keep at it. Her life is but fits and starts. Yet she has a good head for business, yes, very good. She can see through things. Still, there it is — she will not hold fast from day to day.\" \"Yes, yes, but where did she come from? What was the field where she grew?\" \"To be sure, monsieur. It was like this,\" re-sponded the other. Thereupon M. Fille proceeded to tell the history, musical with legend, of Jean Jacques' Grand Tour, of the wreck of the Antoine, of the marriage of the \"seigneur,\" the home-coming, and the life that followed, so far as rumour, observation, and a mind with a gift for narrative, which was not to be in-complete for lack of imagination, could make it. It was only when he offered his own reflections on",
         "46 Thirteen years after Carmen Dolores, now Carmen Barbille, and on women generally, that Judge Carcasson pulled him up.^ \"So, so, I see. She has temperament and so on, but she's unsteady, and regarded by her neigh-bours not quite as one that belongs. Bah, the con-ceit of every race! They are all the same. The English are the worst— as though the good God was English. But the child— so beautiful, you say, and yet more like the father than the mother. He is not handsome, that Jean Jacques, but I can under-stand that the little one should be like him and yet beautiful too. I should like to see the child.\" Suddenly the Clerk of the Court stopped and touched the arm of his distinguished friend and patron. \"That is very easy, monsieur,\" he said eagerly, \"for there she is in the red wagon yonder, waiting for her father. She adores him, and that makes trouble sometimes. Then the mother gets fits, and makes things hard at the Manor Cartier. It is not all a bed of roses for our Jean Jacques. But there it is. He is very busy all the time. Some-thing doing always, never still, except when you will find him by the road-side, or in a tavern with all the people round him, talking, jesting, and he himself gomg mto a trance with his book of philosophy. It is very strange that everlasting going, going, going, and yet that love of his book. I sometimes think it is all pretence, and that he is all vanity— or almost so. Heaven forgive me for my want of charity!\" _ The Httle round judge cocked his head astutely. 'But you say he is kind to the poor, that he does",
         "47 The Money Master TJlT ^T ^'u '^ ^^° ^'^ ^\" ^\"^^^ to him, and that he will take his coat off his back to give to a tramp— is it so?\" ^ ^ \"As so as so, monsieur.\" »,«'3!J7 w^' u?^ ^ ''^\"'ty- ^\"\"^ l^cause of that L SSitr '°\" \"''\" '' comes-alas. so much .ip' J^ w^''\"^'-'\"°f '^\"^ '^ juge-but ah, look mon-sieur! He pomted eagerly. \"T.ere she is. going iot «%? ^^f n-Madame Jean Jacques, if sh! not a figure of a woraan.? See the walk of her-is faller tli'f ?^'''t''^- ^^^ '' ^\"^^ ^ hand-breadth if!, f ?''\" J^T?\"\"'- ^\"'^ ^^\"^ f^^e. «\u003e°st sure Zll \\ f *° '\"\"• \" J\"^\" J^^'l\"^^ ^a« not so busy usuiy, he would see what a woman he has got It When Jean Jacques listens to her, he goes right. She \u0026ins-tt o\"m .^rK^' 'i^'^ '° '\"^\"^^^ 'he lime! SavW ^. t ^^'^u- ^° ?°'°'\"'- She was for him IhlZ^f\"^^^^' \"\"^T ^^ ^^Pt the books of co^d^^V^S\"\";, But no. Jean Jacques said that he could make her happy by having her father near her, and he would not believe she meant what she said He does not understand her; that is the trouble He knows as much of women or men as I know ofl— \" ^ Of the law-W\" laughed the great man. Monsieur-ah, that IS your little joke! I laugh yes, but I laugh,\" responded the Clerk of the CoS him twT'r^'\"^,^-. \"^°^ ^\"'^^ ^hen she told nun that the lime-kilns \" The Judge, who had retraced his steps down the",
         "48 Thirteen years after street of the town— it was little more than a large village, but because it had a court-house and a mar-ket-place it was called a town— that he might have a good look at Madame Jean Jacques and her child before he passed them, suddenly said: \"How is it you know so much about it all, Maitre Fille— as to what she says and of the inner secrets of the household? Ah, ha, my little Lothario I have caught you— a bachelor too, with time on his hands, and the right side of seventy as wellt The evidence you have given of a close knowledge of the household of our Jean Jacques does not have its basis in hearsay, but in acute personal observation Tut— tut! Fie-fie! my Httle gay Clerk of the Court. Fie! Fie!\" M. Fille was greatly disconcerted. He had never been a Lothario. In forty years he had never had an episode with one of \"the other sex,\" but it was not because he was impervious to the softer emo-tions. An intolerable shyness had ever possessed him when in the presence of women, and even small girl children had frightened him, till he had made fnends with little Zoe BarbiUe, the daughter of Jean Jacques. Yet even with Zo6, who was so simple and companionable, and the very soul of childish con-fidence, he used to blush and falter till she made him talk. Then he became composed, and his tongue was like a running stream, and on that stream any craft could sail. On it he became at ease with madame the Spanische, and he even went so far as to look her fuU in the eyes on more than one occasion. *",
         "49 The Money Master Answer me— ah, you cannot answer!\" teasingly added the Judge, who loved his Clerk of the Court and had great amusement out of his discomfiture' You are convicted. At an age when a man should be setthng down, you are gallivanting with the wife of a philosopher.\" \"Monsieur— monsieur le juge!\" protested M Pille w,th slowly heightening colour. \"I am innocent, yes, altogether. There is nothing, believe me It IS the child, the little Zo^but a maid of charm and kindness. She brings me cakes and the toffy made by her own hands; and if I go to the Manor Cartier, as I often do, it is to be polite and neighbourly If Madame says things to me, and if I see what I see, and hear what I hear, it is no crime; it is no misdemeanour; it is within the law— the perfect law.\" Suddenly the Judge linked his arm within that of the other, for he also was little, and he was fat and round and ruddy, and even smaller than M Fille, who was thin, angular and pale. \"Ah, my Httle Confucius,\" he said gently, \"have you seen and heard me so seldom that you do not know me yet, or what I really think? Of course it is \\yithin the law— the perfect law— to visit at m sieu' the philosopher's house and talk at length also to madame the philosopher's wife; while to make the position regular by friendship with the philosopher's child is a wisdom which I can only ascribe to\"— his voice was charged with humour and malicious badinage— \"to an extended acquain-tance with the devices of human nature, as seen in",
         "so Thirteen years after those episodes of the courts with which you have been long familiar.\" \"Oh, monsieur, dear monsieur!\" protested the Clerk of the Court, \"you always make me your butt.\" \"My friend,\" said the Judge, squeezing his arm, \"if I could have you no other way, I would make you my butler!\" Then they both laughed at the inexpensive joke, and the Clerk of the Court was in high spirits, for on either side of the street were people with whom he lived every day, and they could see the doyen of the Bench, the great Judge Carcasson, who had refused to be knighted, arm in arm with Iiim. Aye, and better than all, and more than all, here was Zo6 Barbille drawing her mother's attention to him al-most in the embrace of the magnificent jurist. The Judge, with his small, round, quizzical eyes which missed nothing, saw too; and his attention was strangely arrested by the faces of both the mother and the child. His first glance at the woman's face made him flash an inward light on the memory of Jean Jacques' face in the witness-box, and a look of reflective irony came into his own. The face of Carmen Dolores, wife of the philosophic miller and money-master, did not belong to the world where she was placed— not because she was so unlike the habitant women, or even the wives of the big farm-ers, or the sister of the Cure, or the ladies of the military and commercial exiles who lived in that portion of the province; but because of an alien something in her look— a lonely, distant sense of",
         "SI The Money Master isolation, a something which might hide a com-panionship and sympathy of a rare kind, or might be but the mask of a furtive, soulless nature. In the child's face was nothing of this. It was open as the day, bright with the cheerfulness of her father's countenance, alive with a humour which that co\\m- tenance did not possess. The contour was like that of Jean Jacques, but with a fineness and delicacy to its fulness absent from his own; and her eyes were a deep and lustrous brown, under a forehead which had a boldness of gentle dignity possessed by neither father nor mother. Her hair was thick, brown and very full, like that of her father, and in all respects, save one, she had an advantage over both her parents. Her mouth had a sweetness which might not unfairly be called weakness, though that was balanced by a chin of commendable strength. But the Judge's eyes found at once this vulnerable point in her character as he had found that of her mother. Delightful the child was, and alert and companionable, with no remarkable gifts, but with a rare charm and sympathy. Her face was the mirror of her mind, and it had no ulterior thought. Her mother's face, the Judge hac noted, was the foreground of a landscape which had lonely shadows. It was a face of some distinction and suited to sur-roundings more notable, though the rural life Car-men had led sin^', the Antoine went down and her fortimes came up, had coarsened her beauty a very little. \"There's something stirring in the coverts,\" said the Judge to himself as he was introduced to",
         "the Thirteen years after mother and child. By a hasty gesture Zo6 gave a command to M. Pille to help her down. With a hand on his shoulder she dropped to the ground. Her object was at once apparent. She made a pretty old-fashioned curtsey to the Judge, then held out her hand, as though to reassert her democratic equality. As the Judge looked at Madame BarbiUe, he was involuntanly, but none the less industriously, not-ing her characteristics; and the sum of his reflec-tions, after a few moments' talk, was that dangers he had seen ahead of Jean Jacques, would not be averted by his wife, indeed might easily have their ongin in her. \"I wonder it has gone on as long as it has \" he said to himself; though it seemed unreasonable that his few moments with her, and the story told him by the Clerk of the Court, should enable him to come to any definite conclusion. But at eighty- odd Judge Carcasson was a Solon and a Solomon in one. He had seen life from aU angles, and he was not prepared to give any virtue or the possession of any virtue too much rope; while nothing in life surpnsed him. ^ .f'/S\"^ ZJ^^ ^°\" ^'^\"^ *° ^ a j'ldge?\" he asked of Zo6, suddenly taking her hand in his. A kinship had been at once established between them, so little has age, position, and intellect to do with the natural gravitations of human nature. _ She did not answer direct, and that pleased him said ^^^ ^ ■'\"'^^^ ^ ^'^°'^'^ ^^^^ \"° ^^'^^•\" ^^^",
         "S3 The Money Master \"What would you do with the bad people?\" he asked. \"I would put them alone on a desert island, or out at sea in a little boat, or out on the prairies with-out a horse, so that they'd have to work for their lives.\" \"Oh, I see! If M. Fille here set fire to a house, you would drop him on the prairie far away from everything and everybody and let him 'root hog or die'?\" \"Don't you think it would kill him or cure him?\" she asked whimsically. The Judge laughed, his eyes twinkling. \"That's what they did when the world was young, dear ma'm'selle. There was no time to build jails. Alone on the prairie— a separate prairie for every criminal — that would take a lot of space; but the idea is all right. It mightn't provide the proper degree of punishment, however. But that is being too particular. Alone on the prairie for punishment — well, I should like to see it tried.\" He remembered that saying of his long after, while yet he was alive, and a tale came to him from the prairies which made his eyes turn more intently towards a land that is far off, where the miserable miscalculations and mistakes of this world are re-adjusted. Now he was only conscious of a primitive imagination looking out of a young girl's face, and making a bridge between her understanding and his own. \"What else would you do if you were a judge?\" he asked presently.",
         "S4 Thirteen years after \"I would make my father be a miller.\" she replied But he IS a miller, I hear.\" repiiea. \"But he is so many other things— so manv If uJZT'^ \" \"1\"'\" \"^ ^^°\"'^ '''ve morTo/him He IS at home only a little. If I get up early enorh m the mommg, or if I am let stay up at nirhtlate rr '...^ T \"\"■\"'■ ^\"* *^^^ '« not ^enough-is? mother?\" she added with a sudden sense tha she had^^gone too far. that she ought not to sa;'t£ The woman's face had darkened for an instant of1hr'^\"°.\" ''°\"^*^ •\" \"\"'' ^y«' but bj J. effort of the will she controlled herself \"But you would not let a man judge for himself H-ould you ma'm-selle?\" asked the old i^qSl ^^ You^would ,udge for the man what was ^tr \"^^^ '^\"^ e^od idle, and make the bad work The gnnd, and the bad you would put on a prairie alone u. make the grist for the grinding. Ma^m'sSle we must be friends-is it not so ?\" ' rirl^T.?'' ^u ^'\"^^y^ *'^'=\" friends?\" the youne girl asked with the look of a visionary sudden\"v spnngmg up in her eyes. suuaenly Here was temperament indeed. She pleased Judge",
         "5S The Money Master Carcasson greatly. \"But yes, always, and always, and always,\" hf replied. Inwardly he said to him-self, \"I did not see that at first. It is her father in her.\" \"Zo6!\" said her mother",
         "reprovingly. CHAPTER V THE CLERK OP THE COURT ENDS H'b SfOPY ^MOMENT afterwards the Judge, a. ',. nalkod •^ down the st,T*t still arm in an?, ,..th the Ckrk of the Court, said: \"That child must have kS luck or she will not have her share of happ.n^ She has depths that are not deep enough/^S ently he added \"Tell me, my Clerk. \\he ma^- Jean Jacques-he is so much away-has there never been any talk about-about \" ratht^t?^'\"°\"?r'.'' ^\"S^-\" ^^«d M. FiUe rather stiffly. For instance-about what?\" For instance, about a man-not Jean Jacques \" The hps of the Clerk of the Court tightened ^ i-tm nrw^--™\"~*'\" ''°\"' '\"°\"^'^- '« J\"^-\" .J^^P^^'^ °^ *^^ '^°\"'\"' '''\"Shed. What he was atout to say was difficult, but he .ione of all The ^T»I- •^^'''^\"^^ ^°'\"^- By chance he hau seen heTad fl^df\" ^\".f ^™r \"^ *^^^^ d^ys ''-f-e. and He was '.•'\"/' f, ^ '^^^ ^■°»''' fly fr\"'\" '^ de'non. 3L and no?r ^' '^^■u'^\"* \"^^ ^^^ ^ P\"rist in life Sid'ht LT ''«'=«\"«\\the flush of youth had gone and his feet were on the path which leads into the",
         "57 The Money Master I autumn of a man's days. The thing he had seen had been terribly on his mind, and he had felt that his own judgment was not sufficient for the situa-tion, that he ought to tell someone. The Cur6 was the only person who had come to his mind when he became troubled to the point of actual mental agony. But the new cur6, M. Saviy, was not like the Old Cur6, and, besides, was it not step-ping between the woman and her confessional? Yet he felt that something ought to be done. It never occurred to him to speik to Jean Jacques. That would have seemed so brutal to the woman. It came to him to speak to Carmen, but he knew that he dared not do so. He could not say to a woman that which must shame her before him, she who had kept her head so arrogantly high— not so much to him, however, as to the rest of th- v. orld. He had not the courage ; and yet he had fear lest some awful thmg would at any moment now befal the Manor Cartier. If it did, he would feel himself to blame had he done nothing to stay the peril. So far he was the only person who could do so, for he was the only person who knew! The Judge could feel his friend's arm tremble with emotion, and he said, \"Come, now, my Plato, what is it? A man has come to disturb the peace of Jean Jacques, our philosophe, eh?\" \"That is it, monsieur— a man of a kind.\" \"Oh,^ of course, my bambino, of course, a man 'of a kind,* or there would be no peace disturbed. You want to tell me, I see. Proceed then; there is no reason why you should not. I am secret. I have",
         "S8 The clerk of the commd^_hi^^^^^^^ hrevrL?c:rs:\\^sr^-. ^^ ^^ ^\". to tell ^e. In tr^th I fehfli;'^'\"' ^°\"^ '\"'\"'^ when I saw you iS a £r fim^rn' '\"\"\"''''f^ to her, when she talked ^hm.l^ ^°\" 'P°''° figure of a woman tn^ t t ^- ^^® '» a fine -is it not so?\" -^^ ^^^' ^^ \"^gleets her ^^;;He means ,t not. but it is so. His life is full and'Jit^:;;LSTnd\"lt:'.^^°\"^^ ^\"^ ^^''t°- fanns. and L priL of wS\"±^^^^^ TY^^'^ understand it all, my PiUe si *w certamly, I and if she has travelled bv t J^ \" °° \"'\"\"'' ^'°«^' thirteen years with^StsSi ^ t^a'cH Ssf \" thing to the credit of human nature'- '°™\"- ^, monsieur, a vow before the good God .•• The Judge interrupted sharply. ''Tut hif^T vows! Do you not krnw tw ■'\"t' tut— these right bv sortnw ^..T' .^ *\"'' '\"*'' »*\" be",
         "put The Money Master why the vows of the Church at baptism, at confirma-tion, at marriage? Why the vows of the priests, of the nuns, of those who had given themselves to eternal service? Monsieur had spoken terrible things. And yet he had said at the last, \"It is not vows that keep the world right, but the prayer of a man's soul from day to day.\" That was not hereti-cal, or atheistic, or blasphemous. It sounded logical and true and good. He was about to say that, to some people, vows were the only way of keeping them to their duty— and especially women— but the Judge added gently: \"I would not for the world hurt your sensibilities, my httle Clerk, and we are not neariy so far apart as you think at the minute. Thank God, I keep the faith that is behind all faith— the speech of a man's soul with God. ... But there, if you can, let us hear what man it is who disturbs the home of the philosopher. It is not my Pille, that's sure.\" He could not resist teasing, this judge who had a mmd of the most rare uprightness; and he was not always sorry when his teasing hurt; for, to his mind men should be lashed into strength, when they drooped over the tasks of life; and what so sharp a lash as ridicule or satire! \"Proceed, my friend,\" he urged brusquely, not waiting for the gasp of pained surprise of the little Clerk to end. He was glad to see the figure beside him presently straighten itself, as though to be braced for a task of difficulty. Indignation and re-sentment were good things to stiffen a man's back It was three days ago,\" said M. Fille \"I saw 60",
         "•■^'..;: though to justify himself ''°\"' '^^ ^^'^^'^ ^« \"Of course, of course, my friend fw,^' open, and one sees what one s^s wS^,?^' ^'^ for it. Proceed.\" ' ^*\"°\"t looking Jean Jacques \" ^'' \"^^^ *° ^^''- ^^ ^as not JOf course, of course. Proceed. What did you '■1 stepped. I fell back \" Of course. Behind a tree?\" , Be , nd some elderberry bushes.\" than°l trr I Sf^^^\"^, b-hes-thafs better when it is new P^cTeT\" \"'^ °^ \"'^^^^^\"^ --« maTi ;SL?ofno''r T^i^'*- ^^^ \u003c^^d 't wine, when the woHd \"l^l?^ \"^\"^ elderberry Jacques Z his ^laTd h'^'H ^°^ ^\"'^ \u003e^ «gh he continuedT^The^^ts ^l' ^\"' ^''^ ^ stayed there for awhile «^^^.,^ \"''\"^ '\"°'\"^- ^ again, and came blck t'n ^ I \" \"'\"P* \"P ^^^^ \"11 self in.\" * *° '\"y J^ome and locked my- seiilHl^ ^\"\"^ y°\" ^°\"^ that you should lock",
         "your- The Money Master should not have seen. I do not blush that I wept for the child, who is — but you saw her, monsieur le juge.\" \"Yes, yes, the little Zo6, and the little philosopher. Proceed.\" \"What more is there to tell!\" \"A trifle perhaps as you will think,\" remarked the Judge ironically, but as one who, finding a crime, must needs find the criminal too. \"I must ask you to inform the Court who was the too polite friend of Madame.\" \"Monsieur, pardon me. I forgot. It is essential of course. You must know that there is a flume, a great wooden channel \" \"Yes, yes. I comprehend. Once I had a case of a flume. It was fifteen feet deep and it let in the water of the river to the mill-wheels. A flume regulates, concentrates, and controls the water power. I comprehend perfectly. Well?\" \"So. This flume for Jean Jacques' mill was also fifteen feet deep or more. It was out of repair, and Jean Jacques called in a master-carpenter from Laplatte, Masson by name — George Masson — to put the flume right.\" \"How long ago was that?\" \"A month ago. But Masson was not here all the time. It was his workmejt who did the repairs, but he came over to see — to superintend. At first he came twice in the week. Then he came every day.\" \"Ah, thten he came every day ! How do you know that?\" ■",
         "63 The clerk of the court ends his story It was my custom to walk to the mill every dav -to watch the work on the flume. It was only fotur miles away across the fields and through the woods raakmg a walk of much charm— especially in the autumn when the colours of the foliage are so fine and the air has a touch of pensiveness, so that one IS induced to reflection.\" There was the slightest tinge of impatience in the Judges response. \"Yes, yes, I understand. You walked to study life and to reflect and to enjoy your intimacy with nature, but also to see our friend Zo6 and her home. And I do not wonder. She has a charm which makes me sad— for her \" _^ \"So I have felt, so I have felt for her, monsieur. wTien she is gayest, and when, as it might seem I am quite happy, talking to her, or picnicking, or Idling on the river, or helping her with her lessons 1 have sadness, 1 know not why.\" The Judge pressed his friend's arm firmly His voice grew more insistent. \"Now, Maitre Fille I think I understand the story, but there are lacuns which you must fill. You say the thing happened three days ago— now, when will the work be fin- isnedr \"The work will be finished to-morrow, monsieur tas!rt°o\"„\\Tt'\"'\"^\" '^ '''*' ^\"' \"\"' ^■'\" '^'^ ^\"'' °' ^'^ \"So the thing— the comedy or tragedy will come 10 an end to-morrow.?\" remarked the Judge seri-ously. \"How did you find out that the workm^-n go to-morrow, maJtre?\" \"Jean Jacques— he told me yesterday \" 63",
         "MMmfmm^' The Money Master II f' it aU ends to-morrow,\" responded the \"Then Judge. The puzzled subordinate stood almost still and looked at the Judge in wonder. Why should it^ end to-morrow simply because the work was fin-ished at the flume .^ At last he spoke. It IS only twelve miles to Laplatte where Georee Masson hves. and he has, besides, another con3 IZ w; ^V^''^ \"\"\"\"^ ^'\"\"^ '^^ Manor Cartier. Also besides, how can we know what she will do- Jean Jacques wife^ How can we tell but that she will perhaps go and leave the beloved Zo6 alone i\" .InnV?^ , our little philosopher-miller also S\"mnity'\"\" '^\" ^\"\"^^^ quizzically, yet with ^Jl!,;/\"\"!^^'/^*^*^'^' ^^ \"^^^ a protesting fv,7\\ ^^^. ^^^\"^\"\"^ ^^\" fi\"d comfort, but the so^Sr^'.\"\"'/*. V°^ ^'\"^^'\"' ^\"^\"^ should W 't ^'^ u° '^° '^~^° Madame Carmen, to Jean Jacques; but it was no use. How could I £'shaSe!'° ' ^°\"''^ ^ *^\" ^^' '^\"\"^ I ^«^^ hv^lSV^^f brusquely and caught his friend hid m/n ''' ^*'*'\"'\"^ ^™ ^'th the eyes which had made many a witness forget to lie If you u-ere an avocat in practice I would ruin your reputation, FiUe.\" he said. \"A fool wouldTel\" Jean Jacques, or speak to the woman, a^d spoil and they do the impossible things. But did it not occur to you that the one person%o have fn a qu e room with the doors shut, with the light of the sunin 64 Si",
         "A the right n,ornt-^rd1tlrr\\*° '^^\"^ °'^'^t person was your Georgl MasH\"'' ^°\" '^^' ^^^^ of M. Car^LS^' tlZ \"^^Z '!!' \"^^^^^'^ eyes the court right on noTn.c ^.'^ ^\"\"'^'^ '\" keeping looked uponitaost ITLreTf\"^'' \"^° ^^ tion of the Judge hTmse f tW \\'' ^T\" '''^ P°«- thinking of ^he obviouTtL ' ^ \\^ '''°\"''» f^'' m alas! so disconcerting ^humiliating, and deiect^n ' ''°'' \"\" ^'\"'^«'^'\" he responded, in gx^t -:?oLT^'erothtSlT^ 'T'^-\"^- '''at eveo. -teiligence, •• was the sofT^Sy^ \"' ^\"^^ ^ ^-' \u003c^^ ^^ mo^nS'^fc^^f ^ ^-'- Jf dissent. -Not you tha/lWeTonr?u\u0026^^^^^^^ have only done it prfvaS^ IT, \"\"\"' ^^^ile you Masson must be struck of , h^ »JJ-' ''\"• '^^at 7\" is he to look a^ Aoart frn^- .-^\"^ ^°^ °f ^ class of creature is he?\" ^'' '\"°'\"^'^' ^hat -ur\" ^ t^Se°hiSro^\"°- ^\" '^■'^ -^^^ -n- ^•^^hi^d^£^^^-\"-s^ .'.'Neither, mrnsieu:'\"\"^^'-^^-^'-''' Was he a family?\" 65 4- ^^iiM^y^saaE",
         "w:^.: The Money Master \"No, monsieur.\" \" How old is he?\" \"Forty or thereabouts, monsieur.\" The Judge cogi'-R'^d for a moment, then said: \"Ah, that's bad — i -married and forty, and no vices except this. It ^''\\c6 him few escape- valves. Is he good-looking? 'VVuat is his appearance?\" \"Nor short, nor tall, and square shoulders. His face like the yellow brown of a peach, hair that curls close to his head, blue eyes that see everything, and a big hand that knows what it is doing.\" The Judge nodded. \"Ah, you have watched him, maltre. . . . When? Since then?\" \"No, no, monsieur, not since. If I had watched him since, I should perhaps have thought of the right thing to do. But I did not. I used to study him while the work was going on, when he first came, but I have known him some time from a distance. If a man makes himself what he is, you look at him, of course.\" \"Truly. His tempet^-his disposition, what is it?\" M. Pille was very much alive now. He replied briskly. \"Like the snap of a whip. He flies into anger and flies out. He has a laugh that makes men say, 'How he enjoys himself!' and his mind is very quick and siu-e.\" The Judge nodded with satisfaction. ' ' Well done ! Well done! I have got him in my eye. He will not be so easy to handle; but, if he has brains, he will see that you have the right end of the stick; and he will kiss and ride away. It will not be easy, but the game is in your hands, my Fille. In a quiet room.",
         "66 The clerk of the court ends his story with the book of the law open, and figures of dam-ages given by a Catholic court and Judge-I think Im r f '' ' ^^ '*'\"\" '^' '\"\"^ °f true philosophy chl'if^r'il!^\"'?\":!''^\"'' '^ ^^Se, you mean that I Sm-me?\"' \"^ ^'°'^'' ^^^\" ^'^ ^*™ \"Who else? You are a friend of the family. You are a pubhc officer, to whom the good name of your parish IS dear. As all are aware, no doubt, you are the trusted ancient comrade of the daughter of the woman-I speak legally-Carmen BarWlle n^e d7 ^^^nv' ''\"\" '° ^'^ '^- ^° ^-^^ y- \"There is yourself, monsieur.\" to'Sr^\"\" '\"^ ^f\"\" y°\"' ™\"'^- I K° to Quebec Tii^?;., ^°'' ^''°^' ^\"\u003c^ t'^^^^ '« not time; but do ?1 T \"\"'T' ^ ''^\"\"''^ \"°' ^ '^' best person to do this I am known to few; you are known to all. I have no locus standi. You have. No, no it would not be for me.\" ' Suddenly in his desperation, the Clerk of the Court sought release for himself from this solemn and frightening duty. \"Monsieur,\" he said eagerly, \"there is another. I it I'P'S\"\"^? • ^t \u003es Madame Carmen's father, Sebastian Dolores.\" \"Ah, a father! Yes, I had forgotten to ask about tZ tT q'I\"\"^ '\" ^' imbecility, my little Aris- wtie. ihis Sebastian Dolores, where is he?\" In the next parish, Beauhamais, keeping books",
         "6? The Money Master for a li^ber-firm. Ah, monsieur, that is the way to hef father!\" \"^'''^-'\"^^-^ Sebastian DoloL. \"What sort is he?\" The other rfiook his head and did not answer. Ah, not of the best? Drinks?\" M. Fille nodded. \"Has a weak character?\" Again M. Fille nodded. \"Has no good reputation hereabouts'\" The nod was repeated. \"He has never bev-n back to ^J r' 'r \"\"''.^^^^^' ^\"' -'-^y« »\u003e« --es back to get Jean Jacques- help. He and his daugh-ter are not close friends, and yet he likes to be nfar her. She can «idure him at least. He can command he drifts back to where she is always. But that is \"Then he is out of the question, and he would be always out of the question excep as a lasTre^,^ haC\"'\"\" \"' n''' \"\"' \"\"\"^'^ *^\" '^'^ daughte \"^d challenge our George Masson too; and tlmt is what you do not wish, eh?\" \"Precisely so,\" remarked M. Fille, dropping back e^tnfT .''°°'\"- \"^° ^ ^\"^^^ honest.^monsiS even though it gives me a task which I abhor I do not think that M. Dolores could do whatTs needed kastT ca'::'^'^\" u''* ^°\"'*^ \"°^ \"^ mended \"S least I can He stopped. w« wl-^\"\"^^^ interposed at once, well pleased with the way things were going for this \"case.\" \"Assuredly you can as can no other, my Solon. The secret of",
         "Oo _ JTie_cIerk of the court ends hi, story heaven ^vcs m^^^e 'sr^o'r' 'l^\"^- '\"\"r ^ morrow?\" ^ ° *° ^°- Shall it be to- nJt^ttrSS Ln^!!*- ^'^^ -^^- \"To-pe^ m\" Si: -S GciTEon r'\"« •\" ^-- here at Vilrav with f^» ^^^^on has a meeting -•clock to sig^^aStractriT ^\"f\"*\" ^' *^ into my offi^on a litflP f f1\" ^^ '^^\"^ '« step notgue'ss. an\" r^h^lfSlS^^^.P^.ttT- .\"^ \"■» — with the book of thn iJr ; J\"^fi^^ frowned -d the figure'^^fthe danSle\"--tfH'^^^^^ and I think oerhanrr^ ; .~*\"^ J\"dge smiled— never been ttgE?d\\e,^ \"\"^'*\"' '^\"^ - ^^ has was now as he tr,r,I !. \"\"\"\"'^^ ^^^^ore. He austeroautLXXTgt^Mm;' ''''''''' \"'^^ ^ t-^o do et: fh^smitXtl^ - - -- fronS LTniSeKo \"'° ^ '^^^'^^ ^^-^ lived alone with hTs Ister ^f ' ^^\"\"^ ^^^''^ ^ille Who whispered ^:S^:^t:^£^-",
         "69 MICROCOPY RESOLUTION TEST CHART (ANSI ond ISO TEST CHART No. 2) _^ APPLIED IM/^GE In — S-^ 1653 Cast Mom Street ^r^, Roc^le5ler, New York 146D9 USA \"-S^ (716) 482 - QIQO - Phone ^^ (716) 268- 5989 -",
         "Fo. The Money Master She smiled and whispered now in welcome to the Judge; and as she did so, the three saw Jean Jacques laughing, and cracking his whip, drive past with his daughter beside him, chirruping to the horses; while, moody and abstracted, his wife sat silent on the back-seat of the red",
         "wagon. CHAPTER VI JEAN JACQUES HAD HAD A GREAT DAY JEAN JACQUES was in great good humour as he ^ drove away to the Manor Cartier. The day which was not yet aged, had been satisfactory from every pomt of view. He had impressed the Court he had got a chance to pose in the witness-box- he had been able to repeat in evidence the numerous businesses in which he was engaged; had referred to his acquaintance with the Lieutenant-Governor and a Cardinal; to his Grand Tour (this had been hard to do in the cross-examination to which he was subjected, but he had done it); and had been able to say at the very start in reply as to what was his S:T~ ''~'' ^\"' ''''■\"' J'\"^ ^«^'\"\"' Also he had, during the day, collected a debt long since wiped off his books; he had traded a poor horse for a good cow; he had bought all the wheat of a Vi ray farmer below market-price, because the poor fellow needed ready money; he had issued an in-surance policy; his wife and daughter had conversed m the public streets with the great judge who was the doyen of the provincial Bench; and his daughter had been kissed by the same judge in the presence",
         "71 The Money Master of at least a dozen people. He was, in tact, very proud of his Carmen and his Carmencita, as he called the two who sat in the red wagon sharing his glory — so proud that he did not extol them to others ; and he was quite sure they were both very proud of him. The world saw what his prizes of life were, and there was no need to praise or brag. Dignity and pride were both sustained by silence and a wave of the hand, which in fact said to the world, \"Look you, my masters, they belong to Jean Jacques. Take heed.\" There his domestic scheme practically ended. He was so busy that he took his joys by snatches, in moments of suspension of actual life, as it were. His real life was in the eddy of his many interests, in the field of his superficial culture, in the eyes of the world. The worst of him was on the surface. He showed what other men hid, that was all. Their vanity was concealed, he wore it in his cap. They put on a manner as they put on their clothes, and wore it out in the world, or took it off in their own homes — behind the door of life; but he was the same vain, frank, cocksure fellow in his home as in the street. There was no difference at all. He was vain, but he had no conceit; and therefore he did not deceive, and was not tyrannous or dictatorial; in truth, if you but estimated him at his own value, he was the least insistent man alive. Many a debtor knew this; and, by asking Jean Jacques' advice, making an appeal to his logic, as it were — and it was .always worth listening to, even when wrong or sadly obvious, because of the glow with which he",
         "72 Jean Jacques had had a great day declared things this or that— found his situation immediately eased. Many a hard-up country-man casting about for a five-dollar bill, could get It of Jean Jacques by telling him what agreeable thing some important person had said about him; or by writing to a great newspaper in Montreal a letter, saying that the next candidate for the pro-vincial legislature should be M. Jean Jacques Bar- bille, of St. Saviour's. This never failed to draw a substantial ' ' bill ' ' from the wad which Jean Jacques always carried in his pocket— loose, not tied up in a leather roll, as so many lesser men freighted the burdens of their wealth. He had changed since the day he left Bordeaux on the Aniotne; since he had first caught the flash of interest in Carmen Dolores' eyes— an interest roused froni his likeness to a conspirator who had been shot for his country's good. He was no stoi: , in body for he was of the kind that wear away tue flesh by much doing and thinking; but there were occasional streaks of grey in his bushy hair, and his eye roamed less than it did once. In the days when he first bror-'it Carmen home, his eye was like a bead of bro .ight on a swivel. It flickered and flamed- It sav. here, saw there; it twinkled, and it pierced into life's mysteries; and all the while it was a good eye. Its whites never showed, as it were. As an animal, his eye showed a nature free from vice In some respects he was easy to live with, for he never found fault with what was given him to eat, or the way the house was managed; and he never interfered with the \"kitchen people,\" or refused a",
         "73 The Money Master dollar or ten dollars to Carmen for finery. In fact, he was in a sense too lavish, for he used at one time to bring her home presents of silks and clothes and toilet things and stockings and hats, which were not in accord with her taste, and only vexed her. Indeed, she resented wearing them, and could hardly bring herself to thank him for them. At last, how-ever, she induced him to let her buy what she wanted with the presents of money which he might give her. On the whole Carmen fared pretty well, for he would sometimes give her a handful of bills from his pocket, bidding her take ten dollars, and she would coolly take twenty, while he shrugged his shoulders and declared she would be his ruin. He had never repented of marrying her, in spite of the fact that she did not always keep house as his mother and grandmother had kept it; tiiat she was gravely remiss in going to mass; and that she quarrelled with more than one of her neighbour ,, who had an idea that Spain was an inferior country because it was south of France, just as the habitants regarded the United States as a low and inferior country because it was south of Quebec. You went north towards heaven and south towards hell, in their view; but when they went so far as to patronize or slander Carmen, she drove her verbal stilettos home without a button; so that on one occasion there would have been a law-suit for hbel if the Old Cur6 had not intervened. To Jean Jacques' credit, be it said, he took his wife's part on this occasion, though in his heart he knew that she was in the wrong. He certainly was not always in the right himself.",
         "74 Jean Jacques had had a great day If he had bee i told that he neglected his wife ho would have been justly indignant. Also, it never occurred to him that a woman did not always want to talk philosophy or discuss the price of wheat or the cost of flour-barrels; and that for a man to be stupidly and foolishly fond was dearer to a woman than anything else. How should he know-yet he ought to have done so, if he really was a philosopher —that a woman would want the cleverest man in the world to be a boy and play the fool sometimes; that she would rather, if she was a healthy woman, go to a circus than to a revelation of the mysteries of the mind from an altar of culture, if her own ^cloved man was with her. Carmen had been left too much alone, as M Fille had said to Judge Carcasson. Her spirits had mo-ments of great dullnesa, when she was ready to fling herself mto the river-or the arms of the school-master pr the farrier. When she first came to St. baviour s, the necessity of adapting herself to the new conditions, of keeping faith with herself, which she had planned on the Antoim, and making a good wife to the man who was to solve all her problems for her. prevailed. She did not at first miss so much the hfe of excitement, of danger, of intrigue, of romance, of colour and variety, which she had left behind in Spam. When her child was bom, she became passionately fond of it; her maternal spirit smothered It It gave the needed excitement in the routine of life at St. Saviour's. Yet the interest was not permanent. There came a time when she resented the fact that Jean Jacques 75 v.. n",
         "!«■; The Money Master made more of the child than he did of herself. That was a Ijad day for all concerned, for dissimulation presently became necessary, and the home of Jean Jacques was a home of mystery which no philosophy could interpret. There had never been but the one child. She was not less handsome than when Jean Jacques married her and brought her home, though the bloom of maiden youthfulness was no longer there; and she certainly was a cut far above the habitant women or even the others of a higher social class, in a circle which had an area equal to a prin-cipality in Europe. The Old Cur6, M. Langon, had had much in-fluence over her, .'or few could resist the amazing personal influence which his rare pure soul secured over the worst. It was a sad day to her when he went to his long home ; and inwardly she felt a greater loss than she had ever felt save that once when her Carvillho Gonzales went the way of the traitor. Memories of her past life far behind in Madrid did not grow fainter; indeed, they grew more distinct as the years went on. Thev seemed to vivify, as her discontent and restlessness grew. Once, when there had come to St. Saviour's a middle-aged ba-on from Paris who had heard the fishing was good at St. Saviour's, and talked to her of Madrid and Barcelona, Cordova and Toledo, as one who had seen and known and (he declared) loved them; who painted for her in spla ling im-pressionist pictures the Hfe that still eddied in the plazas and dreamed in the patios, she had been al-most carried off her feet with longing; and she near- 76 m",
         "I Jean Jacques had had a great day ly gave that longing an expression which would have brough a tragedy, while still her Zo6 was only eijht years old. But M. Lan^on, the wise priest vSe eyes saw and whose heart understood, had inter-vened in time; and she never knew that the sudden disappearance of the Baron, who still owed fifty dollars to Jean Jaeques, was due to the practiS wisdom of a great soul which had worked out its ^^17 '\" ^ '■\"''= ^\"\"'^ S^'-d'^\" °f the world When this good pnest was alive she felt she had a fnend who was as large of heart as he was just and who would not scorn the fool according to his folly, or chastise the erri-g after hi. deserts. In his greatness of soul P6re Lan?on had shut his eyes to things that pained him more than they shocked him. for he had seen life in its most various and demoralized forms, and indeed had had his own temptations when he hved in Belgium and France before he had finally decided to become a priest' s?nce hlT'r^''^ ^^T'\" \"^'^ ^ q^'^t persistency «nce her first day in the parish, and had had a sav^ ing influence over her. P^re Langon reproved those who enticized her and even slandered her, forit talk to her than women; and any summer visitor who came to fish, gave her an attention never given aXS f ' ^r.^t ^\"\"^ ^\"S'^*^^^ - the disfrict\" and the eyes of the habitant lass can be very bright at twen y. Yet whatever Carmen's coquetry and Seve?been\"'',f\" '^f \"f^\"' \"\"'' °\"'^ ^-^^ions had never been really involved till now The new cur4 M. Savry, would have said they 77 lA",
         "Jlil. The Money Master were involved now because she never came to con-fession, and indeed, si ico the Old Cur6 died, she had seldom gone to mass. Yet when, with accumulated reproof on his tongue, M. Savry did come to the Manor Cartier, he felt the inherent supremacy of beauty, not the less commanding because it had not the refinement of the duchess or the margravine. Once M. Savry ventured to do what the Old Cur6 would never have done — he spoke to Jean Jacques concerning Carmen's neglect of mass and confession, and he received a rebuff which was almost au seigneur; for in Jean Jacques' eyes he was now the figure in St. Saviour's; and this was an occasion when he could assert his position as premier of the secular world outside the walls of the parish church. He did it in good style for a man who had had no particular training in the social arts. This is how he did it and what he said: \"There have been times when I myself have thought it would be a good thing to have a rest from the duties of a Cathohc, m'sieu' le curd,\" he remarked to M. Savry, when the latter had ended his criticism. He said it with an air of conflict, and with full intent to make his supremacy complete. \"No Catholic should speak like that,\" returned the shocked priest. \"No priest should speak to me as you have done,\" rejoined Jean Jacques. \"What do you know of the reasons for the abstention of madame? The soul must enjoy rest as well as the body, and madame has a mind which can judge for itself. I have a body that is always going, and it gets too little rest,",
         "78 Jean^ \\cquea had had g ffreat day ana that keeps my soul in a iu- ter too. It must be gettmg to mass and getting to confession, and sav-ing a.c, and doing penance, it is such a busy little soul of m,ne; but we are not all alike, and ma! dame s body goes in a more stately way. I am hke a comet, she is like the sun-steady, sLdyrTound . darkness. Sometimes madame goes hard; so does nn J\"\"m f \"^^'■-'hines. shines, shines like a fur- ?rX ^'^^^'\"^ s body goes like that-at the dairy in the garden, with the loom, among the fowls S i5 1*''^ \"^^= ^\"'^ ^'^'^^ ^S^i\" it is all still and Inl t the human soul-I am a philosopher-I thmk the soul goes hard the same as the body ^.hT^^'v \"™\"^ ^\"^^y '\" ^^^ heat of the sun' and then it gets quiet and goes to sleep in the cloudy day, when the body is sick of its bouncing, and it m sieu- rh'^' '°\"' ^I \" '\"''• \"^* - g°^d for i s^i^ of 'r^.H •T''\"^ '' ^^ °\"' ^°- S^«'des. the soul of madame is her own. I have not made any ^^T^^' ' ^\" '^\"^ -P-* y^^ *° 'lo -re! Dr'est ''\"U^ ^\"\"^^^ to speak.\" protested the good c^!!L-. ^' '\"\"^ '^ ^°^ 3- ^d I am God's vi- • Jea.n Jacques waved a hand. \"T'sh vou arP Ze:J''\". ^'°\" \"^ \"°* -- antbbrYou were only a deacon a few years ago. You did not know how to hold a baby for the christening then you came to St. Saviour's first. For the mairyou 79 M m",
         "■*); The Money Master have some right to sfjcak; it is your duty perhaps; but the confession, that is another thing; tiiat is the will of every soul to do or not to do. What do you know of a woman's soul— well, perhaps, you know what they have told you; but madame's soul — \" \"Madame has never been to confession to me,\" interjected M. Savry indignantly. Jean Jacques chuckled. He had his New Cur6 now for sure. \"Confession is for those who have sinned. Is it that you say one must go to confession, and in order to go to confession it is needful to sin?\" M Savry shivered with pious indignation. He had i sudden desire to rend this philosophic Catholic —to put him under the thumb-screw for the glory of the Lord, and to justify the Church; but the little Catholic miller-magnate gave freely to St. Saviour's; he was popular; he had a position, he was good to the poor; and every Christmas- time he sent a half-dozen bags of flour to the presbytery! ^^ All P6re Savry ventured to say in reply was: \"Upon your head be it, M. Jean Jacques. I have done my duty. I shaU hope to see madame at mass next Sunday.\" Jean Jacques had chuckled over that episode, for he had conquered; he had shown M. Savry that he was master in his own household and outside it. That much his philosophy had done for him. No other r.an in the parish would have dared to speak to the Cur6 like that. He h;id never scolied Car-men when she had not gone to church. Besides, there was Carmen's Httle daughter always at his",
         "80 Jcnn Jaoniios hiul Imd n great Any side at mass; and Carmon always insi 'ed on Zo6 KoiriK vvuh h,m, an,I even sccmc-d anxious for them to be off at the first sound of the bells of St, Saviour's I heir souls were busy, hers wanter! rest; that was tJ'^L r 7''' ''l\"'^ \"1\" ^'\"\"^ '''\"^''- ' \"\"' '\" ^■'^•v'.Tly to the Curt— and to h,s own mind. His philosophy surely had vmdicated itself. ^ t\u003e,in\"* ^\"\"\"\"u J''i''^\"*'\\\"'«^ '\"■• from thinking of these thmgs as he drove back from Vilray and from his episode m Court to the Manor Cartier. He ;.as mdeed just praising himself, his wife, his chikl, and everythmg that belonged to him. H was planning plannmg, as he talked, the new th rg to do-the cheese-factory, the purchase of a steam-plough and a steam-thresher which he could hire out to his neighbours. Onl, once during the drive did \u003e turn round to Carmen, and then it was to ask x . It she had seen her father of late. \"Not for ten months,\" was her reply. \"Why do you ask?\" ^ \"Wouldn't he like to be nearer you and Zoo? Its twelve miles to Beauhamais,\" he replied .f .t'^r^\" ^^,^H'\"^ °^ °'^^\"\"S I'™ another place at the Manor.?\" she asked sharply. \"Well, there is the new cheese-factory— not to manage, but to keep the books! He's doing them all nght for the lumber-firm. I hear that he^— \" I don t want it. No good comes from relatives working together. Look at the Latouche farm where your cousin makes his mess. My father is well enough where he is \" 8",
         "8i The Money Master \"But you'd like to see him oftener— I was only thinking of that,\" said Jean Jacques in a mollifying voice. It was the kind of thing in which he showed at once the weakness and the kindness of his nature. He was in fact not a philosopher, but a sentimentalist. \"If mother doesn't think it's sensible, why do it, father?\" asked Zo6 anxiously, looking up into her father's face. She had seen the look in her mother's eyes, and also she had no love for her grandfather. Her in-stinct had at one time wavered regarding him; but she had seen an incidsnt with a vanished female cook, and though she had not understood, a prejudice had been created in her mind, fene was always con-trasting him with M. Fille, who, to her mind, was what a grandfather ought to be. \"I won't have him beholden to you,\" said Carmen, almost passionately. \"He is of my family,\" said Jean Jacques firmly and chivalrously. \"There is no question of being beholden.\" \"Let well enough alone,\" was the gloomy reply. With a sigh, Jean Jacques turned back to the study of the road before him, to gossip with Zo6, and to keep on planning subconsciously the new things he must do. Carmen sighed too, or rather she gave a gasp of agitation and annoyance. Her father? She had lost whatever illusion once existed regarding him. For years he had clung to her— to her pocket. He was given to drinking in past years, and he still had his sprees. Like the rest of the worid she had not in 82",
         "J Jean Jacques had had a great day fS'\\lt7fr? ^hf/^rtiveness in his handsome dfsmissZ. h.1 *, '^u ^^^ ^°'''\"^ ^* necessary to with his failure Iftt asSacS! re^r^^ ^?f®t , \"* *° manage a business. 1 his httle episode, as they drove home from Vilrav had an unreasonable effect upon her ^' witn an agitation which, however rUH .,„\u003c- u",
         "83 The Money Master But would the work he had been doing all be finished then? As she thought of that incident of three days ago and of its repetition on the following day, she remembered what he had said to her as she snatched herself almost violently from his arms, in a sudden access of remorse. He had said that it had to be, that there was no escape now; and at his words she had felt every pulse in her body throbbing, every vein expanding with a hot life which thrilled and tortured her. Life had been so meagre and so dull, and the man who had worshipped her on the Antoine now worshipped himself only, and also Zo6, the child, maybe; or so she thought; while the man who had once possessed her whole mind and whole heart, and never her body, back there in Spain, he, Carvillho Gonzales, would have loved her to the end, in scenes where life had colour and passion and danger and delightful movement. She was one of those happy mortals who believe that the dead and gone lover was perfect, and that in losing him she was losing all that life had in store; but the bare, hard truth was that her Gonzales could have been true neither to her nor to any woman in the world for longer than one lingering year, per-haps one lunar month. It did not console her— she did not think of it— that the little man on the seat of the red wagon, chirruping with their daughter, had been, would always be, true to her. Of what good was fidelity if he that was faithful desired no longer as he once did? A keen observer would have seen in the glowing, unrestful look, in the hot cheek, in the interfacing 84",
         "1 Jean Jacques had had a great day soTaslt.* A '°\"'r* ^^' 2°'\"^ °\" '\"^ 'he woman's soul, as she drove homeward with all that was her own m the world. The laughter of her husband and child grated pamfuUy on her ears. Why shouM they be mirthful while her life was being swept by myTasft?'\"'^''' ^^'\"P'^'^^\"' -^ \"^^ P-^oS Yet she sniiled at Jean Jacques when he lifted her down from the red wagon at the door of the Manor Cartier, even though he lifted his daughter down^^rst cami t T^t V\"^\"\" J^^'l\"^^ ^^^^' ^ they came towards the Manor, she saw George Masson in dded t'T'' ^/ \"^^ ^\"'\"''' ^\"-^ ''^ that moment de\" cided to keep her promise and meet him at a secluded pomt on the nver-bank at sunset after",
         "supper? CHAPTER VII JEAN JACQUES AWAKES FROM SLEEP 'T'HE pensiveness of a summer evening on the •*• Beau Cheval was like a veil hung over all the world. While yet the sun was shining, there was the tremor of life in the sadness; but when the last glint of amethyst and gold died away behind Mont Violet, and the melancholy swish of the river against the osiered banks rose out of the windless dusk, all the region around Manor Cartier, with its cj'presses, its firs, its beeches, and its elms, became gently triste. Even the weather-vane on the Manor — the gold Cock of Beaugard, as it was called— did not move; and the stamping of a horse in the stable was like the thtmderous knock of a traveller from Beyond. The white mill and the grey manor stood out with ghostly vividness in the Ught of the rising moon. Yet there were times innumerable when they looked like cool retreats for those who wanted rest; when, in the summer solstice, they offered the pleasant peace of the happy fireside. How often had Jean Jacques stood off from it all of a summer night and said to himself: \" Look at that, my Jean Jacques. It is all yours. Manor and mills and farms and factory— all.\" \"Growing, growing, fattening, while I drone in",
         "86 Jean Jacques awakes from sleep ul!^^^^t!^ \"\"\"' '\"= \"''\" \"^ °\"en said, with the de-lighted observation of the philosopher. ■■And me S ' J^tT^ \"\"\"\" y^'-b\"t ^ mere^boy,\" he wouTd add. I have piled it up-I have piled t up Tnd it keeps on growmg, first one thing and then another \" Coud such a man be unhappy? Findinrwithin wrshouM^fr r- 'I' ^r' ^\" °^ Sz::::^:, ^aeeT si ,\u003e. ^T K^^^' \"^ Pleasantness and ^ri V f P^f«\u003cl to him during that summer just passed when he had surveyed the World ^nd his world within the World, and it seemed to Ws mnocent mind that h. himself had mTde t al There he was, not far beyond fortv. and eligible o the Holy Roman Empire! He had thought of both these honours but there was so much to occupy hTm -he never had a moment to himself, except at Lh^ and then there was planning and accounting to do bs foremen to see, or some knotty thing to disen' tentnd ^'/'l'\" '\"t\"'^ ^'\"^^^ '\" \"^^ M-or stmck to s'ee if tt w °\"' u'J''^' \"\"^•'J\"^ ^'J-^r ^atchT to t^ 1. ? \"^'''^^^ *° ^^^ «^^°\"d, he would go sisrssi\"' ■=■■\"\"■-• \"— » '\"-is After all, a mind has to be very big and to hav? very many tentacles to hold so many tWngs ault once, and also to remember to do the rightfhing at to a^f r \"'°'\"'\"' '\"^^ *™«- He would'^even ofge \u0026st dav '7?:: '° P'\"^ °\" '^'^ ^'t^^- ^Wch in fhe first days of their married life was the recreation o? 87 i m",
         "m The Money Master liiti '■\\\\ every evening. Seldom with the later years had he asked her to sing, because he was so busy ; and some-how his ear had not that keenness of sound once be-longing to it. There was a time when he himself was wont to sing, when he taught his little Zo6 the tunes of the Chansons Canadiennes; but even that had dropped away, except at rare intervals when he would sing Le Petit Roger Bontcmps, with Petite Fleur de Bois, and a dozen others ; but most he would sing — indeed there was never a sing-song in the Manor Cartier but he would burst forth with A la Claire Fontaine and its haunting refrain: \" H y a longtemps que je t'aime, Jamais je ne t'oublidrai.\" But this very summer, when he had sung it on the birthday of the little Zo6, his voice had seemed out of tune. At first he had thought that Carmen was playing his accompaniment badly on the guitar, but she had sharply protested against that, and had appealed to M. Fille, who was present at the pretty festivity. He had told the truth, as a Clerk of the Court should. He said that Jean Jacques' voice was not as he had so often heard it; but he would also frankly admit that he did not think Madame played the song as he had heard her play it afore-time, and that covered indeed twelve years or more — in fact, since the birth of the renowned Zo6. M. Fille had wondered much that night of June at the listless manner and listless playing of Carmen Barbille. For a woman of such spirit and fire it would seem as though she must be in ill-health",
         "to Jean Jacques awakes from sleep play like that. Yet when he looked at her he saw . % he comeliness of a woman whom the l[fe of the ^u habUant had not destroyed or, indeed, dimmed Her skm was smooth, she had no wrinkles and her neck was a pillar of softly moulded white flesh around wh.ch a man might well string unse iewels If he had them; for the tint and purity of her S Crn l°\";rA\"\"^ \"'- Pladnum'or fine gold or he wo^ dt ^\" ^T \"\"^ ^^^\"y unsophisticated or he would have seen that Carmen played the guitar badly because she was not interested in Jean Jacques' tXtsta; \"°f ^^-.'^-^ that L hid come to that stage m her married life when the tenure i. pitifully msecure. He would have seen that the cnsis was near. If he had had any real obser^at on he would have noticed that Carmen's eyes Tonce bndled. and that the guitar became a c^fferen? thing when M Colombin. the young schooSnaster one of the guests, caught up the refrain of i la Claire Fontatne, and m a soft tenor voice sang it with Teln Jacques to the end. and then sang it again wi^Jfe Then Carmen's dark eyes deepened with the gather ing light m them, her body seemed to Se and fenll w:th emotion; and when M. ColoS and S^thoull ' \"'''^ '\" '^'' ^\"\"-'^ °\" the distance, and 35 though unconscious of them all, she began to sing a song of Cadiz which she had not sung s\"nce boarding the Antoine at Bordeaux. Her S had uddenly flcvn back out of her dark disc^Ment to the days when all life was before her, and ^th her Gonzales she had moved in an atmosph;rrof r^ mance. adventure and passion",
         "89 The Money Master M In a second she was transformed from the wife of the brown money-master to the girl she was when she came to St. Saviour's from the plaza, where her Carvillho Gonzales was shot, with love behind her and memory blazoned in the red of martyrdom. She sang now as she had not sung for some years. Her guitar seemed to leap into life, her face shone with the hot passion of memory, her voice rang with the pain of a disappointed life : \"Granada, Granada, thy girdens are gay. And bright arc thy stars, the high stars above; But as flowers that fade and are {;rey, But as dusk at the end of the day. Are ye to the light in the eyes of my love — In the eyes, in the soul, of my love. \"Granada, Granada, oh, when shall I see My love in thy gardens, there waiting for me? \"Beloved, beloved, have pity, and make Not the sun shut its eyes, its hot envious eyes, And the world in the darkness of night Be debtor to thee for its light. Turn thy face, turn thy face from the skies To the love, to the pain in my eyes. \"Granada, Granada, oh, when shall I see My love in thy gardens, there waiting for me!\" From that night forward she had been restless and petulant and like one watching and waiting. It seemed to her that she must fly from the life which was choking her. It was all so petty and so small. People went about sneaking into other 90",
         "I Jean Jacques awakes from sleep peoples homes like detectives; they turned yellow and grew scrofulous from too much salt pork, green tea native tobacco, and the heat of feather beds. Tlie makmg of a rag carpet was an event, the birth of a baby every year till the woman was forty-five was a commonplace; but the exit of a youth to a f^rn^T-^° ^f°'\"^ ^ P\"^^*' °^ the entrance to the nov:tiate of a young girl, were matters as im-portant as a battle to Napoleon the Great herse^lP^Thf n ^°\"' '^'T^^ '' ^\" ^° '°\"^- ^^e asked Jlmo u ^ur''^ °^ J^^\" J^^'i\"^^ had become Sf^!r T!\"l^^'\"' \"'\" ^^y '^°\"^- ^'^ retired to ^Zif^\"}\"^ \"\"'^'^^ '^^ '°^^hed, though he would have looked upon discarding it like the abdication of his social position. A feather bed was a sign of social position; it was as much the dais to his honour Horof^llrd^' ^° '\"\"^ \"-'' ^^--\"- - the She was waiting for something. There was a rest-less, vagrant spirit alive in her now. She had been so long inactive, tied by the leg, with wings clipped\" now her mind roamed into pleasant places of the Iman ^.^'\"'^^1 °^ ^°\"*^- ''^ *™« philosopher- a man of the world-would have known for what she was waiting with that vague, disordered expectancy 7^Jh^T^l^u '^r' ^-^^ \"° '\"a\" °f the world to watch and guide her this fateful summer, when tilings began to go irretrievably wrong. ^ world in his way; he saw and knew better than the",
         "91 il i: i The Money Master philosopher of the Manor Cartier. He grasped the situation with the mind of an artist in his own sphere, and with the knowledge got by experience. Thus there had been the thing which the Clerk of the Court saw from Mont Violet behind the Manor; and so it was that as Jean Jacques helped Carmen down from the red wagon on their return from Vilray, she gave him a smile which was meant to deceive ; for though given to him it v.-as really given to another man in her mind's eye. At sunset she gave it again to George Masson on the river-bank, only warmer and brighter still, with eyes that were burning, with hands that trembled, and with an agitated bosom more delicately ample than it was on the day the Antoine was v. ecked. Neither of these two adventurers into a wild world of feeling noticed that a man was sitting on a little knoll under a tree, not far away from their meeting- place, busy with pencil and paper. It was Jean Jacques, who had also come to the river-bank to work out a business problem which must be settled on the morrow. He had stolen out immediately after supper from neighbours who wished to see him, and had come here by a round-about way, because he wished to be alone. George Masson and Carmen were together for a few moments only, but Jean Jacques heard his wife say, \"Yes, to-morrow — for sure,\" and then he saw her kiss the master-carpenter — kiss him twice, thrice. After which they vanished, she in one direction, and the invader and marauder in another. If these two had seen the face of the man with a",
         "93 Jean Jacques awakes from sleep pencil and paper under the spreading beech-tree they would not have been so impatient forT: morrow, an- Carmen would not have said \"fo^ phibsoptr\" \"\" '\"'^'^ '' ''''' \"^ - -\" - i!. I ■ 4m I I",
         "i CHAPTER VIII THiS GATE IN THE WALL JEAN JACQUES was not without originality of a \u003cJ kind, and not without initiative; but there were also the elements of the very old Adam in him, and the strain of the obvious. If he had been a real genius, rather than a mere lively variation of the commonplace— a chicken that could never burst its shell, a bird which could not quite break into song — he might have made his biographer guess hard and futilely. as to what he would do after having seen his wife's arms around the neck of another man than himself— a man little more than a manual labourer, while he, Jean Jacques Barbille, had come of the people of the Old Regime. As it was, this magnate of St. Saviour's, who yesterday posed so sympathet-ically and effectively in the Court of Vilray as a figure of note, did the quite obvious thing : he deter-mined to kill the master-carpenter from Laplatte. There was no genius in that. When, from under the spreading beech-tree, Jean Jacques saw his wife footing it back to her house with a ligl t, wayward step; when he watched the master-carpenter vault over a stone fence five feet high with a smile of triumph mingled with doubt on his face, he was too 94",
         "I The Rate in the wnll stunned at first to move or speak. If a sledKc-ham- mer stnkes you on the skull. thouKh your skull is of such a hardness that it d-cs not break, still the shock numbs activity for awhile, at any rate The sledge-hammer had descended on Jean Jacques' head and also had struck him between the eyes; and it is in the credit balance of his ledger of life, that he re- framed from useless outcry at the moment. Such a stroke kills some men, either at once, or by length-ened torture; others it sends mad, so that they make a clamour which draws the attention of the aston-ished and not sympathetic world; but it only para-lysed Jean Jacques. For a time he sat fascinated by the ferocity of the event, his eyes following the Hurrying wife and the jaunty, swaggering master- carpenter with a strange, animal like dismay ,tnd apprehension. They rem.-iined fixed with a kir ■ oi blank horror and distraction on the landscape for some time after both had disappeared. At last, however, he seemed to recover his senses and to come back from the place where he had been struck by the hammer of treachery. He seemed to realize again that he was still a part of the common world, not a human being swung through the uni-verse on his heart-strings by a Gorgon. The paper and pencil in his hand brought him back from the far Gehenna where he had been, to the world again— how stony and stormy a world it was with the air gone as heavy as lead, with his feet so St.. 5°T\" \"^''^ '^^'^'\"^ that he could not stir! He had had great joy of this his worid; he had found it a place where every day were problems to be solved 95",
         "I The Money Master by an astute mind, problems which gave way before the master-thinker. There was of course unhappi- ness m his world. There was death, there was ac-cident occasionally— had his own people not gone down under the scythe of time? But in going they had left behind in real estate and other things good compensation for their loss. There was occasional suffenng and po- erty and tro'ible in his little king-dom; but a cord of wood here, a barrel of flour there a side of beef elsewhere, a little debt remitted, a bag of dned apples, or an Indian blanket— these he gave and had great pleasure in giving; and so the world was not a place where men should hang their heads, but a place where the busy man got more than the worth of his money. It had never occurred to him that he was ever translating the world into terms of himself, that he went on his way saying in effect, \"I am comnig I am Jean Jacques Barbille. You have heard of me You know me. Wave a hand to me, duck your head to me, crack the whip or nod when I pass. I am M sieu' Jean Jacques, philosopher.\" And all the while he had only been vaguely, not really, conscious of his wife and child. He did not know that he had only made of his wife an incident m his life, in spite of the fact that he thought he loved her, that he had been proud of her splendid personality; and that, with passionate chivalry, he had resented any criticism of her. He thought still, as he did on the Antoine, that Carmen's figure had the lines of the Venus of Milo, that her head would have been a model either for a 96",
         "I The gate in the wall ot Aragon. Having visited the Louvre and tht Luxembourg all in one day, he felt he wL entitld to rn^e such comparisons, and that in making them he W never dnven a sluggarf ;„ u, j,^ \"j \"th™ mce But w,fe and child and world and 15 Thjl Iheran wia. existed larielv becan=.V£„ . \u003e«y to Jean Jacques ' \" \"\"'' \"'\" ^\"^ S?.i°n.e%re\"nin1SaS\"''\"-'»'^\"'='- \" '\" The paper and pencil waked him to realitv M« tooked towards his house, he looked the wSceorl wa/r^aS '\"7 '\"' ^! '^\"^^ ^'^^^ what Sad sefn mto the gravel with his heel. There would be no '",
         "97 it ; The Money Master It 1 cheese-factory built at St. Saviour's for many a year to come. The man of initiative, the man of the hun-dred irons would not have the hundred and one, or keep the hundred hot any more; because he would be so busy with the iron which had entered into his soul. When the paper had been made one with the earth, a problem buried for ever, Jean Jacques pulled him-self up to his full height, as though facing a great thing which he must do. \"Well, of course!\" he said firmly. That was what his honour, Judge Carcasson, had said a few hours before, when the little Clerk of the Court had remarked an obvious thing about the case of Jean Jacques. And Jean Jacques said only the obvious thing when he made up his mind to do the obvious thing — to kill George Masson, the master-carpenter. This was evidence that he was no genius. Any-body could think of killing a man who had injured him, as the master-carpenter had done Jean Jacques. It is the solution of the problem of the Patagonian. It is old as Rameses. Yet in his own way Jean Jacques did what he felt he had to do. The thing he was going to do was hopelessly obvious, but the doing of it was Jean Jacques' own; and it was not obvious; and that perhaps was genius after all. There are certain inevitable things to do, and for all men to do; and they have been doing them from the beginning of time; but the way it is done — is not that genius? There is no new story in the world; all the things",
         "98 The gate in the wall that happen have happened for untold centuries- ^\"^zi^ ;itt\"n;\" ^r^^p Jacques did the thfng he had t7do Sth a'tu^^:\"? h:\\°aTfot:ssy°------^So°i :::d?be\"Sdth'e T\"\" '^ '''' ^^\"^'\"- '\" th Chictttr T^a waTs^^e-a'nd r '^T^^- '\"\"^ and it could be done at once Hp n r^' °'''''°\"'= \" Yet^he^^N^^^ '^ thtwXoThir '- befor heacts H^-''\";^' \"f '''' ^°™^\" ^^inks",
         "99 The Money Master \\ ! Hi find their difficulty at times. Tirelessly they grope along a wall, day in, day out, and then suddenly a great gate swings open, as though to the touch of a spring, and the whole way is clear to the goal. Jean Jacques went on thinking in a strange, new, intense abstraction. His restless eyes were steadier than they had ever been; his wife noticed that as he entered the house after the Revelation. She noticed also his paleness and his abstraction. For an instant she was frightened; but no, Jean JacfjUes could not know anything. Yet— yet he had come from the direction of the river! \"What is it, Jean Jacques?\" she asked. \"Aren't you well?\" He put his hand to his head, but did not look her in the eyes. His gesture helped him to avoid that. \"I have a head— la, such a head! I have been thinking, thinking— it is my hobby. I have been planning the cheese-factory, and all at once it comes on— the ache in my head. I will go to bed. Yes, I will go at once.\" Suddenly he turned at the door leading to the bedroom. \"The little Zoe— is she well?\" \"Of course. Why should she not be well? She has gone to the top of the hill. Of course, she's well, Jean Jacques.\" \"Good— good!\" heremarked. Somehow it seemed strange to him that Zoe should be well. Was there not a terrible sickness in his house, and had not that woman, his wife, her mother, brought, the infection? Was he himself not stricken by it? Carmen was calm enough again. \"Go to bed. I",
         "»lk:A The gate in the wall Jean Jacques,\" she said, \"and I'll bring you a slceping- poscet. I know those headaches. You had one when the ash-factory was burned.\" He nodded without looking at her, and closed the door behnid him. When she came to the bedroom a half-hour later his face was turned to the wall. She spoke, but he did not answer. She thought he was asleep. He was not asleep. He was only thinking how to do the thing which was not obvious, which was also safe for himself. That should be his triumph, if he could but achieve it. When she came to bed he did not stir, and he did not answer her when she spoke. \"The poor Jean Jacques!\" he heard her say, and If there had not been on him tha same courage that possessed him the night when the Anioine was wrecked, he would have sobbed. He did not stir. He kept thinking; and aU the time, her words, \"The poor Jean Jacques!\" kept weaving themselves through his vague designs. Why had she said that— she who had deceived, betrayed him? Had he then seen what he had seen? She did not sleep for a long time, and when she did It was uneasily. But the bed was an immense one, and she was not near him. There was no sleep tor him— not even for an hour. Once, in exhaus-tion, he almost rolled over into the poppies of un-consciousness; but he came back with a start and a groan to sentient life again, and kept feeling, feeling along the wall of purpose for a masterly way to kill At dawn it came, suddenly spreading out before",
         "J The Money Master h^^ f\\t ''i, \"'■^- \"^ ^\"\"^ ^\"\"'\"'-^ standing at the head of the flume out there by the Mill CartL w^th h.s hand on the lever. Below him in th™ y flume was the master-carpenter giving a laT^n pentrff h'\"' T^'\"'- B^y-d'the^masSr-clr-\" ^ZT^~ \\ 7°''^~^^' *^^ g^eat mill-wheel! Be- hmd h:mself, Jean Jacques, was the river held back by the dam; and if the lever was opened, the river would sweep through the raised gates down the flume to the n.ill-wheel-with the man. AnTthen be J the ri' '\"\"^ ^\"\"^ ^\"\"^' -'^ '^^ -- -uU safl' r/ t\"°* ^t\"\"'\"\"'' '* ^^' °\"^*\"^'; ^nd it looked 'id£n/\"^\"ocSr • \"°\" ^^^^'^ ^°\"^\u003c^ -'^'^ - -|, r",
         "i!i CHAPTER IX \"MOI— JE SUIS PHILOSOPHE\" fen J.c,„'.. tohT\"S.S 1™ ™r?™°' ''\"\"' body Sa'rn'fofsof ''T-^\"^^ ^\"'^ ^'^^ -^^d a^d passed the'daysoSyouth^' \"^ *^°\" \"'° ^^''^ 103",
         "III The Money Master i li I .11 It seemed to her that Jean Jacques had ceased to care for the charms which once he had so proudly proclaimed. There was in her the strain of the rehgion of Epicurus. She desired always that her visible corporeal self should be admired and de-sired, that men should say, \"What a splendid crea-ture! It was in her veins, an undefined philosophy of life; and she had ever measured the love of Jean Jacques by his caresses. She had no other vital standard. This she could measure, she could grasp It and say, \"Here I have a hold; it is so much har-vested.\" But if some one had written her a poem a thousand verses long, she would have said, \"Yes all very fine, but let me see what it means; let me feel that it is so.\" She had an inherent love of luxury and pleasure w-hich was far more active in her now than when she married Jean Jacques. For a Spanish woman she had matured late; and that was because, in her youth, she had been active and athletic, unliJce most Spanish girls; and the microbes of a sensuous life or what might have become a sensual life, had not good chance to breed. It all came, however, in the dullness of the winter days and nights, in the time of deep snows, when they could go abroad but very little. Then her body and her mind seemed to long for the indolent sun-spaces of Spain. The artificial heat of the big stoves in the rooms with the low ceilings only irri-tated her, and she felt herself growing more ample from lassitude of the flesh. This particular autumn It seemed to her that she could not get through an- 104 I",
         "I 'Moi—je suis philosophc undefined. ^ ^'^^ ''^'1 ^he desire for pleasures tooItr:?SsfaTo^e\"Tt' ^\"' '''= \"\"\"^^^^^ spontand y due to fhe ft? Trrr'^u''^ '\"\"\"^ ^^•■'1' Prised into^S^rndtr':f htle^tX'X ^\"^- primitive Jesuit ijTl:/ \\ u '\"'^\"'K«\"ce of a and by sLrtrce of Trn'\"''\"\"*^ '° *'^ ^°\"^\"-'- passion\\e haV^^^^f ^^0^^^\" ^\"' ^^'^'^^ °^ the^M^lf crnir^hS tu hf htl t^ \"i' '\"\"'^ ^' ing'^'ht'sawt ''^^^.--Cartier this fateful mom- W ilvf T \"\"^ ^''^ ^'\"dow, and he waved Ws n h ar^He I' \"^'^^ ^^'\"*^*'- whieh she did \"mv ht . ,?. u\"^\"^ ^''^' \"*'\u003c' did not hear or see My beauty!\" he said aloud. \"My splendid ^r?' ■ny charmer of Cadiz ! My wonder of^tlJltia'",
         "los The Money Master my Moorish maid! My bird of freedom — hand of Charlemagne, your lips are sweet, yes, sweet as one- and-twenty!\" His lips grew redder at the thought of the kisses he had taken, his cheek flushed with the thought of those he meant to take; and he laughed greedily as he lowered himself into the flume by a ladder, just under the lever that opened the gates, to begin his inspection. It was not a perfunctory inspection, for he was a good craftsman, and he had pride in what his work-men did. 1 i: \"Ah!\" It was a sound of dumbfounded amazement, a hoarsp cry of horror which was not in tune with the beauty of the morning. •'Ahr' It came from his throat like the groan of a trapped and wounded lion. George Masson had almost finished his inspection, when he heard a noise behind him. He turned and looked back. There stood Jean Jacques with his hand on the lever. The noise he had heard was the fourteen-foot ladder being dropped, after Jean Jacques had drawn it up softly out of the flume. \"Ah! Norn de Dieul\" George Masson exclaimed again in helpless fury and with horror in his eyes. By instinct he understood that Carmen's husband knew all. He realized what Jean Jacques meant to do. He knew that the lever locking the mill- wheel had been opened, and that Jean Jacques had 1",
         "06 'Moi— jc ~jc siiis philosophe ' hisjiand on the lever which raised the gate of the By instinct-for there was no time for thought he d\u003ed the only thing which could help him H eS7 himtr tL*° J- Jacucs, a gturih'TtS mm wait. Time was his only friend in thk—^o^ mmute, two minutes, three minutes an'thSgX .f he gates were opened, he would b^ s^t into th. S„?S.^\"' ''-''' ^\"\"''^ \"^ ^'^ enZ-^'the'^vS! seeoS'-'\" ''\" '*\"'•* °\"* ^^*\" ^'' g^«t\"^'\u003e- \"One He ran forward till he was about thirty feet from Jean Jacques standing there above him ^v^th T set face and the dark malicious, half-insane eves Even ,n his ear and ghastly anxiety, the \"ubcon scious mind of George Masson was saying ''He looks\" irVfhaf IThI.^^^^^^^^'^-'''^^ ''^^ b\"L of Beau ga d that killed the man who abused his wife \" of R^f\" '°;. '^';!^*-g^eat-g'-and-nephew of t? e Baron ttaitSim wvT; J^^\" J^'^^\"^^ '^\"^^^ '*e he gafn more Tn' \"'\"\"'' °' '™'^' ^^ '\"'^ht be able to ceS Self Tr^ ''''•t\"° \"\"'^ '^°\"''^ '^\"^^ h™ «- on thi T ^'- \"^^^ J^'\"*\" J'-^^q^es with his hand or t'7/nr '\"\" \"\"' ^^^ ''^'\"^ -- do-ll T * rescuer was even within one foot of Jean Jacques, the deed could still be done It Ul",
         "107 The Money Master so much easier opening than shutting the gates of the flume! \"Why should I wait, devil and rogue?\" The words came from Jean Jacques' lips with a snarl. \"I am going to kill you. It will do you no good to whine — cochon!\" To call a man a pig is the worst insult which could be offered by one man to another in the parish of St. Saviour's. To be called a pig as you are going to die, is an ofTcnsivc business indeed. \"I know you are going to kill me— that you can kill me, and I can do nothing,\" was the master- carpenter's reply. \"There it is— a turn of the lever, and I am done. Bicn sAr, I know how easy! I do not want to die, but I will not squeal even if T am a pig. One can only die once. And once is enough ... No, don't— not yet! Give me a minute till I tell you something; then you can open the gates. You will have a long time to live — yes, yes, you are the kind that live long. Well, a minute or two is not much to ask. If you want to murder, you will open the gates at once; but if it is punishment, if you are an executioner, you will give me time to pray.\" Jean Jacques did not soften. His voice was harsh and grim. \"Well, get on with your praying, but don't talk. You are going to die,\" he added, his hands gripping the lever tighter. The mastcr-carpcntcr had had the true inspira-tion in his hour of danger. He had touched his appeal with logic, he had offered an argument. Jean Jacques was a logician, a philosopher! That point made about the difference between a murder 1",
         "08 \"Aloi— jo suis pliilosoDlic\" ^o^SS^^-^-^' Reside it wa. an the end of to-day I vwdd W. 1 \"\" \"''''l''' ^' if you hadn't found ou I In' ^ \"\", \"^\"\"/'■'^^'■' word. But see as\\, hii^ u ..\"''''''''\" ^^ ^he jerked a hauS- assent- rfv'^'f\" J''*^^\"'-'^ want to know how Shy hi' ' c^^l'f ^ T \"'\" as she .'\" t: nSlntf y^et\"\"^^^ ^ '\"\"^'^ ^° '''-^ Listi:^M.£?S^-;:^i---e as death, as I died.^ '^''^^^d^' understanding what I said wh;?^L°a\"Tips'anTS's-^^'^\" l^^^\"\"^^ ^-''^ eyes. ^ \"\"^ ^'''= '^\"n '\" his agonized George Masson continued his pleadin\u003cr -v -e always a .an of mind\"-Jeaf jt^L' fiS",
         "109 The Money Master agitation visibly subsided, and a surly sort of vanity crept into his face — \"and you married a girl who cared more for what you did than what you thought — that is sure, for I know women. I am not married, and I have had much to do with many of them. I will tell you the truth. I left the West because of a woman — of two women. I had a good business, but I could not keep out of trouble with women. They made it too easy for me.\" \"Peacock-pig!\" exclaimed Jean Jacques with an ugly sneer. ' ' Let a man when he is dying tell all the truth, to ease his mind,\" said the master-carpenter with a machiavellian pretence and cunning. \"It was van-ity, it was, as you say; it was the peacock in me made me be the friend of many women and not the husband of one. I came down here to Quebec from the Far West to get away from consequences. It was expensive. I had to sacrifice. Well, here I am in trouble again— my last trouble, and with the wife of a man that I respect and admire, not enough to keep my hands off his wife, but still that I admire. It is my weakness that I could not be, as a man, honourable to Jean Jacques Barbille. And so I pay the price ; so I have to go without time to make my will. Bless heaven above, I have no wife \" \"If you had a wife you would not be dying now. You would not then meddle with the home of Jean Jacques Barbille,\" sneered Jean Jacques. The note was savage yet. \"Ah, for sure, for sure! It is so. And if I lived I would marry at once.\"",
         "no 71 \"Moi — je suis philosophe' Desperate as hi- conditioT, was, the master- carpenter could aim .st liave lai:,ned at the idea of mamage preventing 'lun from following the bent of his nature. He was the ucm lover. If he had been as high as the Czar, or as low as the ditcher, he would have been the same; but it would be mad-ness to admit that to Jean Jacques now. \"But, as you say, let me get on. My time has come \" Jean Jacques jerked his head angrily. \"Enough of this. You keep on saying 'Wait a little,' but your time has come. Now take it so, and don't repeat.\" \"A man must get used to the idea of dying, or he will die hard,\" replied the master-carpenter, for he saw that Jean Jacques' hands were not so tightly clenched on the lever now; and time was every-thing. He had already been near five minutes and every minute was a step to a chance of escape — somehow. \"I said you were to blame,\" he continued. \"Listen Jean Jacques Barbille. You, a man of mind, married a girl who cared more for a touch of your hand than a bucketful of your knowledge, which every man in the province knows is great. At first you were almost always thinking of her and what a fine woman she was, and because everyone admired her, you played the peacock, too. I am not the only peacock. You are a good man— no one ever said anything against your character. But always, always, you think most of yourself. It is everywhere you go as if you say, Look out. I am coming. I am Jean Jacques III .1",
         "4 The Money Master Barbille. Make way for Jean Jacques. I am from the Manor Cartier. You have heard of me ' That is the way you say things in your mind. But all the time the people say, 'That is Jean Jacques Barbille, but you hould see his wife. She is a wonder. She is at home at the Manor with the cows and the geese. Jean Jacques travels alone through the pansh to Quebec, to Three Rivers, to Tadousac to the great exhibition at Montreal, but madame' she stays at home. M'sieu' Jean Jacques is nothing beside her —that is what the people say. They admire you for your brains, but they would have fallen down before your wife, if you had given her naif a chance.\" \"Ah, that's bosh— what do you knowi\" ex-claimed Jean Jacques fiercely, but he was fascinated too by the argument of the man whose life he was going to take. *!,•\"! ^\"T/*^® *™*''' \"y money-man. Do you think she d have looked at me if you'd been to her what she thought I might be? No, Men sM Did you take her where she could see the world? No Did you bring her presents? No. Did you say Come along we will make a little journey to see the world? No. Do you think that a woman can sit and dam your socks, and tidy your room, and Dake you pan-cakes in the morning while you roast your toes, and be satisfied with just that, and not long tor something outside?\" Jean Jacques was silent. He did not move. He was being hypnotized by a mind of subtle strength, by the logic of which he was so great a",
         "lover \"Moi— je suis philosophe\" I The master-carpenter pressed his logic home. vSh'mZ \"'' '\" y°\"'-ihadow ahvays. She must wait till you come. And when you come, it was, Here am I, your Jean Jacques. Pall dc^wn and worship me. I am your husband.' Did y^ ev\" r world, the rising and the setting sun the star th^,*- shines, the garden where all the flowers' of lov- gr^w ,' Did you ever do that.? But no, there was only one person m the world -there was only you. Jean Jacques. You were the only pig in the sty.\" ^^ irSoT^rovS '-' °^ J-\" J-- -^ ^^ sh37n°\"'f'°\"'^-''' '\"\"^ *^\" master-carpenter, sharply now, for in spite of the sudden savagery on Jean Jacques' part, he felt he had an advantage and now he would play his biggest card. ^ ' You can kill me. It is there in your hand. No one can stop you But will that give you anything\" \\\\Tiat ,s my life? If you taJce it away, will you be happier,? It is happiness you want. Your w^e- m ri r^,?T' '^ ^°\" ^^^ ^^' ^ chance. If you Se TnH f\"^' t^^ T '\"^'^\"S^ ^\" 'J^^th, for it is he end of all things for you. You lose your wife for ever You need not do so. She would hTve gone with me, not because of me, but because I was a man who she thought would treat her like a friend, like a comrade; who would love her-5acr^ what husband co,,ld help make love to such a woman unless he was in love with himself instead of h^r\"= ■^^ 113 I M In i",
         "ij The Money Master _ Jean Jacques rocked to and fro over the lever m h:s agitation, yet he made no motion to move it He was under a spell. Straight home drove the master-carpenter's rea- somng now \"Kill me, and you lose her for ever Kill me, and she will hate you. You think she will not find out.? Then see: as I die I will shriek out so loud that she can hear me, and she will understand. £\u003ene will go mad, and give you over to the law. And then-and then! Did you ever think what will become of your child, of your Zoe, if you go to the gallows? That would be your legacy and your blessing to her-the death of a murderer; and she would be left alone with the woman that would hate you in death ! Voild~do you not see ?\" Jean Jacques saw. The terrific logic of the thing smote him. His wife hating him, himself on the scaffold his little Zoe disgraced and dishonoured all her life; and himself out of it aU, unable to help her and bnnging irremediable trouble on her' As a chemical clears a muddy liquid, leaving it pure and atomless, so there seemed to pass over Jean Jacques face a thought like a revelation He took his hand from the lever. For a moment he stood like one awakened out of a sleep. He put his hands to his eyes, then shook his head as though to free it of some hateful burden. An instant later he stooped, lifted up the ladder beside him, and let It down to the floor of the flume. \"There, go— for ever,\" he said. Then he turned away with bowed head He staggered as he stepped down from the bridge of the",
         "114 'Moi— je suis philosophe \" flume, where the lever was. He swayed from side to ' ^Sam— Me, I am a",
         "philosopher!\" CHAPTER X QUiEN sade\" — WHO knows! T'HIS much must be said for George Masson, ■•■ that after the terrible incident at the flume he would have gone straight to the Manor Cartier to warn Carmen, if it had been possible, though perhaps she already knew. But there was Jean Jacques on his way back to the Manor, and nothing remained but to proceed to Laplatte, and give the woman up for ever. He had no wish to pull up stakes again and begin life afresh, though he was only forty, and he had plenty of initiative left. But if he had to go, he would want to go alone, as he had done before. Yes, he would have liked to tell Carmen that Jean Jacques knew everything; but it was impossible. She would have to face the full shock from Jean Jacques' own battery. But then again perhaps she knew already. He hoped she did. At the very moment that Masson was thinking this, while he went to the main road where he had left his horse and buggy tied up. Carmen came to know. Carmen had not seen her husband that morning until now. She had waked late, and when she was dressed and went into the dining-room to look for",
         "ii6 \"Quien sabe\"— who knows! omL m/h ^^^'''^fl°^ ^vhich was the reflection hL ^ ^ad dreams of the night, she found that he had had his breakfast eariier than usual and had gone to he mill. She also learned that he had eaten very httle and that he had sent a man into vS for somethmg or other. Try as she would to t fle Dreaktast. bhe kept her eyes on the door and the wmdow watching for Jean Jacques, fnr r J '\u003c^P^°^«'^ herself for her stupid concern tor Jean Jacques would have spoken last night, if he had discovered anything. He was not the man to hold h.s tongue when he had a chance of talking. He would be sure to make the most of any opporfunitv for display of intellectual emotion, and he would have burst his buttons if he had known. That was the Sn s\"V' \" V'^\"'^™'^'- \"'^'^^ -- \"°* A\"ia! usian. Such men love a grievance, because it gives hem an opportunity to talk-with a good case and to ...me point, not into the air at imaginary things as she had so often seen Jean Jacques do. She tofw her Jean Jacques. That is, she thought she knew her Jean Jacques after living with him for over tWr en years; but hers was a very common mTstaL\" It IS not time which gives revelation, or which turns a character inside out, and expo es a new and amazing, maybe revolting side to it. She had never really seen Jean Jacques, and he had never reaTfv seen himself, as he was, but only as circumstances made him seem to be. What he^d shoTd of h nature all these forty odd years was only the femient of a more or less shallow life, in spite'^of its many 117 •'",
         "IS The Money Master interests: but here now at last was life with the Sdv'srer'\" ^ ,'T ^''=\" °^ experience and tragedy. She knew as httle what he would do in such denTorthe' fl \"\" '^\"^\" '^^°^^'^^\"'^- ^« ^he nd dent of the flume just now showed, he knew little indeed for he had done exactly he opposite of wSh''^, \"r ' '° f°' ^' \"^^ P°-'We thaTcar^en would also do exactly the opposite of what she m^n\" to do in her own crisis. \"leanc Her test was to come. Would she, after all, go off with the master-carpenter, leaving behind her the was z;6'T' '°\\*''^ '^\"^^ ■ ■ ■ 2°e-ah, where was Zoe? Carmen became anxious about Zo6 she knew not why. Was it the revival of the mM t J^,T' w'^ '^* ^°^ ^\"\"^ g°\"^ °ff °n her pony to ni .»,''''' °^ ^\"\"'^ '''•\"^^ '° a poor old woman down the nver three miles away. She would be^ne ft r.\"^\",% ^^ '° '\"\"^'^' ^^^^ ^^« favouring hTr for the child's presence would but heighten the emo tion of her exit from that place where her youth had toTak^?'- ^'\"^''^ ^^^ ^^^ '\"^-^^ ^he had meant to take away were secreted in a safe place some distance from the house, beside the path she mea^t to take when she left Jean Jacques for ever George Masson wanted her, they were to meet to-day and £ S^ Set'\" and surveyed herself with a sSrcJ mg eye. Certainly she was young enough (she said",
         "ii8 \"Quien sabe\"— who knows! 1 taster, so that she could feel thp =t;r r,\u003c- iv l • , t'he'fr^ 5°^ ^T' «-i'htt^f h?da„%t3 the far-off day when Gonzales was by her sidf Jf ^^f ^' *'\"■ ^'^^'■- She was sorry she ;;ould to W ;, J\"\"''^ ''\"S t° ^^'\"eone who cared are to ^^^ l^- '° ^°™^ \"''° -\"\"'^ make her would s.\"e to tt ''\"'/\"'■ \"\"\"'^ '\"^P\"^^^\"*- She \"uuiu sing to the master-carnenter Thr.„„u u had not asked her to go with hT\"-^nly tt ^St in a secret place in the hills-she meant to doTo W .mrn-pH' T f ™^ '^^ '^\"\"''l probably not have wreck1f-lr/T'^\"\"v'^ '* ^\"\"^ \"°t been for the TnTt, u I ^«'''^«^' but the wreck had occurred over so far as she was concerned. She had Hpw ^TV°. ^° \"^\"^ ^'h the master-ca^enter S though he m\u003eght feel the same hesitZT ^' th\"? 119",
         "^f The Money Master . i ■Mi'l which Jean Jacques had sho\\\u003e-n— she had read her Norman aright aboard the Antoinc~yet, still, George Masson should take her away. A catastrophe had thrown Jean Jacques into her arms; it would not be a catastrophe which would throw the master- carpenter into her arms. It would be that they wanted each other. The mirror gave her a look of dominance — was it her regular features and her classic head? Does beauty in itself express authority, just because it has the transcendent thing in it? Does the perfect form convey » • nnthing of the same thing that physi-cal force — an uimy in arms, a battleship — conveys? In any case it was there, that inherent masterfvJ- ness, though not in its highest form. She was not an aristocrat, she was no daughter of kings, no duch-ess of Castile, no dona of Segovia; and her beauty belonged to more primary manifestations; but it was above the lower forms, even if it did not reach to the highest. \"A handsome even splendid woman of her class\" would have been the judgment of the connoisseur. As she looked in the glass at her clear skin, at the wonderful throat showing so soft and palpable and tower-like under the black velvet ribbon brightened by a paste ornament fastened to it; as she saw the smooth breadth of brow, the fulness of the lips, the limpid lustre of the large eyes, the well-curved ear, so small and so like ivory, it came home to her, as it had never done before, that she was wasted in this obscure parish of St. Saviour's. There was not a more restless .soul or body in all",
         "•1-^' \"QmVn .s!il,(.\"- „Ii„ ktiDw.s! ^ii^LL. \"1^ Hands ck'nchcd at hk ti.li. i,;.i, i came ui) stifilv -Mirl .t- i ', '^ ■^\"-'^' '\"s head th^iT,^^*^\"\"' ''-'\"■''\"\"\"^ *'^° doonv-ay. Her first their lif^Toge her H-''\"T^ °^ \"'° \"\"^^'^^^ °^ wanted thcdu t of e.Jf \"''^°'°\"' \"^*\"^ ^\" ^°P°s° a tne du.t of existence swept into a comer out",
         "m The Money Master 1 of sight; yet when she was roused, and there were no comers into which the dust could be swept, she could be as bold as any better woman. She hesitated till it was too late to ro, and then as he entered the house from the staring sunlight and the peace of the morning, she straightened herself, and a sulky, stubborn look came into her eyes. He might try to kill her, but she had seen death in many forms far away in Spain, and she would not be afraid till there was cause. Imagination would not take away her courage. She picked up a half-knitted stocking which lay upon the table, and standing there, while he came into the middle of the room, she began to ply the needles. He stood still. Her face was bent over her knit-ting. She did not look at him. \"Well, why don't you look at me?\" he asked in a voice husky with passion. She raised her head and looked straight into his dark, distracted eyes. \"Good morning,\" she said calmly. A kind of snarling laugh came to his lips. \"I said good morning to my wife yesterday, but I will not say it to-day. What is the use of saying good morning, when the morning is not good!\" \"That's logical, anyhow,\" she said, her needles going faster now. She was getting control of them — and of herself. \"Why isn't the morning good? Speak. Why isn't it good, Carmen?\" \"Quien sabe — who knows!\" she replied with exasperating",
         "coolness. '(iiiicn saJ)e\"--who knows! and it is enough for a lifetime,\" \"I— I knmv all; he challcnKod. \"What do yo„ know-what is the 'air?\" Her voice had lost tinibre. It «as suddenly weak bu from suspense and excitement rather' than from saw^TJ/°\" '^ V ,\"'^''^ ^''^ ''\"\"■ by the river. I saw ,vhat you did. I heard you say 'Yes tn morrow, for sure.' I saw what you did \" ' did ^n^'^' \"\"u ^\"'y '\"''^ \"^'^ '^'\"'■\"■•\"K now. She what had he done-«./,a\u003c had he done? She waUed for she knew not what. George Masson was to come and inspect the flume efrly that mrin'g': ■ ^e? She had not seen him. But the the ,. „ . h. 7? °\"^^ ^^\"^ ^\"'\"•'- ^^^ '=°\"'d hear ileal tur«?ngi ^\"™\"^-^'^« -\"'^ hear the mill- As she did not speak, with a curious huskv was thP '„ r,\"\"'^' ^ ^* *^ l^^^-- above, there was the mill-wheel unlocked. There it wa\u003c, T gnpped the lever, and \" ^ Her great eyes stared with horror. The knittin.^ felf S t^P;^= V^\"\"-- ^^-P' — her face Sh'e ntence r m^''^\" ''^^ ^'^\"'''^ '^e court-martial sentence Carvillho Gonzales to death ^he mill-wheel sounded louder and louder in her",
         "\"3 The Money Master l»l i\\' J '!■ ':l ' « \"You let in the river!\" she cried. \"You drove him into the wheel — you killed him!\" \"What else was there to do?\" he demanded. \"It had to be done, and it was the safest way. It would be an accident. Such a thing might easily happen.\" \"You have murdered him!\" she gasped with a wild look. \"To call it murder!\" he sneered. \"Surely my wife would not call it murder.\" \"Fiend — not to have the courage to fight him!\" she flung back at him. \"To crawl like a snake and let loose a river on a man I In any other country, he'd have been given a chance.\" This was his act in a new light. He had had only one idea in his mind when he planned the act, and that was punishment, '''''hat rights had a man who had stolen what was nearer and dearer than a man's own flesh, and for which he would have given his own flesh fifty times? Was it that Carmen would now have him believe he ought to have fought the man, who had spoiled his life and ruined a woman's whole existence? \"What chance had I when he robbed me in the dark of what is worth fifty times my own life to me?\" he asked savagely. \"Murderer — murderer!\" she cried hoarsely. \"You shall pay for this.\" \"You will tell — you will give me up?\" Her eyes were on the mill and the river . . . \"Where — where is he? Has he gone down the river? Did you kill him and let him go — like that!\"",
         "124 'Quien saho\"— who knows! Slie made a flinging gesture, as one would toss a stone. He stared at her. He had never seen her face like that— so strained and haggard. George Masson was nght when he said that she would give him up- that his life would be in danger, and that his child's life would be spoiled. ''Murderer!\" she repeated. \"And when you go to the gallows your child's life-you did not think ot that, eh? To have your revenge on the man who was no more to blame than I, thinking only of yourself, you killed him; but you did not think of your child.\" Ah, yes, surely George Masson was right! That was what he had said about his child, Zo6. What a good thing it was he had not killed the ravager of nis home ! But suddenly his logic came to his aid. In terrible misery as he was, he was almost pleased that he could reason. \"And you would give me over to the law? You would send me to the gallows-and spoil your child's life?\" he retorted She threw the knitting down and flung her hands up. \"I have no husband. I have no fi i ;,• ^^\"\"f ^\"\"\"^ \"^'=- Take it. I ,vill go and find his body,\" she said, and she moved swiftly towards the door. \"He has gone down the river- I will find him!\" \"He has gone up the river,\" he exclaimed. ''Up thenver, I say!\" ^ She stopped short and looked at him blankly, inen his meaning became clear to her. \"S",
         "-f^l The Money Master i t 1 1 \"You did not kill him?\" she asked scarce above a whisper. \"I let him go,\" he replied. \"You did not fight him — why?\" There was scorn in her tone. \"And if I had killed him that way?\" he asked with terrible logic, as he thought. \"There was httle chance of that,\" she replied scornfully, and steadied herself against a chair; for, now that the suspense was over, she felt as though she had been passed between stones which groiuid the strength out of her. A flush of fierce resentment crossed over his face. \"It is not everything to be big,\" he rejoined. \"The greatest men in the world have been small like me, but they have brought the giant things to their feet.\" She waved a hand disdainfully. \"What are you going to do now?\" slie asked. He drew himself up. He seemed to rearrange the motions of his mind with a little of the old vanity, which was at once grotesque and piteous. ' ' I am going to forgive you and to try to put things right,\" he said. \"I have had my faults. You were not to blame altogether. I have left you too much alone. I did not understand everything all through. I had never studied women. If I had I should have done the right thing always. I must begin to study women.\" The drawn look was going a little from his face, the ghastly pain wiis fading from his eyes; his heart was speaking for her, while his vain intellect hunted the solution of his problem.",
         "126 \"Quien sabe\"— who knows! She could scarcely believe her ears. No Spaniard would ever have acted as this man was doing. She had come from a land of No Forgiveness. CarviUho Gonzales would have killed her, if she had been un-true to him; and she would have expected it and understood it. But Jean Jacques was going to forgive her— gomg to study women, and so understan ' her and understand women, as he understood philosophy! This was too fantastic for human reason. She stared at him, unable to say a word, and the distracted look m her face did not lessen. Forgiveness did not solve her problem. \"I am going to take you to Montreal— and then out to Winnipeg, when I've got the cheese-factory gomg,\" he said with a wise look in his face, and with tenderness even coming into his eyes. \"I know what mistakes I've made\"— had not George Masson the despoiler told him of them?— \"and I know what a scoundrel that fellow is, and what tricks of the tongue he has. Also he is as sleek to look at as a bull, and so he got a hold on you. I grasp things now. Soon we will start away together again as we did at Gaspe.\" He came close to her. \"Carmen!\" he said, and made as thm.gh he would embrace her. \"Wait— wait a little. Give me time to think,\" she said with dry lips, her heart beating hard. Then she added with a flattery which she knew would tell, \"I cannot think quick as you do. I am slow. I must have time. I want to work it all out. Wait till to-night,\" she urged. \"Then we can \"",
         "137 The Money Master \"Good, we will make it all up to-niKlu.\" he said and he patted her shoulder as one would that of a child. It had the slight flavour of the superior and the paternal. She almost shrank from his touch. If he had kissed her she would have felt that she must push him away; and yet she also knew how good a man he",
         "was. CHAPTER XI THE CLERK OF THE COURT KEEPS A PROMISE \" \\V^^^' '^''^\"'^ '^ ''^' ^I'sieu' Fille? What do you want with mc? IVe got a lot to do be- tore sundown, and it isn't far ofif. Out with it \" George Masson was in no good humour; from the look on the face of the little Clerk of the Court he had no idea that he would disclose any good news It was probably some stupid business about •'monev not bemg paid into the Court,\" which had been left over from cases tried and lost; and he had had a number of cases that sumnaer. His head was not so clear to-day as usual, but he had had little diffi-culties^ with M'sieu' Fille before, and he was sure tiiat there was something wrong now. ''Do you want to make me a present?\" he added with humorous impatience, for though he was not ma good temper, he liked the Clerk of the Court who was such a figure at Vilray. The opening for his purpose did not escape M. lUe. He had been at a loss to begin, but here was a natural opportunity for him. .hl^A^h ^°°-^ '\"''''^° '' \"°' \"'^^'''ys a present, but I saS^!fii«reS:rr; '''-'' ^^ '''''• \"-^^-'' '^ 0",
         "129 0 The Money Master \"Oh, advice — to give me advice — that's why you've brought me in here, when I've so much to do I can't breathe! Time is money with me, old 'un.\" \"Mine is advice which may be money in your pocket, monsieur,\" remarked the Clerk of the Court with meaning. \"Money saved is money earned.\" \"How do you mean to save me money — by getting the Judge to give decisions in my favour? That would be money in my pocket for sure. The Court has been rumiing against my interests this year. When I think I was never so right in my life — bang goes the judgment of the Court against me, and into my pocket goes my hand. I don't only need to save money, I need to make it; so if you can help me in that way I'm your man, M'sieu' la Fillette?\" The Httle man bristled at the misuse of his name, and he flushed slightly also; but there was always something engaging in the pleasure-loving master- carpenter. He had such an eloquent and warm temperament, the atmosphere of his personality was so genial, that his impertinence was insulated. Certainly the master-carpenter was not unpopular, and people could not easily resist the grip of his physical influence, while mentally he was far in-deed from being deficient. He looked as little like a villain as a man coidd, and yet — and yet a nature like that of George Masson (even the little Clerk could see that) was not capable of being true beyond the minute in which he took his oath of fidelity. While the fit of willingness was on him he would be true; yet in reality there was no truth at all — only self-indulgence unmarked by duty or honour.",
         "130 The clerk of the court keeps a promise \"Give me a judgment for defamation of character. Give me a thousand dollars or so for that, m'sieu', and you'll do a good turn to a deserving fellow- citizen and admirer — one little thousand, that's all, m'sieu'. Then I'll dance at your wedding and weep at your tomb — so there!\" How easy he made the way for the little Clerk of the Court! \"Defamation of character\" — could there possibly be a better opening for what he had promised Judge Carcasson he would say ! \"Ah, Monsieur Masson,\" very officially and decorously replied M. Fille, \"but is it defamation of character? If the thing is true, then what is the judgment? It goes against you — so there!\" There was irony in the last words. \"If what thing is true?\" sharply asked the master-carpenter, catching at the fringe of the idea in M. Fille's mind. \"What thing?\" \"Ah, but it is true, for I saw it! Yes, alas! I saw it with my own eyes. By accident of course; but there it was — ^absolute, uncompromising, deadly and complete.\" It was a happy moment for the little Clerk of the Court when he could, in such an impromptu way, coin a phrase, or a set of adjectives, which would bear inspection of purists of the language. He loved to talk, though he did not talk a great deal, but he made innumerable conversations in his mindi and that gave him facility when he did speak. He had made conversations with George Masson in his mind since yesterday, when he gave his promise to Judge Carcasson; but none of them was like the",
         "131 Tlie Money Master M ■^ :• real conversation now taking j)laa-. It was all the imjircssion of the moment, while the phrases in his mind had been wonderfully logical things which from an intellectua: standpoint, would have de-lighted the man whose cause he was now engaged in defending. \"You saw wliat, iM'sieu' la Fillette? Out with It, and don't use such big adjectives. I'm only a carpenter. 'Absolute, uncompromising, deadly, com-plete'— that's a mouthful of grammar, my lords' Come, my sprig of jurisprudence, tell us what vou saw.\" ■' There was an apparent nervousness in Masson's rnanner now. Indeed he showed more agitation than when, a few hours before, Jean Jacques had stood with his hand on the lever of the gates of the flume, and the life of the master-carpenter at his feet, to be kicked into eternity \"Four days ago at five o'clock in the afternoon\" —in a voice formal and exact, the little Clerk of the Court seemed to be reading from a paper, since he kept his eyes fixed on the blotter before him, as he '^l^ It ^°\"''*^~\"I was coming down the hill behind the Manor Cartier, when my attention— by accident —was drawn to a scene below me in the Manor. I stopped short, of course, and \" \"DiabL-! You stopped short 'of course' before what you saw! Spit it out— what did you see?\" George Masson had had a trying day, and there was danger of losing control of himself. There was a whiteness growing round the eyes, and eating up the warmth of the cheek; his admirably smooth",
         "132 The ricrk of the court keeps a promise brow was contracted into a dozen heavy wrinkles and a foot shifted uneasily on the floor with a scrap-ing sole. This drew the attention of .M. Fillc who raised his head reprovingly— he could not get rid of the feeling that he was in court, and that a case was being tried; and the severity of a Judge is naught compared with the severity of a Clerk of the Court, particulariy if he is small and unmarried and has no one to beat him into manageable human-ity. M. Fille's voice was almost querulous. \"If you will but be patient, monsieur! I saw a man with a woman in his arms, and I fear that I must mention the name of the man. It is not necessary to give the name of the woman, but I have It \\vntten here\"— he tapped the paper— \"and there is no mistake in the identity. The man's name is George Masson, master-carpenter, of the town of Laplatte in the province of Quebec.\" George Masson was as one hit between the eyes. He made a motion as though to ward off a blow. Name of Peter, old cock !\" he exclaimed abruptly 'You saw enough certainly, if you saw that, and you needn't mention the lady's name, as you say. The evidence is not merely circumstantial. You saw It with your own eyes, and you are an official of the Court, and have the ear of the Judge, and you look like a saint to a jury. Well for sure, I can't prove defamation of character, as you say. But what then — what do you want?\" ''What I want I hope you may be able to grant without demur, monsieur. I want you to give your",
         "13.^ The Money Master pledge on the Book\"— he laid his hand on a Testa-ment lying on the table— \"that you will hold no further communication with the lady.\" \"Where do you come in here? What's your standing in the business?\" Masson jerked out his words now. The Clerk of the Court made a reproving gesture. \"Knowing what I did, what I had seen, it was clear that I must approach one or other of the parties concerned. Out of regard for the lady I could not approach her husband, and so betray her; out of regard for the husband I could not approach himself and f'estroy his peace ; out of regard for all concerned I could not approach the lady's father, for then \" Masson interrupted with an oath. \"That old reprobate of Cadiz— well no, bagosh! And so you whisked me into your office with the talk of urgent business and \" \"Is not the business urgent, monsieur?\" yNot at all,\" was the sharp reply of the culprit. \"Monsieur, you shock me. Do you consider that your conduct is not criminal? I have here\"— he placed his hand on a book — \"the Statutes of Vic-toria, and it lays down with wholesome severity the law concerning the theft of the affection of a wife, with the accompanying penalty, going as high as twenty thousand ollars.\" George Masson gasped. Here was a new turn of affairs. But he set his teeth. \"Twenty thousand dollars— think of that!\" he sneered angrily. \"That is what I said, monsieur. I said I could",
         "134 Tilt- clerk of the court keeps a promise save you money, and money saved is money earned. I am your benefactor, if you will but permit me to be so, monsieur. I would save you from the law, and from the damages which the law gives. Can you not guess what would be given in a court of the Catholic province of Quebec, against the violation of a good man's home? Do you not see that the business is urgent.'\" \"Not at all,\" curtly replied the master-carpenter. M. Fille bridled up, and his spare figure seemed to gain courage and dignity. \"If you think I will hold my peace unless you give your sacred pledge, you are mistaken, monsieur. I am no meddler, but I have had much kindness at the hands of Monsieur and Madame Barbille, and I will do what I can to protect them and their daughter— that good and sweet daughter,— from the machina-tions, corruptions and malfeasance \" \"Three damn good words for the Court, bagosh!\" exclaimed Masson with a jeer. \"No, with a man devoid of honour, I shall not hesitate, for the Manor Cartier has been the home of domestic peace, and Madame, who came to us a stranger, deserves well of the people of that ancient abode of chivalry— the chivalry of France.\" \"When we are wound up, what a humming we can make!\" laughed George Masson sourly. \"Have you quite finished, m'sieu'?\" \"The matter is urgent, you will admit, monsieur?\" again demanded M. Fille with austerity. \"Not at all.\" The master-carpenter was defiant and insolent, yet I3S '■if' hi",
         "i Tlic\" Money Mii.stor ill' there wns a devilish kind of humour in his tone as in his attitude. \"You will not heed the warning I give?\" The little Clerk [xiintcd to the open page of the Victorian statutes before him. \"Not at all.\" \"Then I shall, with profound regret \" Suddenly Ccorge Masson thrust his face forward near that of M. Fille, who did not draw hack. \"You will inform the Court that the prisoner refuses to incriminate himself, ch?\" he inter-jected. \"No, monsieur, I will inform Monsieur Barbille of what I saw. I will do this without delay. It is the one thing left me to do.\" In quite a grand kind of way he stood up and bowed, as though to dismiss his visitor. As George Masson did not move, the other went to the door and opened it. \"It is the only thing left to do,\" he repeated, as he made a gentle gesture of dismissal. \"Not at all, my legal bombardier. Not at all, I say. All you know Jean Jacques knows, and a good deal more — what he has seen with his own eyes, and understood with his own mind, without legal help. So you see, you've kept nic here talking when there's no need and while my business waits. It is urgent, M'sieu' la Fillette— your business is stale. It belongs to last session of the Court.\" He laughed at his joke. \"M'sieu' Jean Jacques and I under-stand each other.\" He laughed grimly now. \"We know each other like a book, and the Clerk of the",
         "136 The fleik of llic (..urt kocps n prnmisc Court couldn't Rct in an adjfctivo that xvould maki the sense of it all clearer.\" Slowly M. Fillc shu' Cc door, and very slowly he came back. Almost blindly, as it might seem, and with a moan, he dropjjcd into his chair. His eyes n.xcd themselves on George .Masson .■»'i'^v~^''^^'\" '\"= '''•^ hel,i..ssly. \"That! The httle Zoe-dear (lod, the little Zo6, and the j^oor Madame! II.s voice was aching with pain and repiiRnance. ' 1 JS r\" \"■'■'■'' \"\"' ^\"'^'^ °\" ''■■^•'\u003c^ naturally, I'd be thinking your interest in the child was paternal \" said the master-canicntcr roughly, for the virtuous horror of the other's face annoyed him. lie had had a ve.\\ing day. T-he Clerk of the Court was on his feet in a second Monsieur, you dare!\" he exclaimed. \"Vou dare to multiply your crimes in that shameless way Be-gone! There arc those who can make you respect decency. I am not without mv friends, and we all stand by each other in our love of home-of sacred home, monsieur.\" There w-as something right in the master-car-penter at the bottom, with all his villainy. It was notrdone that he knew there were fifty men in the parish of bt. Saviour's who would man-handle him or such a suggc^stion, and for what he had done at the Manor Carticr, if they were roused: but he also had a .sudden remorse for insulting the man who, ^'fter all, had tned to do him a service. His amcide ^vas instant. \"I take it back with humble apology— all I can",
         "137 The Money Master i ' ji hold in both hands, m'sieu',\" he said at once. \"I would not insult you so, much less Madame Bar- bille. If she'd been like what I've hinted at, I wouldn't have gone her way, for the promiscuous is not for me. I'll tell you the whole truth of what happened to-day — this morning. Last night I met her at the river, and \" Then briefly he told all that had happened to the moment when Jean Jacques had left him at the flume with the words, \"Moi, je suis philosopher And at the last he said: \"I give you my word — my oath on this\" — he laid his hand on the Testament on the table — \"that beyond what you saw, and what Jean Jacques saw, there has been nothing.\" He held up a hand as though taking an oath. \"Name of God, is it not enough what there h.as been?\" whispered the httle Clerk. \"Oh, as you think, and as you say! It is quite enough for me after to-day. I'm a teetotaller, but I'm not so fond of water as to want to take my eternal bath in it.\" He shuddered sUghtly. \"Bien sHr, I've had my fill of the Manor Cartier for one day, my Clerk of the Court.\" \"Bien sHr, it was enough to set you thinking, monsieur,\" was the dry comment of M. FiUe, who was now recovering his composure. At that moment there came a knock at the door, and another followed quickly; then there entered without waiting for a reply — Carmen",
         "Barbille. CHAPTER XII THE MASTER-CARPENTER HAS A PROBLEM T\"lJ^?.g;.S.F-J -- to ^.is feet with a for^her' hisT.^'*^*^^ '^\"P' ^^ ^ ^t°™ of feeling See aM th^n ' '\"\"Tu^^^ ''^ '^^ «0\"«d of hef voice and the passion of her face. then st^Sr'^Th^J\"'' r 1-'°°.'^ \" ^'^P f°\"^-'-d. —be^t Se!\" £/,';;?:;A\"o' hS^\"^^\"^^ be/ZSr^C^S't'l'tthV^S- 1 x-nataux that M sieu' Masson was herp c;^ 139 •'",
         "' The Money Miister ' Monsieur and Mademoiselle Zoi, they are with you? They will also come in perhaps?\" M. Fille was courteous and kind, yet he felt that a duty was devolving on him, imposed by his su-perior officer, Judge Carcasson, and by his own conscience, and with courage he faced the field of trouble which his simple question opened up. George Masson had but now said there had been nothing more than he himself had seen from the hill behind the Manor; and he had further said, in effect, that all was ended between Carmen Barbille and himself; yet here they were together, when they ought to be a hundred miles apart for many a day. Besides, there was the look in the woman's face, and that intense look also in the face of the master-carpenter! The Clerk of the Court, from sheer habit of his pro-fession, watched human faces as other people watch the weather, or the rise or fall in the price of wheat and potatoes. He was an archaic little official, and apparently quite imsophisticated; yet there was hid-den behind his ascetic face a quiet astuteness which would have been a valuable asset to a worldly- minded and ambitious man. Besides, affection sharpens the wits. Through it the hovering, pro-tecting sense becomes instinctive, and prescience takes on uncanny certainty. He had a real and dee)) affection for Jean Jacques and his Carmen, and a deeper one still for the child Zoo; and the danger to the home at the Manor Carticr now became again as sharp as the knife of the guillotine. His eyes ran from the woman to the man, and back again, and then with great courage he repeated his question —",
         "140 It and that there W1 h .' r^\"\"*^ '^^^^ '^'^ knew all She knew he htSe ^'^o h ^ \"'''' ?'°'^'' ^^^-°\" but she resented he fact °hat ZT^ \"' r'\" ^^\" ^^^■ George Masson had to d h\u003e^^' '^f'^; It was clear icno.; unless, perhfpfall ^L'^^oSd knlw^^ ^'^ «cn^.°\"i7„:s°^^^^^^^^^^^ is no place for niv hush.nri , .'^ ''^'' ^°^ ^\"^^^\"d it made a motion o th\" he\"d'lou T 'T'''''~\" '\"^^ prater. \"Sant-, \\f °.\"°'^'^ towards the master-car- deed!\" ' ^^^''\"^' ^'^^ '^\"o^ it very well Z. wh^t^Slhlf L^r t^'^'^' '\"l-^^ - -p'y- was clear that the Drnh ^ '\"\"^''^ ^*^ *^^'' It alone between tht ZT^.Z^to^T'\"''' °\"^ quite sure what the prabler^ ;1 Th ' ^''' \"°' said the thing was over hTtu ^^^ '\"^^ ^ad and the look of bothlhowed 'ht'-r'\"\"\" ^\"^ ^°'\"«' .What would the man d\"f What JsltTh '\" °^^'\"- wished to do? The m^\u003c:w \"^t was it the woman Jean Jacques had spaced hr'^'^\"*\"\" ^\"\"^ ''''^ '^''' his wife. No doubfhThad donrso ^r '\"/\"^'^^ was a man of sentim^^f \"\" °\"p ^°' tor Jean Jacques no proof tha there hS be \"\"'^\"'u^' \"\"'^ '\"^''^^^^ few mad caressL ^eXT'\"? ^ ^ *^- ^ yet here was the woman u.-thfi. \"'fdemeanants; had imperilled heT fXeln .l'\"'\"'/°'\" ^''°'\" ^he and child! ^ '\"^^ ^^^^ °f her husband 141 il i",
         ";il The Money Master III '■ II? As though Carmen understood what was going on in his mind, she said: \"Since you know every-thing, you can understand that I want a few words with M'sieu' George here alone.\" \"Madame, I beg of you,\" the Clerk of the Court answered instantly, his voice trembhng a little — \"I beg that you will not be alone with him. As I believe, your husband is willing to let bygones be bygones, and to begin to-morrow as though there was no to-day. In such cat^e you should not see Monsieur Masson !isre alone. It is bad enough to see him here in the office of the Clerk of the Court, but to see him alone — what would Monsieur Jean Jacques say? Also, outside there in the street, if our neighbours should come to know of the trouble, what would they say? I wish not to be tiresome, but as a friend, a true friend of your whole family, madame — yes, in spite of all, your whole family — I hope you will realize that I must remain here. I owe it to a past made happy by kindness which is to me hke life itself. Monsieur Masson, is it not so?\" he added, turning to the master-carpenter. More flushed and agitated than when he had faced Jean Jacques in the flume, the master-carpenter said: \"If she wants a few words — of farewell — alone with me, she must have it, M'sieu' Fille. The other room — eh? Outside there\" — he jerked a finger to-wards the street — \"they won't know that you are not with us; and as for Jean Jacques, isn't it pos-sible for a Clerk of the Court to stretch the truth a little? Isn't the Clerk of the Court a man as well as a",
         "142 \"\"\"\"\"y • I'd do as much for vou !\u003e.!» . time. A wor,l tn c i ^ ' \"\"^ lawyer, any He .oowr™',: .^i-i?-';;,/- -^»-^r Masson interrupted. \"Well if vn„ i-i your eyes and put wads ifyo;^ Jars ^^7' \" ^\"\"^ stay, so that you'll h-,,rn k„ • , ' ° y°\" «^an time, and yet haVo hn!, ^ '\" *^^ '■°°'\" ^« the How is thafrnW^\"!^, and seen nothing at all. M Fi]]t\\Z f :^ ^ \"\"\" \"eht, isn't it.?\" aufacity'of ?he prCsv' %' '\"°'\"-^ ^^ \"^e oftheC^urt.tobeblSrnd^°!:,^'\"]. '^' ^''^^ wads in his e'ars-^ ™,e r' \"\"'\"' ^\"\"^'-^ ^^^ answe^^dMSr^.'^i 1.^;°^^. P-^- to lie!\" he but I beg that you be hS ^\"^ '\"'° '^^ \"^^* ^°°'n. You owe it to yoursoW 'iT\"'f \"\" ^\"^ '\"^dame brief, and, if I mav 'i! - ^he ^'t^ation to be not a praetiLd AnS \" ' ^°\" °\"^ '* '° \"^^^ ^ ^ retu^irMat'*^\"^ '\" ^ '\"\"^^ ^ - ^^- -'-u',\" of ;'rut'a:v„'o^C'.t;sj°T ^-\"^ Court firmly. He tZ A,,, t^''^'^ *^f ^^^'^ °f the o'clock. I will come L f T^''*- \"^^ \u003e= ^^^ six Thof • 1 ^^^\" at three minutes nasi- t\"e gaUo^V\" '°\"^ \"^\"\"^\"^ ^- -3^ fareweH^^Ton ^oZ^i:^i:r:irLV':i''' °^ *^^ — • ^^^ door without aTound '' '■°°'\"' ^'^ \"^^^ ^^e \"Too good for this world,\" remarked the",
         "master- The Money Master carpenter when the door closed tijjht. lie s;ud it after the disappearing figure and not to Carmen. \"I don't supjjosc he ever kissed a real grown-up woman in his hfe. It would have shattered his frail little carcass if, if\" — he turned to his companion — \"if you had kissed him, Carmen. He's made of tissue-paper, — not tissue — and applo-jelly. Yes, but a stiff little backbone, too, or he'd not have faced me down.\" Masson talked as though he were trjing to gain time. \"He said three minutes,\" she returned v.ith a look of death in her face. As Gcorf.;c Masson had talked with the Clerk of the Court, she had come to see, in so far as agitation would permit, that he was not the same as when he left her by the river the evening before. \"There's no time to waste,\" she continued. \"You spoke of farewells — twice you spoke, and three times he spoke of farewells between us. Farewells — farewells — George !' ' With sudden emotion she held out her arms, and her face flushed with passion and longing. The tempest which shook her shook him also, and he swayed from side to side like an animal uncertain if the moment had come to try its strength with its foe; and in truth the man was fighting with himself. His moments with Jean Jaco,ucs at the flume had expanded him in a curious kind of way. His own arguments while he was fighting for his life, had, in a way, convinced himself. She was a rare creature, and she was alluring — more alluring than she had",
         "144 The nui.stcr-oari)cnter ha.s a prohlciii ever hccn; for a tragic sense hnd made her thinner had refined the l.oldncss of her beauty, had given a wonderful lustre to her eyes; and suffering has its own attraction to the degenerate. But he Georeo Masson had had a great shock, and he hkd come It hn 1 T '':r °^ '^'^''^ \"\"^ '^' ^l^i\" °f his teTh It had been the nearest thing he had ever known- for though once he had had a pistol pointed at him' there was the chance that it might miss at haK dozen yards, while there was no chance of the lever of the flume gonig wrong; and water and a mill- wheel were as absolute as the rope of the gallow but If Jean Jacques had not been just the man he was. he could not have saved himself. It did not occur to him that Jean Jacques had acted weakly He would not have done what Jean Jacques had done,' nn,n! ?J''^'^\"'' T\"''^ ^'' ^°\"\"'- \"e Would have sprung the lever; but he was not so mean as to despise Jean Jacques because he had foregone his revenge. This master-carpenter had certJn gift worM '°T^ \"°t have caused so much trouble in th^ If There is a kind of subtlety necessary to allure or delude even the humblest of women, if she IS not naturally bad; and Masson had had expe-riences with the humblest, and also with those'^a It le higher up. This much had to be said for him becLt\\ /fu'^'\"'' J'^\"\" J^'^^\"'^^ contemptibk because he had been merciful, or degraded because he had chosen to forgive his wife The sight of the woman, as she stood with arms outstretched, had made his pulses pound in his vebs 10 145",
         "^li 1 13, The Money Master but the heat was suddenly chilled by the wave of tragedy which had passed over him. When he had chmbed out of the flume, and opened the lever for the nver to rush through, he had felt as though ice- cold liquid flowed in his veins, not blood ; and all dav he had been like that. He had moved much as one in a dream, and he had felt for the first time in his life that he was not ready to bluff creation. He had always faced things down, as long as it could be done; and when it could not, he had retreated with the comment that no man was wise who took gruel when he needn't. He was now face to face with his greatest problem. One thing was clea:^ they must either part for ever, or go together, and part no more. There could be no half measures bhe was a remarkable woman in her way, with a vnll of her own, and a kind of madness in her- and there could be no backing and fiUing. They only had three minutes to talk together alone, and two of them were up. Her arms were held out to him, but he stood still, and before the fire of her eyes his own dropped No, not yet!\" he exclaimed. \"It's been a day —heaven and hell, what a day it's been ! He had me —like that!\" He opened and shut his hand with fierce, spasmodic strength, \".r.nd he let me go— oh, let me go like a fox out of a trap! I've had enough for one day— blood of St. Peter, enough enough! * The flame of desire in her eyes suddenly turned to \"It is fareweU, then, that you wish,\" she said",
         "146 The master-carpenter has a problem hoa^ely \"It is no more and farewrll then' You S t°toT f '^ P°'\"''''^ ^° '\"\"^ \"t'^- room-\"you hai^t\u0026/^\"„tTrr::rTwT^^^^^^^^^^ you to the end of life, if I had taken all '• H^ tie/ but that does not matter here. ' \"AU— all!\" she cried. \"What is all? Is it but the one thing that the world says must plr^ hus band and ynfe? Caramba! Is that all? I have g.ven_eyeryth,ng-I have had your arms arS .^^^'J'^^..?^'^ \"^ *h^ Court saw that,\" he in-terrupted. \"He saw from the hill behind the Manor on Tuesday last \" it 'Swf \"^^ ^ ^^P ^* ^^^ ^\"^^ °f the other room- J^dowly opened, and the figure of the Clerk ap- triJZ° ™tes-just two minutes more, old trump^ said the master-caipenter, stretching out wa^^^e\"iSnf \".iT\" ^' '\"°\"«'^'\" \"^'^ Carmen, who ^me tt^! ^ ^ ^\"^^''^ humiliation which can come to a woman. tenT*\"^ S^'' ^°1t^^ ^' *^\"\"^ ^'^- ^\"d he was con- enough. Very well, monsieur and madame \" he said, and closed the door again. ..^^TI^ ^T^^\"^ ^^'\"\"^^y °n the man. \"M. Fille saw, did he. from Mont Violet? Well, when I came 147 if",
         "-i The Money Master / ^! horc I did not care who saw. I only thouRht of you — that you wanted me, and that 1 wanted you. What the world thouKht was nothinf;, if you were as when we parted last night. ... I could not face Jean Jacques' forgiveness. To stay there, feeling that I must be always grateful, that I must be humble, that I must pretend, that I must kiss Jean Jacques, and lie in his arms, and go to mass and to confession, and \" \"There is the child, there is ZoC \" \"Oh, it is you that preaches now- you that tempted me, that said I was wasted at the Manor; that the parish did not understand me; that Jeari Jacques did not know a jewel of price when he saw it— little did you think of Zoe then !\" He made a protesting gesture. \"Maybe so, Car-men, but I think now before it is too late.\" \"The child loves her father as she never loved me,\" she declared. \"She is twelve years old. She will soon be old enough to keep house for him, and then to marry—ah, before there is time to think she will marry!\" It would be better then for you to wait till she marries before — before \" \"Before I go away with you!\" She gave a shrill, agonized laugh. ' ' So that is the end of it all ! What did you think of my child when you forced yoi;r way into my hfe, when you made me think of you- ah, quel bite—what a. coward and beast you are!\" \"No, I am not all coward, though I may be a beast,\" he answered. \"I didn't think of your child when I began to talk to you as I did. I was out for",
         "148 SeinTt'toman IhTr^'\" ^\"\"'\"■- ^\"'^ y°\" \"-'-^e you •' ^\" ^^\"\"^ ^ ^ ^'v-^r met and talked with ; your child. Rut th nw ^' \"\"'^ J ^'^\"'' think of -y life by thinking of h r anlr^.V'\"\"^^ ' ^^^-' maybe, by thinking of Jer- and I m K^\"\"' \"^°' '°°- I'm going to try to pav h.'nl . , ° ^\"^ ''\"'\"^thing. mother. I ne^r feh^r^ 1 ^^ \"\"*-' ''^'' '^'^'^P ^cr towards your;rd?;it-rh?ii:n°r \"/4 ^'^'^ not so bad for you as they mighrbe \" \"\"^^ ''^'\"^^ Him\"\"LXrsrb\u003e,?f-^^^^ ^?.--^- -\"•\"^o%\u0026u7r4rgr sh^wouMXttkr-nrhi^^^^^^^^^ Jean Jacques had opened tho „,* .V f ^ ^\"^h woujd have , thThl tf Sublt^. -*''• \"^' HaST„dnrru™^.rfu;rL\\r7- -^^^ -^-^^ '^- At that instant clmo atnVt T \"\"'\"'^ ^'^'^ «\u003e*'• room, and the Clerk of tl^e Co . ^\"°'' \"^ *^^^ °'her the blo^v, and drew backuS'an\"''''?'''''- \"^ ^^\"^ Carmen turned to Wm ''V ^^,f'^'^^i^on. M'sieu' Pille,\" she remLrkoH '°'''\" ^\"'^ ^^^^^ «'-iid, rage and dc.spa'r and 1p \"'/ '■°'^'° ^\"'\"^^'^ ^\"th to the street. ^' \"\"\"\"' '° the door leading",
         "149 The Money Master Masson had winced at the blow, but he rcniain* silent. He knew not what to say or do. M. Fille hastily followed Carmen to the dooi \"You are going home, dear madame? Permit m\u003e to accompany you,\" he said gently. \"I have to do business with Jean Jacques.\" A hand upon his chest, she pushed him back. \"Where I go I'm going alone,\" she said. Open-ing the door she went out, but turning back again she gave George Masson a look that he never for-got. Then the door closed. \"Grace of God, she is not going home!\" brokenly murmured the Clerk of the Court. With a groan the master-carpenter started for-ward towards the door, but M. Fille stepped be-tween, laid a hand on his arm, and stopped him.",
         "i f EPOCH THE THIRD 11",
         "i",
         "Hi\" CHAPTER XIII THE MAN FROM OUTSIDE [N the last note of th^ '■ stantaneously almn=7 • ^°\"^. ^PP'^u^e came in- -em. With cries oT'-E^rrry- - '^ m^ght some time, while the haDnv f ' '' ^^^ted with frank pleasure on the hLr^'' ^°°^\"^ ^°\"\"d in the Manor Cartier ^°\"P encircling her er^'t'/rnd'ttlc^W^-'' ^''^ ^^^^'^ - a gen- A particular person howevt'\"'' f-V''\"^^' P^'\"^\"\"- addressed the quest/on tltJ^' Tu\"'^' ^\"^ ^^e had at him. He wL the M^n fl^' A^°\"^'' \"°' ^°°king \"\u003c=- the bright wood-fir^ fTthyi\"'' '''\"' ^^ -^ comer of ev^'r^' one ,'\";;- Th'^' ^°' ■\"*« -\u003c^^ responded, speaking hL fl . t^^\" ^^\"\"^ Outside Engli^ accenTtKira\"pit J'-^'^ ^ ^\"^^t ,„ P'easant piquancy—",
         "at The Money Master Ift least to the ears of the pretty singer, Mile. Zoc Barbille. He was a man of about thirty-three, clean-shaven, dark-haired, with an expression of cleverness; yet with an irresponsible something about him which M. Fille had reflected upon with concern. For this slim, eager, talkative, half -invalid visitor to St. Saviour's had of late shown a marked liking for the presence and person of Zo6 Barbille; and Zo6 was as dear to M. Fille as though she were his own daughter. He it was who, in sarcasm, had spoken of this young stranger as \"The Man from Outside.\" Ever since Zo6's mother had vanished — alone — seven years before from the Manor Cartier, or rather from his office at Vilray, M. Fille had been as much hke a maiden aunt or a very elder brother to the Spanische's daughter as a man could be. Of M. Fille's influence over his daughter and her love of his companionship, Jean Jacques had no jealousy whatever. Very often indeed, when he felt incom-petent to do for his child all that he wished— philosophers are often stupid in human affairs— ho thought it was a blessing Zo6 had a friend hke M. Fille. Since the terrible day when he found that his wife had gone from him — not with the master- carpenter who only made his exit from Laplatte some years afterwards— he had had no desire to have a woman at the Manor to fill her place, even as house-keeper. He had never swerved from that. He had had a hard row to hoe, but he had hoed it with a will not affected by domestic accidents or inconvenience?. The one woman from outside whom he permitted IS4",
         "»^^^^^^^^-^/ 'The man from outside J^ to go and come at will— and shp Hfrl r,^f because she and M. PilLlgtd'ft^^LTdTb^t not to do so-was the sister of the Cur6 To h* iraiod her like , „\" \"\"='\"\"■ \"'' l\"' J»=1\"ra c;v„, f 1 ^L ■^ pncibe ot lUos simple intcrost^; His name was Gerard Fvncs and h;= k • TOs mumming. He was V vnL i \"\"\"\"'' 'iii",
         "lii^4»»»-„. The Money Master If N as well as of profession; and he was a Protestant, which was the greatest misfortune of all. But he was only at St. Saviour's for his convalescence after a so-called attack of congestion of the lungs; and as he still had a slight cough and looked none too robust, and as, more than all, he was simple in his ways, enjoying the life of the parish with greater zest than the residents, he found popularity. Un-doubtedly he had a taking way with him. He was lodging with Louis Charron, a small farmer and kinsman of Jean Jacques, who sold whisky— \"white whisky \"—without a license. It was a Charron family habit to sell liquor illegally, and Louis pur-sued the career with all an amateur's enthusiasm. He had a sovereign balm for \"colds,\" composed of camomile flowers, boneset, liquorice, pennyroyal and gentian root, which he sold to all comers; and it was not unnatural that a visitor with weak lungs should lodge with him. Louis and his wife had only good things to say about Gerard Fynes; for the young man lived their life as though he was born to it. He ate the slap-jacks, the buttermilk-pop, the pork and beans, the Indian com on the cob, the pea-soup, and the bread baked in the roadside oven, with a relish which was not all pretence; for indeed he was as primitive as he was subtle. He himself could not have told how much of him was tme and how much was make- believe. But he was certainly lovable, and he was not bad by nature. Since coming to St. Saviour's he had been constant to one attraction, and he had not risked his chasces with Zoe by response to the",
         "1J6 The man from outside shy invitations „, ,,,„^ „,„„ ,„ stranger-this Protestant FnoZu . ^ \"\"\"\"^ ^^'^ outer world, to whicLrcan f- .^ \"\"''\" ^'\"\"' '^' quently since his fn,Vtli \"^ '\"f '''''\"' '^'^^ f^- Jacques had obJertd n Intir/ T '^'' J^^ two young people, and threJrrne't in\"\":;' °' ''^^ \u003eng. It was just before 7nJ 1^^ understand- found it\"roSr' '\"\"^- J^'-'\" j-^\"- ''-'•d trilling wartorturerv\"'\"\"*l'\"'\"'''°\"^'-'- Z°\u003c^-'s forbidin her\"r:^g°, r^hf h\"f ,^ ''\"^ \"-- heart's content Bv a s,?htlf '\"\"*\u003e' °\" *« her because of the unsool-on '\"\"\"\"'' '^°^-'\"^-^^' ^nd she never sang \"rson^sTr\"; '\",^^ \"^■\" '\"-^t, after the 'l-,v r ^ '''''' ^^ ^/\u003c\"w/\u003c/. Never -other to a^yoSTt'Tll\"!' ''' '\"' '^'^'^ °' '^- it was annihifron .o ■ \"\" '™'\"* '^\"\" d.ath; The vv-urld a la \"'nn^ T \"' 'P.^'^''^ \"'\"^ concerned had run iwa fnd tj;^^\"\" '''\\- ?™\"^ \"-h'\"« her father dk not tn t\"\"\"\" Sebastian Dolores -an had not heS rr l^r T^^';,'; ^T, ^^^ ^M at the Manor Cirtu.r V ?! ^ \"'''^\"'^ ^'s-'tcd His own Te r^of Yeye^rh ';^'\"\"'-'^\"\"*'*'-■ 'on.sojour„sinQuel:^i:,;?i/'--Jed^^ f b",
         "M The Money Master III': York; yet he always came back to St. Saviour's when he was penniless, and was there started afresh by Jean Jacques. Some said that Carmen had gone back to Spain, but others discredited that, for, if she had done so, certainly old Sebastian Dolores would have gone also. Others continued to insist that she had gone off with a man; but there was George Masson at Laplatte living alone, and never going twenty miles away from home, and he was the only person under suspicion. Others again averred that since her flight Carmen had become a loose woman in Montreal; but the New Cur6 came down on that with a blow which no one was tempted to invite again. M. Savry's method of punishing was of a kind to make men shrink. If Carmen Barbille had become a loose woman in Montreal, how did any member of his flock know that it was the case? What com-pany had he kept in Montreal that he could say that? Did he see the woman— or did he hear about her? And if he heard, what sort of company was he keeping when he went to Montreal without his wife to hear such things? That was final, and the slanderer was under a cloud for a time, by reason of the anger of his own wife. It was about this time that the good priest preached from the text, \"Judge not that ye be not judged,\" and said that there were only ten commandments on the tables of stone; but that the ten included all the command-ments which the Church made for every man, and which every man, knowing his own weakness, must also make for himself.",
         "158 The man from outside His flock understood, though they did refrain, every one, from looking towards the place where Jean Jacques sat with Ma'm'selle— she was always called that, as though she was a great lady; or else she was called \"the little Ma'm'selle Zo6,\" even when she had grown almost as tall as her mother had been. Though no one looked towards the place where Jean Jacques and his daughter sat when this sermon was preached, and although Zoc seemed not to ap-prehend personal reference in the priest's words, when she reached home, after talking to her father about casual things all the way, she flew to her room, and, locking the door, flung herself on her bed and cried till her body felt as though it had been beaten by rods. Then she suddenly got up and, from a drawer, took out two things— an old photo-graph of her mother at the time of her marriage, and Carmen's guitar, which she had made her own on the day after the flight, and had kept hidden ever smce. She lay on the bed with her cheek pressed to the guitar, and her eyes hungrily feeding on the face of a woman whose beauty belonged to spheres other than where she had spent the thirteen years of her married life. Zoe had understood more even at the time of the crisis than they thought she did, child though she was; and as the years had gone on she had grasped the meaning of it all more clearly perhaps than any-one at all except her adored friends Judge Carcasson, at whose home she had visited in Montreal, and m' Fille. The thing last rumoured about her mother in the",
         "i59 The Money Master parish was that she had become an actress. To this Zo6 made no protest in her mind. It was better than many other possibilities, and she fixed her mind on it, so saving herself from other agonizing speculations. In a fixed imagination lay safety. In her soul she '.' \u003ew that, no matter what happened, her mother - , jld never return to the Manor Cartier. The yea;' nad not deepened confidence between father and Ciaughter. A shadow hung between them. They laughed and talked together, were even boister-ous in their fun sometimes, and yet in the eyes of both was the forbidden thing — the deserted city into which they could not enter. He could not speak to the child of the shame of her mother; she could not speak of that in him which had contributed to that mother's shame — the neglect which existed to some degree in her own life with him. This was chiefly so because his enterprises had grown to such a number and height, that he seemed ever to be counting them, ever struggling to the height, while none of his ventures ever reached that state oi success when it \"ran itself\"; although as ynars passed men called him rich, and he spent and loaned money so freely that they called him the Money Master, or the Money Man Wise, in deference to his philosophy. Zo6 was not beautiful, but there was a wondrous charm in her deep brown eyes and in the expression of her pretty, if irregular, features. Sometimes her face seemed as small as that of a young child, and alive with eerie fancies; and always behind her laughter was something which got into her eyes, 1",
         "60 The man from outside giving them a haunting molancholv. She had no signs of hysteria, though now and then there came heart-breaking little outbursts of emotion which had this proof that they were not hysteria— tluy were never seen by others. They were sacred to her own solitude. While in Montreal she had tasted for the first time the joys of the theatre, and had then secretly read numbers of plays, which she bought from an i,ld bookseller, who was wise enough to choose them for her. She became possessed of a love for the stage even before Gerard Fyncs came upon the scene. The beginning of it all was the rumour that her mother was now an actress; yet the root-cause was far down in a temperament re-sponsive to all artistic things. The coming of the Man from Outside acted on the confined elements of her natiire like the shutter of a camera. It let in a world of light upon unexplored places, it set free elements of being which had not before been active. She had been instantly drawn to Gerard Fynes. He had the distance from her own life which provoked interest, and in that dis-tance was the mother whom perhaps it was her duty to forget, yet for whom she had a longing which grew greater as the years went on. Gerard Fyncs could talk well, and his vivid pic-tures of his short play-acting career absorbed her; and all the time she was vigilant for some name, for the description of some actress which would seem to be a clue to the lost spirit of her life. This clue never came, but before she gave up hope of it, the man had got nearer to her than any man had ever done 11 i6i m",
         "I The Money Master •fit. After meeting him she awoke to the fact that there was a difference between men, that it was not the same thing to be young as to be old; that the reason why she could kiss the old Judge and the little Clerk of the Court, and not kiss, say, the young manager of the great lumber-firm who came every year for a fortnight's fishing at St. Saviour's, was one which had an understandable cause and was not a mere matter of individual taste. She had been good friends with this young manager, who was only thirty years of age, and was married, but when he had wanted to kiss her on saying good-bye one re-cent summer, she had said, \"Oh, no, oh, no, that would spoil it all!\" Yet when he had asked her why, and what she meant, she coidd not tell him. She did not know; but by the end of the first week after Gerard Fynes had been brought to the Manor Cartier by Louis Charron, she knew. She had then been suddenly awakened from mere girlhood. Judge Carcasson saw the difference in her on a half-hour's visit as he passed westward, and he had said to M. Fille, \"Who is the man, my keeper of the treasure?\" The reply had been of such a sort that the Judge was startled. \"Tut, tut,\" he had exclaimed, \"an actor — an actor once a lawyer! That's serious. She's at an age — ^and with a temperament like hers she'll be-lieve anything, if once her affections are roused. She has a flair for the romantic, for the thing that .' out of reach — the bird on the highest branch, the bird in the sky beyond ours, the song that was lost before time was, the light that never was on sea or",
         "162 The man from outside and Why. damn it, damn it aU. my Solon, here's the bepnnmg of a case in Court unless we can lay the fellow by the heels! How long is he hero for?- W hen M. F,lle had told I. in, that he woulu ^tay for another month for certain, and n,) doubt much loiiKer, If there seemed a prospect of winning the heiress of the Manor Carticr, the Judge k ve a groan. \" ^ »^ «* ..ii)^^ T'\"* ^^* ^^ ^^^y- somehow,\" he said. Where does ho stay?\" '•At the house of Louis Charron,\" was the reply. Louis Charron-isn't he the fellow that sells whisky without a license?\" \"It is so, monsieur.\" The Judge moved his head from side to side lik\" a bear ma cage. \"It is that, is it, my Fille? By the thumb of the devil, isn't it time then that Louis Charron was arrested for breaking the law? Also how do we know but that the interloping fellow Fynes is an agent for a whisky. firm perhaps? L-ouldn t he, then, on suspicion, be arrested with \" The . lerk of the Court shook his head moumfuUy His Judge was surely becoming childish in his old age. He looked again closely at the great man, and saw a glinimer of moisture in the grey eyes. It was clear that Judge Carcasson felt deeply the dangers of the crisis, and that the futile outburst had merely been the agitated protest of the helpless. •. \"'^*'?.\"l^\" '^ \"\"^^^ ^^ ^^y^ h^ \"s— an actor; and It would be folly to arrest him. If our Zoo is rcaJty fond of him. it would only make a martyr",
         "163 MICROCOPV RESOLUTION TEST CHAUT lANSI ond ISO TEST CHART No, 2| _^ ^PPLIEg IM/IGE Inc ^^ 1653 Eos! Mam Street S*.iS Rochester, N\u003c« York t*609 USA ^= (?16) 482 - 0300 - Phone ^B (716) 288 - 5989 -",
         "Fa. The Money Master \\^'A As he made this reply M. Fille looked furtively at the other — out of the corner of his eye, as it were. The reply of the Judge was impatient, almost peevish and rough. \"Did you think I was in ear-nest, my Punchinello? Surely I don't look so young as all that. I am over sixty-five, and am therefore mentally developed!\" M. Fille was exactly sixty-five years of age, and the blow was a shrewd one. He drew himself up with rigid dignity. \"You must feel sorry sometimes for those who suffered when your mind was undeveloped, mon-sieur,\" he answered. \"You were a judge at forty- nine, and you defended poor prisoners for twenty years before that.\" The Judge was conquered, and he was never the man to pretend he was not beaten when he was. He admired skill too much for that. He squeezed M. Fille's arm and said: \"I've been quick with my tongue myself, but I feel sure now, that it's through long and close asso-ciation with my Clerk of the Court.\" \"Ah, monsieur, you are so difficult to under-stand !' ' was the reply. ' ' I have known you all these years, and yet \" \"And yet you did not know how much of the woman there was in me! . . . But yes, it is that. It is that which I fear with our Zoe. Women break out — they break out, and then there is the devil to pay. Look at her mother. She broke out. It was not inevitable. It was the curse of opportunity, the wrong thing popping up to drive her mad at the",
         "164 The man from outside wrong moment. Had the wrong thing come at the right time for her, when she was quite sane, she would be yonder now with our philosopher. Per-haps she would not be contented if she were there, but she would be there; and as time goes on, to be where we were in all things which concern the affec-tions, that is the great matter.\" \"Ah, yes, ah, yes,\" was the bright-eyed reply of that Clerk, \"there is no doubt of that! My sister and I there, we are fifty years together, never with the wrong thing at the wrong time, always the thing as it was, always to be where we were.\" The Judge shook his head. \"There is an eternity of difference, Fille, between the sister and brother and the husband and wife. The sacredness of isola-tion is the thing which holds the brother and sister together. The familiarity of — but never mind what it is that so often forces husband and wife apart. It is there, and it breaks out in rebellion as it did with the wife of Jean Jacques Barbille. As she was a strong woman in her way, it spoiled her life and his too when it broke out.\" M. Fille's face lighted with memory and feeling. \"Ah, a woman of powerful emotions, monsieur, that is so! I think I never told you, but at the last, in my office, when she went, she struck George Masson in the face. It was a blow that — but there it was; I have never liked to think of it. When I do, I shudder. She was a woman who might have been in other circumstances — but there!\" The Judge suddenly stopped in his walk and faced roimd on his friend. \"Did you ever know, my",
         "i6s The Money Master II Solon,\" he said, \"that it was not Jean Jacques who saved Carmen at the wreck of the Antoinc, but it was she who saved him; and yet she never breathed of it in all the years. One who was saved from the Antoinc told me of it. Jean Jacques was going down. Carmen gave him her piece of wreckage to hang on to, and swam ashore without help. He never gave her the credit. There was something big in the woman, but it did not come out right.\" M. Fille threw up his hands. \"Grace de Dieu, is it so that she saved Jean Jacques ? Then he would not be here if it had not been for her?\" \"That is the obvious deduction, Maltre Fille,\" replied the Judge. The Clerk of the Court seemed moved. \"He did not treat her ill. I know that he would take her back to-morrow if he could. He has never for-gotten. I saw him weeping one day — it was where she used to sing to the flax-beaters by the Beau Cheval. I put my hand on his shoulder, and said, 'I know, I comprehend; but be a philosopher, Jean Jacques.'\" \"What did he say?\" asked the Judge. \"He drew himself up. 'In my mind, in my soul, I am philosopher always,' he said, 'but my eyes are the windows of my heart, m'sieu'. They look out and see the sorrow of one I loved. It is for her sor-row that I weep, not for my own. I have my child, I have money; the world says to me, \"How goes it, my friend?\" I have a home — a home; but where is she, and what does the world say to her?'\" The Judge shook his head sadly. ' ' I used to think",
         "i66 The man from outside I knew life, but I come to the belief in the end that I know nothing. Who could have guessed that he would have sjioken like that!\" \"He forgave her, monsieur.\" The Judge nodded mournfully. \"Yes, yes, but I used to think it is such men who forgive one day and kill the ne.xt. You never can tell where they will explode, philosophy or no philosojjhy.\" The Judge was right. After all the years that had passed since his wife had left him, Jean Jacques did explode. It was the night of his birthday party at which was present the Man from Outside. It was in the hour when he first saw what the Clerk of the Court had seen some time before — the understand-ing between Zoe and Gerard Fyncs. It had never occurred to him that there was any danger. Zo6 had been so indifferent to the yr-ng men of St. Saviour's and beyond, had always ' en so much his friend and the friend of those much older than himself, like Judge Carcasson and M. Fille, that he had not yet thought of her electing to go and leave him alone. To leave him alone! To be left alone— it had ever become a possibility to his mind. It did not break upon him with its full force all at once. He first got the glimmer of it, then the glimmer grew to a glow, and the glow to a great red light, in which his brain became drunk, and all his phil-osophy was burned up like wood - shavings in a fiery furnace. \"Did you like it so much?\" Zo6 had asked when 167 mm i Fit! m m",
         "'HI The Money Master her song was finished, and the Man from Outside had replied, \"Ah, but splendid, splendid! It got into every corner of every one of us.\" \"Into the senses — why not into the heart? Songs are meant for the heart,\" said Zoe. \"Yes, yes, certainly,\" was the young man's reply, \"but it depends upon the song whether it touches the heart more than the senses. Won't you sing that perfect thing, A la Claire Fontaine?\" he added, with eyes as bright as passion and the hec-tic fires of his lung-trouble could make them. She nodded and was about to ring, for she loved the song, and it had been ringing in her head all day ; but at that point M. Fille rose, and with his glass raised high— for at that moment Seraphe Comiche and another carried round native wine and cider to the company — he said : \"To Monsieur Jean Jacques Barbille, and his fifty years, good health — bnnne sr.nU! This is his birthday. To a hundred years for Jean Jacques!\" Instantly everyone was up with glass raised, and ZoS ran and threw her arms round her father's neck. \"Kiss me before you drink,\" she said. With a touch almost solemn in its tenderness Jean Jacques drew her head to his shoulder and kissed her hair, then her forehead. \"My blessed one — my angel,\" he whispered; but there was a look in his eyes which only M. Fille had seen there before. It was the look which had been in his eyes at the fla.x- beaters' place by the \"Sing — father, motioned to the nver. you must fiddler. \" i68 sing,\" said Zo6, and Sing It's Fifty",
         "Years,\" Tlic man from outside she cried eagerly. They all repeated her request and he could but obey. rnjuest, Jean Jacques' voice was rather rough, but he had some fine resonant notes in it. and presently. S eyes fastened on the distance, and with free g stun and much expression, he sang the first verse of the fifty eTrs *^' \"''\" ''*° ^\"\"^ '\"\"^^^^ '^ \"Wherefore these flower.s? This lete for me'— Ah no, it is not fifty years. Since in my eyes the lisht you see First shone upon life's joys and tears! How fast the heedless days have flo- n— Too late to wail the misspent hours To mourn the vanished friends I've 'known, 10 kneel beside love's ruined bowers Ah, have I then seen fifty years. With all their joys and hopes and fears!\" Through all the verses he ranged, his voice im-proving with each phrase, growing more resonam, Wl at last It rang out with a ragged richness which fnH ^f i ^^ ^'^^ conscious that the beginning of the end of things was come for him; and that now, at fifty, in no sphere had he absolutely \"arrived \" neither in home nor fortune, nor-but yes, there w^s one sphere of success; there was his fatherhood There was his daughter, his wonderful Zoe He ard^^t f T' ^'\"°'\" '''' '^'^*^\"'^^- ^\"d saw that her WW, irV?? \"°* ^°^^\"^' ^'\"'- b\"t towards one whom she had known but a few weeks buddenly he stopped in the middle of a verse, and 169 m I",
         "* The Money Master i » broke forward with his arms outstretched, laughing He felt that he must laugh, or ho would cry; and that would be a humiliating thing to do. . \"?°T'. ^°'\"®' '\"y ^ncnds. my children, enough of that! he cried. \"We'll have no more maunder- f/' ,- . ■' years— what are fifty years! Think of Methuselah! It's summer in the world still.and it's only spnng at St. Saviour's. It's the time of the first flowers. Let's dance-no, no, never mind the Cure to-night! He will not mind. I'll settle it with tiim. We 11 dance the gay quadrille.\" He caught the hands of the two voungest giris present, and nodded at the fiddler, 'who at once began to tune his violin afresh. One of the joyous young giris, nowever, began to plead with him Ah no, let us dance, but at the last— not yet M sieu Jean Jacqac.= ! There ^s Zoe's song, we must have that, and then we must have charades. Here is Msieu' Fynes-he can make splendid charades for us. Then the dance at the last— ah, yes, yes M sieu Jean Jacques! Let it be like that. We all planned it, and though it is your birthday, it's us are making the f6te.\" \"As you will then, as you will, little ones,\" Jean Jacques acquiesced with a half -sigh; but he did not look at his daughter. Somehow, suddenly a strange constraint possessed him where Zoe was concerned. \"Then let us have Zoe's song; let us have A la Clatre Fontaine,\" cried the black-eye. young mad-cap who held Jean Jacques' arms. But Zoe interrupted. \"No, no,\" she protested,",
         "170 The man from outside \"the singing spell is broken. We will h=„» .u after the chara,les-after the charades'^'^ '''' ^°\"« cried'rr\\hr.;SV'cLr:t1r'' '''^ ^\" th. stage ' To them t'\"/^'\"\"^'^ \"' ''^'^^ '^■^ on n^yste:;, gailt^ I'nTth'e foSdJr ™\"^°\"\"^^'' °^ disp:;irofthe\\tn'£°n /'7 ^•'-'^^ ^\" ^* ^''e all quite wonderful nn^ ,-t • , f '\"^ \" ^as attitudes, m^icry and nU\"/\"'^''^ '^f*\"'\" P°^'\"g«. really ingenious charades'^ °'\"^\"'' '°^ ^^^^ ^^^^ toiS. wifhXTofSfstar'^ '\"^^^^ °\"^\" -- - touched her Sulde's ft f t\"\\\"^f '' '''^* '^'^ ^^^^' shoulders or arms touched^ H ?',i.r^^\" ^^^^' -^:;s;ra;i\"--^tdS TrSis-S----^-'^ S--F\"^^--!^ciSf-^ sSd^tent Jn°:xfitTe:n°:^,dr '^■^ ^\"^ •^'- been like a sorite lof ?n ''^^^^ agitated, had was mere sS mt \"V^\"!\"' ^^^'^ but that spmt. Here was body and senses too- 171 !i",
         "(I The Money Master here was her vhole being alive to a music, which had an aching sweetness and a harmony coaxing every sense into delight. \"To-morrow evening, by the flume, where the beech-trees are— come— at iix. I want to speak with you. Will you come.?\" Thus whispered the maker of this music of the senses who directed the charades, but who was also directing the course of another life than his own. \"Yes, if I can,\" was Zo6's whispered reply, and ths words shook as she said them; for she felt that their meeting in the beech-trees by the flume would be of consequence beyond imagination. Judge Carcasson had always said that Zo6 had judgment beyond her years; M. Fille had remarked often that she had both prudence and shrewdness as well as a sympathetic spirit; but M. Fille's little whispering sister, who could never be tempted away from her home to any house, to whom the market and the church were like pilgrimages to distant wilds, had said to her brother: \"Wait, Armand— wait till Zo6 is waked, and then prudence and wisdom will be but accident. If all goes well, you will see prudence and wisdom; but if it does not, you will see — ah, but just Zo6!\" The now alert Jean Jacques had seen the whisper-ing of the two, though he did not know what had been said. It was, however, something secret, and if it was secret, then it was— yes, it was love; and love between his daughter and that waif of the world— the world of the stage— in which men and women were only grown-up children, and bad grown-up 173 'm-",
         ": lich Ling the eak the ilso the !0f lad ced ess ;tle ray Icet mt all )Ut ad ive",
         "up TO-MORROW EVKNINC, IIV THE FLUME— tO.VlE. 1",
         "W.lM i'",
         "m",
         "!■ The man from outside children at that-it was not to be endured. One thmg was sure, the man should come to the Manor Twf \"°,!f r- ?! ^\"\"\"^^ ''^ '° that to-morrow. There would be no faltering or paltering on his part. as home had been shaken to its foundations once and he was determined that it should not fall about his ears a second time. An Englishman, an actor, be endured ^ '^\"^^^\"^^ ^^^^'^ ^* \"\"^^ \"°* *« The charade now being played was the best of the evenmg. One of the madcap friends of Zo6 was to be a smging-gari. She was supposed to carry a tambounne. When her turn to enter came ^ a ook of mischief and a gay dancing step, 'shT ran li^urinr' '\" '^^ '^'^'^^ -- ^ ^^-' -t a Mien Zo6 saw the guitar she gave a cry shocked, muignant voice. iJ2f ^T ^°°'^~y°''^ bedroom,\" was the half- S r' ^\"''^^'' \"^ \"^^ '' °\" *^^ ^\"^^^^'■' ^nd I \"Come, come, let's get on with the charade\" urged the Man from Outside. cnaraae. On the instant's pause, in which Zo6 looked at her lover almost involuntarily, and without fully under-standing what he said, someone else started forward wth a smothered exclamation-of anger, of horror |;|^^^ It was Jean Jacques. He was suddenly laSalS^ J^' daricened by hideous memory, his face ahght with passion. He caught from the giri's",
         "173 The Money Master I, I mk hands the guitar — Carmen's forgotten guitar which he had not seen for seven years — ^how well he knew it! With both hands he broke it across his knee. The strings, as they snapped, gave a shrill, wailing cry, like a voice stopped suddenly by death. Stepping jerkily to the fireplace he thrust it into the flame. \"Ah, there!\" he said savagely. \"There — there!\" When he turned round slowly again, his face — which he had never sought to control before he had his great Accident seven years ago— was under his command. A strange, ironic— almost sardonic- smile was on his lips. \"It's in the play,\" he said. \"No, it's not in the charade. Monsieur Barbille,\" said the Man from Outside fretfully. \"That is the way I read it, m'sieu',\" retorted Jean Jacques, and he made a motion to the fiddler. \"The dance! The dance!\" he exclaimed. But yet he looked little like a man who wished to dance, save upon a",
         "grave. CHAPTER XIV \"l DO NOT WANT TO GO \" IT is a bad thing to call down a crisis in the night- *t.me. A scene\"at midnight is a savage enemy of ultimate understanding, and that Devil, called ci%T.TT- '^\"^'^'.^^ ^^ °^'''^'' the objects bums ^\"''°\" '\" ^°\"^'^t ^hen the midnight candle He should have been seized with a fit of remorse however, at the sight he saw in the Manor CartL; at midmght of the day when Jean Jacques Barbille had reached his fiftieth year. There is nothing wh ch, for pathos and for tragedy, can compare with a struggle between the young and the old. The Devil of Estrangement when he sees it, may go away and mdulge himself in sleep; for the;e wiU olVh T.u\"^ *^'^ ''''°' °\"^ y°\"\"S and the other fh^vuf T ''^^'■*' °\" ^'^^h other's anvils, when the hghts are low and it is long till morning. When Jean Jacques had broken the forgotten guitar wh ch his daughter had retrieved from her \"ad nil 'f 'i '''' ^^\"°^ C-t'- (-\" ^I^e he had had packed and stored away in the flour-mill out of",
         "I7S m The Money Master sight) and thrown it in the fire, there had begun a revolt in the girl's heart, founded on a sense of in-justice, but which itself became injustice also; and that is a dark thing to come between those who love — even as parent and child. After her first exclamation of dismay and pain, Zee had regained her composure, and during the rest of the evening she was full of feverish gaiety. In-deed her spirits and playful hospitality made the evening a success in spite of the skeleton at the feast. Jean Jacques had also roused himself, and, when the dance began, he joined in with spirit, though his face was worn and haggard even when Ughted by his smile. But though the evening came to the con-ventional height of hilarity, there was a note run-ning through it which made even the youngest look at each other, as though to say, \"Now, what's going to happen next!\" Three people at any rate knew that something was going to happen. They were Zoe, the Man from Outside and M. Fille. Zo6 had had more than one revelation that night, and she felt again as she did one day, seven years before, when, coming home from over the hills, she had stepped into a house where Horror brooded as palpably as though it sat beside the fire, or hung above the family table. She had felt something as soon as she had entered the door that far-off day, though the house seemed empty. It was an emptiness which was filled with a torturing presence or torturing presences. It had stilled her yoimg heart. What was it? She had learned the truth soon enough. Out of the sunset",
         "176 'I do not want to go\" had come her father with a face twisted with miscrv and as she ran to him, he had caught he by boTh bceondl;^''' '^\"i^ '^^^ 'y^' '° somethfn, fS usT She t. ^\"\"'^^ '^\"^•' :'^''' '' Kone-gone from us I She has run away from home! Curse her baptism— curse it, curse it!\" Zo^ could never forget these last words she hid ever heard her father speak of Camden. They were h^af 7t wa\"r\"'\u003e\"f\\\"7 ^^^^'''^ ^'^'ddert\" near, it was a pity he had used them for thpv Tr^L\\'^^ \"•* '^^* ^'^^^ J^- motheT'hrd ttl n tt dT^l' \"r^\"^; ™^' '^ ^P'*^ °f tJ^« f-t that ZtTf^y-uZ f ^^' ^''■'^y' \"^^^^ J'er mother was with them she had ever been nearer to her fatW and that, after first childhood, she and her mothe; ZITZT' \" n'^^'^ ^^-' -h- 'he went to Sleep to the humming of a chanson of Cadiz Her ouTo S \"''h-':*°°'^- '^°^-^^-' kept stSing\"?; out of the dim distances of childhood's ignorance and with modesty and allusiveness, whispfnnTwi edge in her ear. So it was that now she TooLrbTck so™S 'h ' VT '\"\"^ \"^-^ ^P^'^' withintSt'and sound of her handsome mother, and out of tho hunger of her own spirit she had come to idealize her memory. It was good to have a loving father at l^st to go and lay her head on a heart that would And now here at last was come Crisis wh,Vh showed its thunderous head in the gay Xnce anJ",
         "177 The Money Master K n ' shook its war-locks in the I'lrc, where her mother's guitar had shrieked in its last agony. When all the guests had gone, when the bolts had been shot home, and old Scraphe Comiche had gone to bod, father and daughter came face to face. There was a moment's pause, as the two looked at each other, and then Zoc came up to Jean Jacques to kiss him good-night. It was her way of facing the issue. Instinctively she knew that he would draw back, and that the striiggle would begin. It might almost seem that she had invited it; for she had let the Man from Outside hold her hand for far longer than courtesy required, while her father looked on with fretful eyes— even with a murmuring which was not a benediction. Indeed, he had evaded shaking hands with his hated visitor by suddenly offenng him a cigar, and then in the doorway itself handing a lighted match. \"His eminence. Cardinal Christophe, gave these cigars to me wlie- . he passed through St. Saviour's five years ago,\" Jean Jacques had remarked loftily, \"and I always smoke one on my birthday. I am a good Cathohc, and his eminence rested here for a whole day.\" He had had a grim pleasure in avoiding the hand-shake, and in having the Protestant outsider smoke the Catholic cigar! In his anger it seemed to him that he had done something worthy almost of the Vatican, indeed of the great Cardinal Christophe himself. Even in his moments of crisis, in his hours of real tragedy, in the times when he was shaken to",
         "178 \"I do not want to go\" the centre, Jean Jacques fancied himself more than a little. It was as the master-carpenter had remarked seven years before, he was always invohmtarily sav- B^bilSr '°'\"°-'°°'^ ^' ■\"«• I -\"^ J'-'-n Jacques When Zo6 reached out a hand to touch his arm and raised her face as though to kiss him good-night Jean Jacques drew back. ' iv'^°! ^'''^.^\"u'\"^ ''''^- '\"^^\"\"'^ ^--^ '°^^ things —What IS all this between you and that man? I have seen. You must not forget who you are^ the daughter of Jean Jacques Barbille, of the Manor Cartier, whose name is known in the ^vhole province who was asked to stand for the legislature. You ^re Zoe Barbille— Mademoiselle Zoe Barbille. We do not put on airs We are kind to our neighbours, but I am descended from the Baron of Beaugard. I have a place— yes, a place in society; and it is for you to respect it. You comprehend?\" _ Zoe flushed, but there was no hesitation whatever in her reply. \"I am what I have always been, and It IS not my fault that I am the daughter of M. lean Jacques Barbille ! I have never done anything which was not good enough for the Manor Cartier \" She held her head firmly as she said it. Now Jean Jacques flushed, and he did hesitate in ms reply. He hated irony in anyone else, though he oved ,t m himself, when heaven gave him inspiration thereto He was in a state of tension, and was ready to break out, to be a force let loose-that is the way he would have expressed it; and he was faced bv a new spint m his daughter which would surely spring 179 ii. if'.",
         "li^ir The Money Master i the mine, unless he secured peace by strategy. He had sense enough to feel the danger. He did not see, however, any course for diplomacy here, for she had given him his cue in her last words. As a pure logician he was bound to take it, though it might lead to drama of a kind painful to them both. \"It is not good enough for the Manor Cartier that you go falling in love with a nobody from nowhere,\" he responded. \"I am not falling in love,\" she rejoined. \"What did you mean, then, by looking at him as you did; by whispering together; by letting him hold your hand when he left, and him looking at you as though he'd eat you up — without sugar!\" \"I said I was not falling in love,\" she persisted quietly, but with characteristic boldness. \"I am in love.\" \"You are in love with him — with that interloper! Heaven of heavens, do you speak the truth ? Answer me, Zo6 Barbille.\" She bridled. \"Certainly I will answer. Did you think I would let a man look at me as he did, that I would look at a man as I looked at him, that I would let him hold my hand as I did, if I did not love him? Have you ever seen me do it before?\" Her voice was even and quiet — as though she had made up her mind on a course, and meant to carry it through to the end. \"No, I never saw you look at a man like that, and ever3rthing is as you say, but — \" his voice suddenly became uneven and higher-pitched and a little hoarse, 1",
         "80 'J do not want to go\" •'but he is English, he is an actor-only that- ind he )s a Protestant.\" ^ ' '^\"\" \"Only that?\" she asked, for the tone of his voice was such as one would use in speaking of a to^d or vermin, and she could not bear t \"it h ^ ^° to be any one of those things^\" '^'^^' \"The Barbilles have been here for twr\u003e i,„„^ a years: they have been French C.^LlTsl^rtt Ss ir^^ L\"°i \"^\"^'^ sure-\"sincc the tin.e of Louis XI. he added at a venture, and then Dau\u003c«.H overcome by his own rashness ^ ' gard. Wha is there against Gerard except that he Taf \"\u003e^°';V''\"' ^' ■' ^\"S\"^'^- ^\"d that he is a Protes! tant? Is there anything.?\" =\u003e\" ^roies \"Sacriis it not enough? An actor, what is that- '•It w\"^';^ f '\"^\"\"'^ ^'^^ ^\"'^ -' t° be yourself .\" It would be better for a great many people to be someone else rather than themselves-for notW and he does it for money.\" notning, \"For money! What money has he got? You don t know. None of us know. Besides heW Protestant, and he's English, and that Ids it There never has been an Englishman or a Kotes -SeSr^:r^^^srEtr^ th ng of the woman who had left him seven yea sTgo -left this comfortable home of his to go to^^^is^^ce",
         "lol If y The Money Master and exile, and God only knew what else! Here in this very room — yes, here where they now were, father and daughter, stood husband and wife that morning when he had his hand on the lever prepared to destroy the man who had invaded his home; who had cast a blight upon it, which remained after all the years; after he had done all a man could do to keep the home and the woman too. The woman had gone; the home remained with his daughter in it, and now again there was a fight for home and the woman. Memory reproduced the picture of the mother standing just where the daughter now stood, Carmen quiet and well in hand, and himsef all shaken with weakness, and wuh all power gone out of him— even the power which rage and a mur-derous soul give. But yt this was different. There was no such shame here as had fallen on him seven years ago. But there was a shame after its kind; and if it were not averted, there was the end of the home, of the prestige, the pride and the hope of \"M'sieu' Jean Jacques, philosophe.\" ' ' What shall not begin here at the Manor Cartier ?' ' she asked with burning check. \"The shame — it shall not begin here.\" \"What shame, father?\" \"Of marriage with a Protestant and an actor.\" \"You will not let me marry him?\" she persisted stubbornly. Her words seemed to shake him all to pieces. It was as though he was going through the older tragedy all over again. It had possessed him",
         "ever \"I do not want to ro\" since the sight of Carmen's guitar had driven him mad three hours ago. He swayed to and fro, even as he d,d when hir, hand left the lever and he kt the aster-caijenter go free. It was indeed a philosopher under torture, a spirit rocking on its anchor. Just now she had put into wordt herself what, even m his fear, he had hoped had no place m her mind-mamaKe with the man. He did not know this daughter of his very well. There was that m her which was far beyond his ken. Thousands of miles away m Spain it had origin, and the stream of tendency came dovv-n through long generations, by courses unknown to him. \"Marrj- him — you want to marry him!\" he o'f rp'otest^nt'r\"\" '^\"' \"'\"' *° \"^\"^ ''''' *^-\"P Her eyes blazed in anger. Tramp-the man with the air of a young Alexander, with a voice like the low notes of the guitar thrown to the flames! Tramp' wuJ r°, T ^ ?^^* *° \"^^\"^ '^''\"•\" •*« answered with a kind of calmness, however, though all her body was quivering. Suddenly she canie close to her tather. a great sympathy welled up in her eyes, and her voice shook. \"I do not want to leave you, father, and I never meant to do so. I never thought of it as possible- but now It IS different. I want to stay with you but I want to go with him too.\" J \". out Presently as she seemed to weaken before him, he hardened. \"You can't have both.\" \" . declared l-lu ^\\'?\"* sternness as was possi .. him and with a Norman wilfulness which wa. ..ot st^gth",
         "m Tlie Money Master ' i! \"You shall not marry an actor and a Protestant. You shall not niarr\u003e' a man like that — never — never — never. If you do, you will never have a penny of mine, and I will never \" \"Oh, hush — Mother of Heaven, hush!\" she cried. \"You shall not put a curse on mc too.\" \"What curse?\" he burst forth, passion shaking him. \"You cursed my mother's baptism. It would be a curse to be told that you would sec me no more, that I should be no more pari of this home. There has been enough of that curse here. . . . Ah, why — why — \" she added with a sudden rush of indigna-tion, ' ' why did you destroy the only thing I had of hers? It was all that was left — her guitar. I loved it so.\" All at once, with a cry of pain, she turned and ran to the door entering on the staircase which led to her room. In the doorway she turned. \"I can't help it. I can't help it, father. I love him — but I love you too,\" she cried. \"I don't want to go — oh, I don't w-ant to go! Why do you ?\" her voice choked; she did not finish the sentence; or if she did, he could not hear. Then she opened the door wide, and disappeared into the darkness of the unlightcd stairway, murmur-ing, \"Pity — have pity on me, holy Mother, Viergc Marie!\" Then the door closed behind her almost with a bang. After a moment of stupefied inaction Jean Jacques hurried over and threw open the door she had closed. \"2ki6 — little Zo6, come baci 184 . say",
         "good-i 'I do not wnnt to go' ho lallcd. liut slie did not hoar, for, with a burst of oryinR, she had hurried into her own room and shut and locked the door. It was a pity, a measureless pity, as Mary the Mother must have seen, if she could see mortal life at all. that Zoo did not ho.ir him. It mijjht have altered the future. As it was. the Devil of Estrange-ment might well be content with his night's",
         "work CHAPTER XV I i BON MARCHE WILRAY was having its market dey, and every-one was either going to or coming from market or buying and selling in the little square by the Court House. It was the time when the fruits were coming m, when vegetables were in full yield, when fish from the Beau Cheval were to be had in plenty— from mud-cats and suckers, pike and perch, to rock- bass, sturgeon and even maskinonge. Also it was the time of year when butter and eggs, chickens and ducks were so cheap that it was a humiliation not to buy. There were other things on sale also, not for catmg and drinking, but for wear and household use —from pots and pans to rag-carpets and table-linen from woollen yam to pictures of the Virgin and little calvaries. These were side by side with dried apples, bottled fruits, jars of maple syrup, and cordials of so gener-ous and penetrating a nature that the currant and elderberry wme by which they were flanked were tipple for babes beside them. Indeed, when a man wanted to forget himself quickly he drank one of these cordials, in preference to the white whisky so commonly imbibed in the parishes. But the cordials",
         "i86 Bon marche ?-\" - cSirSi: I! ^^^'^ to Ripubhqt,c!\" ov \"Vive la Rdncr though m",
         "\"pi The Money Master ^ I this last toast of the Empire was none too common — but he could only drink with real sincerity to the health of Sebastian Dolores, which was himself. Sebastian Dolores was the pure anarchist, the most complete of monomaniacs. \"Here comes the father of the Spanische,\" re-marked M^re Langlois, wuo presided over a heap of household necessities, chiefly dried fruits, preserves and pickles, as Sebastian Dolores appeared not far away. \"Good-for-nothing villain! I pity the poor priest that confesses him.\" \"Who is the Spanische?\" asked a young woman from her own stall or stand very near, as she in-voluntarily arranged her hair and adjusted her waist-belt; for the rakish-looking reprobate, with the air of having been somewhere, was making to-wards them ; and she was young enough to care how she looked when a man, who took notice, was near. Her own husband had been a horse-doctor, farmer and sportsman of a kind, and she herself was now a farmer of a kind; and she had only resided in the parish during the three years since she had been married to, and buried, Palass Poucette. Old Mere Langlois looked at her companion in merchanting irritably, then she remembered that Virginie Poucette was a stranger, in a way, and was therefore deserving of pity, and she said with com-passionate patronage: \"Newcomer you — I'd for-gotten. Look you then, the Spanische was the wife of my third cousin, M'sieu' Jean Jacques, and — — \" Virginie Poucette nodded, and the slight frown cleared from her low yet shapely forehead. \"Yes,",
         "i88 Bon marclie yes, of course I know. I've heard enough. What a fool she was, and M'sieu' Jean Jacques so rich and kind and good-looking! So this is her father— well well, well!\" Palass Poucette's widow leaned forward and looked intently at Sebastian Dolores, who had stop;, d near by, and facing a couple of barrels 'on which were exposed some bottles of cordial and home-made wine. He was addressing himself with cheer-ful words to the dame that owned the merchandise \"I suppose you think it's a pity Jean Jacques can t get a divorce,\" said Mere Langlois rather spite-fully to Virgmie, for .she had her sex's aversion to widows who had had their share of mankind and were afterwards free to have someone else's share as well But suddenly repenting, for Virginie was a hard-working widow who had behaved vcr- well for an outsider— having come from Chalfonte be-yond the Beau Cheval— she added: \"But if he was a Protestant and could get a divorce, and you did marry him, you'd r- ':e him have more sense than he s got; for you've .. quiet sensible way, and you've worked hard since Palass Poucette died.\" \"Where doesn't he show sense, that M'sieu' Jean Jacques?\" the younger woman asked. I'Where? Why, with his girl— with Ma'm'selle.\" Everybody I ever heard speaks well of Ma'm'-selle Zoe,\" returned the other warmly, for she had a very generous mind and a truthful, sentimental heart. M6re Langlois sniffed, and put her hands on her hips, for she had a daughter of her own; also she",
         "yli The Money Master i ' was a relation of Jean Jacques, and therefore resented in one way the difference in their social position, while yet she plumed herself on being kin. \"Then you'll learn something now you never knew before,\" she said. \"She's been carrying on — there's no other word for it — with an actor fellow \" \"Yes, yes, I did hear about him — a Protestant and an Englishman.\" \"Well, then, why do you pretend you don't know — only to hear me talk, is it? Take my word, I'd teach cousin Zoe a lesson with all her education and her two years at the convent. Wasn't it enough that her mother should spoil everything for Jean Jacques, and make the Manor Cartier a place to point the finger at, without her bringing disgrace on the parish too! What happened last night — didn't I hear this morning before I had my breakfast! Didn't I \" She then proceeded to describe the scene in which Jean Jacques had thrown the wrecked guitar of his vanished spouse into the fire. Before she had fin ished, however, something occurred which swept them into another act of the famous history of Jean Jacques Barbille and his house. She had arrived at the point where Zo6 had cried aloud in pain at her father's incendiary act, when there was a great stir at the Court House door which opened on the market place, and vagrant cheers arose. These were presently followed by a more disciplined fusillade; which presently, in turn, was met by hisses and some raucous cries of resentinent. These increased as a man appeared on the steps of",
         "190 Bon marche the Court House, looked round for a moment in a dazed kind of way, then seeing some friends below who were swarming towards him, gave a ribald cry, and scrambled down the steps towards them. He was the prisoner whose release had suddenly been secured by a piece of evidence which had come as a thunder-clap on judge and jury. Immediately after giving this remarkable evidence the witness- Sebastian Dolores— had left the court-room. He was now engaged in buying cordials in the market-place— m buying and drinking them; for he had pulled the cork out of a bottle filled with a rich yellow liquid, and had drained half the bottle at a gulp. Presently he offered the remainder to a passmg carter, who made a gesture of contempt and passed on, for, to him, white whisky was the only drink worth while. Besides, he disliked Sebas-tian Dolores. Then, with a flourish, the Spaniard tendered the bottle to Madame Langlois and Palass Poucette's widow, at whose corner of merchandise he had now arrived. Surely there never was a more benign villain and perjurer in the worid than Sebastian Dolores! His evidence, given a half-hour before, with every sign of truthfulness, was false. The man— Rocque Vales- cure— for whom he gave it was no friend of his- but he owned a tavern called \"The Red Eagle,\" a few miles from the works where the Spaniard was em-ployed; also Rocque Valescure's wife set a good ta-ble, and Sebastian Dolores was a very liberal feeder; when he was not hungry he was always thirsty.' The appeasement of hunger and thirst was now 191 iii 'Mil 4 ',1 M' h 1.",
         "iflM The Money Master i f become a probl(}m to him, for his employers at Beauhamais had given him a month's notice because of certain irregularities which had come to their knowledge. Like a wise man Sebastian Dolores had said nothing about this abroad, but had enlarged his credit in every direction, and had then planned this piece of friendly perjury for Rocque Valescure, who was now descending the steps of the Court House to the arms of his friends and amid the ex-ecrations of his foes. What the alleged crime was does not matter. It has no vital significance in the history of Jean Jacques Barbille, though it has its place as a swivel on which the future swung. Sebastian Dolores had saved Rocque Valescure from at least three years in jail, and possibly a very heavy fine as well; and this service must have its due reward. Something for nothing was not the motto of Sebastian Dolores; and he confidently looked forward to having a home at \"The Red Eagle\" and a banker in its landlord. He was no longer certain that he could rely on help from Jean Jacques, to whom he already owed so much. That was why he wanted to make Rocque Valescure his debtor. It was not his way to perjure his soul for nothing. He had done so in Spain — ^yet not for nothing either. He had saved his head, which was now doing useful work for himself and for a needy fellow-creature. No one could doubt that he had helped a neighbour in great need, and had done it at some expense to his own nerve and brain. None but an expert could have lied as he had done in the witness-box. Also he had upheld his lies with a",
         "192 Bon niarfhc sinking narrative of circumstantiality. He made thmgs fit m \"like mortised blocks\" as the Clerk of the Court said to Judge Carcasson, when they dis-cussed the infamy afterwards with clear conviction that It was perjury of a shameless kind ; for one who would perjure himself to save a man from jail would also swear a man into the gallows-rope. But Judge Carcasson had not been able to charge the jury m that sense, for there was no effective evidence to rebut the untruthful attestation of the Spaniard It had to be taken for what it was worth, since the prosecuting attorney could not shake it; and yet to the Court itself it was manifestly false witness. Sebastian Dolores was too wise to throw himself into the arms of his released tavern-keeper here immediately after the trial, or to allow Rocque Valescure a like indiscretion and luxury; for there was a strong law against perjury, and right well Sebastian Dolores knew that old Judge Carcasson would have little mercy on him, in spite of the fact that he was the grandfather of Zo6 BarbiUe The Judge would probably think that safe custody for his wayward character would be the kindest thine he could do for Zo6. Therefore it was that Sebastian Dolores paid no attention to the progress of the released landlord of The Red Eagle,\" though, by a glance out of the corner of his eyes, he made sure that the footsteps ot liberated guilt were marching at a tangent from where he was— even to the nearest tavern. It was enough for Dolores that he should watch the result of his good deed from the isolated area '^ 193",
         "ittfin; The Money Master ■!| where he now was, in the company of two virtuous representatives of domesticity. His time with lib-erated guilt would come! He chuckled to think how he had provided himself with a refuge against his hour of trouble. That very day he had left his employment, meaning to return no more, securing his full wages through having suddenly become re-sentful and troublesome, neglectful — and imperative. To avoid further unpleasantness the firm had paid him all his wages; and he had straightway come to Vilray to earn his bed and board by other means than through a pen, a ledger and a gift for figures. It would not be a permanent security against the future, but it would suffice for the moment. It was a rest-place on the road. If the worst came to the worst, there was his grand-daughter and his dear son-in-law whom he so seldom saw — blood was thicker than water, and he would see to it that it was not thinned by neglect. Meanwhile he ogled Palass Poucette's widow with one eye, and talked softly with his tongue to MSre Langlois, as he importuned Madame to, \"Gip the good cordial in the name of charity to all and malice towards none.\" \"You're a bad man — you, and I want none of your cordials,\" was M^re Langlois's response. \"Malice towards none, indeed! If you and the Devil started business in the same street, you'd make him close up shop in a year. I've got your measure, for sure ; I have you certain as an arm and a pair of stirrups.\" \"I go about doing good — only good,\" returned",
         "194 Bon marche the old sinner with a leer at the young widow, whose fingers he managed to press unseen, as he swung the little bottle of cordial before the eyes of M^re Langlois. He was not wholly surprised when Palass Poucette's widow did not show abrupt dis-pleasure at his bold familiarity. A wild thought flashed into his mind. Might there not be another refuge here— here in Palass Poucette's widow! He was sixty-three, it was true, and she was only thirty-two; but for her to be an old man's darling who had no doubt been a young man's slave, that would surely have its weight with her. Also she owned the farm where she lived; and she was pleasant pasturage— that was the phrase he used in his own mind, even as his eye swept from M6re Langlois to hers in swift, hungry inquiry. He seemed in earnest when he spoke— but that was his way; it had done him service often. \"I do good whenever it comes my way to do it,\" he continued. \"I left my work this morning''— he lied of course—\" and hired a buggy to bring me over here, all at my own cost, to save a fellow-man. There in the Court House he was sure of prison, with a wife and three small children weeping in 'The Red Eagle' ; and there I come at great expense and trouble to tell the truth— before all to tell the truth— and save him and set him free. Yonder he is in the tavern, the work of my hands, a gift to the world from an honest man with a good heart and a sense of justice, But for me there would be a wife and three children in the bondage of shame, sorrow, poverty and misery\"— his eyes again",
         "195 The Money Master t \u003e ravished the brown eyes nf Palass Poucctte's widow —\"and hero a(;ain I drink to my own health and to that of all Rood people— with charity to all and malice towards none!\" The little bottle of golden cordial was raised to-wards Mere Lan^»lois. The finders of one hand, however, were a^ain seekinK those of the comely younK widow who was half behind him, when he felt them caught spasmodically away. Before he had time to turn round he heard a voice, saying: \"I should have thought that, 'With malice to all and charity towards nor -,' was your motto, Dolores.\" He knew that voice well enough. He had always ha.d a lurking fear that he would hear it say some-thing devastating to him, from the great chair where its owner sat and dispensed what justice a jury would permit him to do. That devastating some-thing would be agony to one who loved liberty and freedom— had not that ever been his watchword, liberty and freedom to do what he pleased in the world and with the world? Yes, he well knew Judge Carcasson's voice. He would have recognized it in the dark — or under the black cap. \"M'sieu' le juge!\" he said, even before he turned round and saw the faces of the tiny Judge and his Clerk of the Court. There was a kind of quivering about his mouth, and a startled look in his eyes as he faced the two. But there was the widow of Palass Poucette, and, if he was to pursue and fre-quent her, something must be done to keep him decently figured in her eye and mind. \"It cost me three dollars to come here and save",
         "196 Bdii iniirclu'- a man from jail to-day, m'.siou' lo juKc.\" he added firmly. The JudKc rrcsso\u003cl the point of his eane against the stomach of the hyi)()eritc and perjurer. \"If the Devil and you meet, he will take of! his hat to you my escaped J«(irc7;(,s/\"— Dolores started almost vio-lently now— \"for you can teach him much, and Ananias was the merest aboriginal to you. But we'll get you— we'll jret you, Dolores. You saved that guilty fellow by a careful and remarkable perjury to-day. In a long experience I have never seen a better performance- have you, monsieur?\" he added to M. Fille. \"But once,\" w,is the pointed and deliberate reply \"Ah, when was that?\" asked Judge Carcasson, interested. \"The year monsieur Ic juge was ill, and Judge Blaquiere took your place. It was in Vilray at the Court House here.\" \"Ah— ah, and who was the phenomenon— the perfect liar?\" asked the Judge with the eagerness of the expert. \"His name was Sebastian Dolores,\" meditatively replied M. Fille. \"It was even a finer performance than that of to-day.\" The Judge gave a little gmnt of surprise. \"Twice eh?\" he asked. \"Yet this was good enough to break any record,\" he added. He fastened the young widow's eyes. \"Madame, y(ju are young, and you have an eye of intelligence. Be sure of this: you can protect yourself against almost any-one except a liar— t , madame?\" he added to Mdre 197 in'\"! 1j",
         "m The Money Maatcr i Langlois. \"I am sure your experience of life and your good sense \" \"My good sense would make me think purgatory was hell if I saw him\" — she nodded savagely at Dolores as she said it, for she had seen that last efTort of his to take the fingers of Palass Poucette's widow — \"if I saw him there, m'sieu' le juge.\" \"We'll have you yet — we'll have you yet, Do-lores,\" said the Judge, as the Spaniard prepared to move on. But, as Dolores went, he again caught the eyes of the young widow. This made him suddenly bold. '\"Thou shalt not bear false witness against thy neighbour,' — that is the commandment, is it not, m'sieu' le juge? You are doing against me what I didn't do in Court to-day. I saved a man from your malice.\" The crook of the Judge's cane caught the Span-iard's arm, and held him gently. \"You're possessed of a devil, Dolores,\" he said, \"and I hope I'll never have to administer justice in your case. I might be more man than judge. But you will come to no good end. You will cer-tainly \" He got no further, for the attention of all was suddenly arrested by a wagon driving furiously round the comer of the Court House. It was a red wagon. In it was Jean Jacques Barbille. His face was white and set; his head was thrust forward, as though looking at something far ahead of him ; the pony stallions he was driving were white with sweat, and he had an air of tragic helplessness and panic.",
         "198 Bon march6 Suddenly a child ran across the roadway in front of the ponies, and the wild cry of the mother roused Jeati Jacques out of his agonized trance. He sprang '°.v.'^^ ,!'' '^^\"^i''\"K the horses backward and aside with deftness and presence of mind. The margin of safety was not more than a foot, but the child was SUVGu. The philosopher of the Manor Cartier seemed to come out of a dream as men and women applauded and cnes arose of \"Bravo, M'sieu' Jean Jacques ''= At any other time this would have made Jean ta^ f°n ''\"^•\"\"\"x; °' ^^\"\"^ ■* '^^\"d- °' exclaim ^ll^^f f'^l'^ship. Now, however, his eyes were full of trouble, and the glassiness of the semi-trance leaving them, they shifted restlessly here and there Suddenly they fastened on the little group of ^,-i,--ch Judge Carcasson was the centre. He had stopped his horses almost beside them Judge. Ah! he again exclaimed, as the glance ran from the Judge to Sebastian Dolores \"Ah mercy of God!\" he added, in a voice which had both a low note and a high note-deep misery and shrill protest m one. Then he seemed to choke; and words would not come, but he kept looking, looking at Sebastian Dolores, as though fascinated and tortured oy the sight of him. nl'J^fL'^''' J^^\" Jacques?\" asked the little Clerk of the Court gently, coming forward and laying a hand on the streaming flank of a spent and trem oiing pony. As though he could not withdraw his gaze from 199",
         "lilt The Money Master Sebastian Dolores, Jean Jacques did not look at M. Fille; but he thrust out the long whip ho carried towards the father of his vanished Carmen and his Zoe's grandfather, and with the deliberation of one to whom speaking was like the laceration of a nerve he said; ''Zoe's run away — gone — gone!\" At that moment Louis Charron, his cousin, at whose house Gerard Fyncs had lodged, came down the street galloping his horse. Seeing the red wagon, he made for it, and drew rein. \"It's no good, Jean Jacques,\" he called. \"They're married and gone to Montreal — married right under our noses by the Protestant minister at Terrebasse Junction. I've got the telegram here from the sta-tion-master at Terrebasse. . . . Ah, the villain to steal away like that — only a child — from her own father! Here it is — the telegram. But believe me, an actor, a Protestant and a foreigner — what a devil's mess!\" He waved the telegram towards Jean Jacques. \"Did he owe you anything, Louis?\" asked old M6re Langlois, whose practical mind was alert to find the material status of things. \"Not a sou. Well, but he was honest, I'll say that for the rogue and seducer.\" \"Seducer — ah, God choke you with your own tongue!\" cried Jean Jacques, turning on Louis Charron with a savage jerk of the whip he held. \"She is as pure \" \"It is no marriage, of course!\" squeaked a voice from the crowd. \"It '11 be all right among the English, won't",
         "it. Bon :arcnt' monsieur le juge?\" asked .'-.; s^ert'.e . -idow of Pala.. Poucette whom the scene seemed to rouse out of her natural shyness. T„2f°''.r?\"':„T'^'\"\"°' \"\"\"^^ ^\"'•^■\" answered the tf^% . ^ir^^ ^'^ ^\" right among the Hnglish, and It ,s all right among the French so far as the law is eoncerned. As for the Church, that is anottr ma^ ten But-but see,\" he added, addressing Louis Uiarron, docs the station-master say v^hat nlace they took tickets for?\" «Mt place \"Montreal and Winnipeg,\" was the reply. \"Here as Lo'::d:i^\"^^'^^^^'\"- ^^''-ipe.-thafs Is Enghsh \"Winnipeg-a thousand miles!\" moaned Jean Jacques. •' \" ■ ^Vj,^Vt^\"^\"^y ^'hich the tickets for Winnipeg .gnificd, the shrill panic emotion seemed toTas! from him In its numbing, deadening force it was like a sentence on a prisoner. As many eyes ^vere on Sebastian Dolores as on Tean Jacques \"It's the bad blood that was in her \" Sebasri/^^Xr' ' '^\"^^'^^\"^ ^^^'\"- ^--^^ rnJ^I'^T ^\"\"^ ^^°°'^ '^* °\"* ^'°\"ld be a good thing \" remarked a truculent river-driver, who had g\"ven iJoIores m the tnal just concluded. There was a savage look in his eye. totvttf T °°/°^'=^J''^^'-d. and he was not the man l^ Ind W • \"^'=°\"'d do no good where he n Lf. ''V\"™'*^ ^° '\"^^'^ ^^^ market-place; but m domg so he sought the eye of Virginie Poucette, 20 T",
         ":3f The Money Master t.l who, however, kept her face at an angle from him, as she saw Mere Langlois sharply watching her. \"Grandfather, mothf^r and daughter, all of a piece!\" said a spiteful woman, as Sebastian Dolores passed her. The look he gave her was not the same as that he had given to Palass Poucette's widow. If it had been given by a Spanish inquisitor to a heretic, little hope would have remained in the heretic's heart. Yet there was a sad patient look on his face, as though he was a martyr. He had no wish to be a martyr; but he had a feeling that for want of other means of expressing their sympathy with Jean Jacques, these rough people might tar and feather him at least; though it was only his misfortune that those sprung from his loins had such adventurous spirits ! Sebastian Dolores was not without a real instinct regarding things. What was in his mind was also passing through that of the river-driver and a few of his friends, and they carefully watched the route he was taking. Jean Jacques prepared to depart. He had ever loved to be the centre of a picture, but here was a time when to be in the centre was torture. Eyes of morbid curiosity were looking at the open wounds of his heart — ragged wounds made by the shrapnel of tragedy and treachery, not the clean wounds got in a fair fight, easily healed. For the moment at least the little egoist was a mere suffering sold — an epitome of shame, misery and disappointment. He must straightway flee the place where he was tied to the stake of pubUc curiosity and scorn. He",
         "drew Bon marche the reins tighter, and the horses straightened to depart Then it was that old Judge Carcasson laid a hand on his knee. ''Come, come,\" he said to the dejected and broken little man, where is your philosophy?\" Jean Jacques looked at the Judge, as though with a new-bom suspicion that henceforth the world would laugh at him, and that Judge Carcasson was setting the fashion; but seeing a pitying moisture in the other s eyes, he drew himself up, set his jaw and calling on all the forces at his command, he said- Moi^je sms philosophc!\" His voice frayed a little on the last word, but his head was up now. The Clerk of the Court VNould have asked to accompany him to the Manor Cartier but he was not sure that Jean Jacques would like it' He had a feeling that Jean Jacques would wish to have his dark hour alone. So he remained silent a.id Jean Jacques touched his horses with the whip After starting, however, and having been followed and a few I-tod-you-so's and revilings for having marned as he did, Jean Jacques stopped the ponies btandmg up m the red wagon he looked round for someone whom, for a moment, he did not see in the slowly shifting crowd. Philosophy was all very well, and he had courage-ously given his allegiance to it, or a formula of it? a moment before; but there was something deeper huir\"/. \"u\" '^^ ^'\"'\" '\"^\"'^ «°\"I- His heart hungered for the two women who had been the joy and pnde of his life, even when he had been lost in",
         "203 The ^loney Master 1 the business of the material world. They were more to him than he had ever known; they were parts of himself which had slowly developed, as the features and characteristics of ancestors gradually emerge and are emphasized in a descendant as his years increase. Carmen and Zoe were more a part of him-self now than they had ever been. They were gone, the living spirits of his home. Anything that reminded him of them, despite the pain of the reminder, was dear to him. J-ove was greater than the vengeful desire of injured human nature. His eyes wandered over the people, over the market. At last he saw what he was looking for. He called. A man turned. Jean Jacques beckoned to him. He came eagerly, he hurried to the red wagon. \"Come home with me,\" said Jean Jacques. The words were addressed to Sebastian Dolores, who said to himself that this was a refuge surer than \"The Red Eagle,\" or the home of the widow Pou- cette. He climbed in beside Jean Jacques with a sigh of content. \"Ah, but that — but that is the end of our philos-opher,\" said Judge Carcasson sadly to the Clerk of the Court, as with amazement he saw this catas-trophe. \"Alas! if I had only asked to go with him, as I wished to do!\" responded M. Fille. \"There, but a minute ago, it was in my mind,\" he added with a look of pain. \"You missed your chance, falterer,\" said the Judge severely. \"If you have a good thought, act",
         "204 Bon niarcli('' on il-ihat is the gol\u003clcn rule. You missed your chance. It will never come again. He has taken ?.,T°\"^ turning, our unhappy Jean Jacques \" ^ Monsieur— oh, monsieur, do not shut the door in tne tace of God like that!\" .said the .slioeked little master of the law. \"Those two together- it may be only for a moment.\" \"Ah, no, my little owl, Jean Jacques uill wind the boa-eonstrictor round his neck like a collar all for love of those he has lost,\" answered the Judge with emotion; and he caught M. Fille's arm in the companionshi]) of .sorrow. In silence these two watched the red wagon till it was out of sight. ii mm' m the act",
         "ill m 1- ■'( '; :■■;■! j",
         "J EPOCH THE",
         "FOURTH 4,.",
         "1 CHAPTER XVI MISFORTUNES fOME NOT SINGLY JUDGE CARCASSON was rirfit. For a year ^ after Zee's flight Jean Jacques wrapt\u003eed Sebas-tian Dolores round his neck h'ke a collar, and it choked him like a boa-constrictor. But not Se- l)astian Dolores alone did that. When things begin o go wrong in the life of a man whose hands have held too many things, the disorder flutters through all the radii of his affairs, and presently they rattle away from the hub of his ontrol. So it was with Jean Jacques. To take his repro-bate fathcr-in-law to his lonely home would have brought him trouble in any case; but as things were the Spaniard became only the last straw which broke his camel's back. And what a burden his camel carried — flour-mill, ,saw-mill, ash-factory tarms, a general store, lime-kilns, agency for light-ning-rods and insurance, cattle-dealing, the project lor the new cheese-factory, and money-lending I Money-lending? It seemed strange that Jean Jacques should be able to lend money, since he him-self had to borrow, and mortgage also, from time to time. When things began to go really wrong with hun fanancially, he mortgaged his farms, his flour- '*",
         "209 The Money Master J mill, and saw-mill, and then lent money o.i other mortgages. This he did because he had always lent money, and it was a habit so associated with his prestige, that he tied himself up in borrowing and lending and counter-mortgaging till, as the saying is, \"a Philadelphia lawyer\" could not have un-ravelled his affairs without having been bom again in the law. That he was able to manipulate his tangled affairs, while keeping the confidence of those from whom he borrowed, and the admiration of tho^3 to whom he lent, '.••is evidence of his capacity. \"Genius of a kind\" Was what his biggest creditor called it later. After a personal visit to St. Saviour's, this biggest creditor and financial potentate — M. Momay — said that if Jean Jacques had been started right and trained right, he would have been a \"general in the financial field, winning big battles.\" M. Momay chanced to be a friend of Judge Car- casson, and when he visited Vilray he remembered that the Judge had ppoken often of his humble but learned friend, the Clerk of the Court, and of his sister. So M. Momay made his way from the office of the firm of avocats whom he had instructed in his affairs with Jean Jacques, to that of M. Fille. Here he was soon engaged in comment on the master- miller and philosopher. \"He has had much trouble, and no doubt his affairs have suffered,\" remarked M. Fille cautiously, when the ice had been broken and the Big Financier had referred casually to the difficulties among which Jean Jacques was trying to maintain e",
         "ilibrium; Misfortunes come not singly \"but he is a man who can do things too hard for other men.\" The Big Financier lighted another cigar and blew away several clouds of smoke before he said in reply, \"Yes, 1 know he has had family trouble again, but that is a year ago, and he has had a chance to get another grip of things.\" \"He did not sit down and mope,\" explained M. Fille. \"He was at work the next day after his daughter's flight just the same as before. He is a man of great courage. Misfortune does not paralyse him.\" M. Momay's speech was of a kind which came in spurts, with pauses of thought between, and the pause now was longer than usual. ^^ \"Paralysis — certainly not,\" he said at last. \"Physical activity is one of the manifestations of mental, moral and even physical shock and injury. I've seen a man with a bullet in him run a half- mile — anywhere; I've seen a man ripped up by a crosscut-saw hold himself together, and walk— any-where— till he dropped. Physical and nervous activ-ity is one of the forms which shattered force takes. I expect that your 'M'sieu' Jean Jacques' has been busier this last year than ever before in his life. He'd have to be; for a man who has as many irons in the fire as he has, must keep running from bellows to bellows when misfortune starts to damp him down.\" The Clerk of the Court sighed. He realized the significance of what his visitor was saying. Ever since Zoc had gone, Jean Jacques had been for ever m \"",
         "\u003c The Moncv Muster on the- move, for ivit makinj; hay on which the sun ih.l not shim-. Jean Jaccims' face thiso clays was hncd anil chanceful. It lookc-d unstaMc and timl- as thouuli disturbin;,' forces wcrc\u003e working up to the surface out of control. The lirown eyes, too, were far more rc-slless than they had ever been since the AiHoiiw «;is wrecked, and their owner returned with Carmen to the Manor Carticr. But tlie new restlessness of tlie eyes was different from the old. That was a mobility impelled by an active, in- ciuisitive soul, trj-ing to observe what was ^oinK on m the world, and to m;iko sure that its possessor was beitiK «'en by th.e world. This activity was that of a mind essentially concerned to find liou- m;iny ways it could see for escape from a maze of thia^rs; while his vanity was takinj; new foni \u003e;. It was always an.xious to discover if the world was trying to know how ho was taking the blows of fate and fortune. He had been determined that, whatever came, it should not see him paraly.sed or broken. As M.^ Fille only nodded his head in sorrowful assent, Ihe Big Financier became more explicit. He was determined to lose nothing by Jean Jacques\", and he was prepared to take instant action when it was required; but he was also interested in the man who might have done really jiowerful things in the wc)rld, had he gone about them in the right way. \"M. Barbille has had some lawsuits this year is it not so?\" he asked. \"Two of importance, monsieur, and one is not yet decided,\" answered M. Fille. \"He lost those suits of",
         "importance?'\" Misfortunes conic not singly \"That is so, monsieur.\" ncr? 1 he Dig Financier seemed to be i.rcssin^ towards a point. jn-Mnj, •'SomothinR over that amount, monsieur \" ^ And he may lose the suit now 1., fore the Courts '\" the h ill'''\" t^'\". ■\"onsicur!\" vaguely comn.ented tne little learned ofTieial. M. Momay was not to he evaded, \"^-c, yes but the case as it stands to y„u v.ho are ^^'d in experience of legal aflfairs, ,loes it seem at all a sure thing for him? ' \"I wish I could .say it was, monsieur,\" sadly answered the other. ^ The Dig Financier nodded vigorously. \"Exactiv Nothing is so unproductive as the law. It is ex pensive whether you win or lose, and it is murdc'r- ously expensive when you do lose. You will ob- can only be killed once — eh?\" rcn'.,^': ^^' ^'^^'^ '^\"\"^^^ '^'^ \"°^ ^^^'''^P ^^^^ M. -JO, , s voice became precise. \"I will explain. Ho has never created; he has only dtvel- of'lTtf',''\"' ^r\" ''''''\"^- \"° '•\"'-■rited n-uch of wha he has or has had. His designs ^^•cre ah^a^ s affected by the fact that he had never built from the vejy bottom. When he goes to pieces \" Monsieur— to pieces!\" exclaimed the Clerk of the Court painfully. \"Well put it another way. If he is broken financially, he will never come up again. Not be\" 213 m",
         "I The Money Master i t M cause of his age — I lost a second fortune at fifty, and have a third ready to lose at sixty — but because the primary initiative won't be in him. He'll say he has lost, and that there's an end to it all. His philosophy will come into play — just at the last. It will help him in one way and harm him in another.\" \"Ah, then you know about his philosophy, mon-sieur.?\" queried M. Fille. Was Jean Jacques' phi-losophy, after all, to be a real concrete asset of his life sooner or later? The Big Financier smiled, and turned some coins over in his pocket rather loudly. Presently he said : \"The first time I ever saw him he treated me to a page of Descartes. It cost him one per cent. I always charge a man for talking sentiment to me in business hours. I had to listen to him, and he had to pay me for listening. I've no doubt his general yearly expenditure has been increased for the same reason — eh, Mattre Fille? He has done it with others — yes?\" M. Fille waved a hand in deprecation, and his voice had a little acidity as he replied: \"Ah, mon-sieur, what can we poor provincials do — any of us — in dealing with men like you, philosophy or no philosophy? You get us between the upper and the nether mill-stones. You are cosmopolitan; M. Jean Jacques Barbille is a provincial; and you, because he has soid enough to forget business for a moment and to speak of things that matter more than money and business, you grind him into powder.\" M. Momay shook his head and lighted his cigar again. \"There you are wrong, Mattre Fille. It is 214",
         "J;.[ Misfortunes come not singly * I i bad pohcy to gnnd to powder, or grind at all, men out of whom you are making money. It is better to keep them from between the upper and nether miU-stones. I have done so with your BarbiUe I could give him such trouble as would bring things crashmg down upon him at once, if I wanted to be merely VICIOUS m getting my own; but that would Z^'^ T T^T^^^ f°^ '\"e to meet at dinner my fnend Judge Carcasson. So, as long as I can I aflTJ ^'^'' ^-\"l- .^\"* ^ ^^\" y°\" tJ^^t the margin of safety on which he is moving now is too narrow -scarce a foot-hold. He has too much undeT construction in the business of his life, and if one stone shps out down may come the whole pile. He has stopped building the cheese-factorv— ^hat represents sheer loss. The ash-factory is ?o close tL can oTh \"\"\"^ '^' ^\"™'' \"'^'^ ^^'\"^ t° sustain the call of his many interests, can't stand the drain on'.°v?K '''?''^' P^°P'^ '^^a^-'y indebted to him' nei nf t7 ^° down-well, it depends on the sound^ hm talk nVf'\"\".'^ ^' ^°''^^- \" *^^y l^^t-^d to tZ ^^ f^ '!^J^^I: ^\"^°\"'-aged him to do it, and mfde ^h. 7 ''^''^ ''' ^^^\" '^\"^ ''^'g^'\" -^^ being Thl rf t. f fu ^'r^^ '^^ ''^\"\"ty '^ inadequate.\" vol L V^^ ^°'''\"^ '^\"'^'^'^ \"P- \"Monsieur, you are veiy hard on a man who for twenty-five years has been a figure and a power in this part oi the province. You sneer at one who has been a benefactor to the place where he lives; who has given with the right hand and the kft; whose enterpnse has been a source of profit to many and",
         "\"S it i') The Money Master who has got a savage reward for the acts of a blame-less and generous life. You know his troubles, mon-sieur, and wo who have seen him bear them with fortitude and Christian philosophy, we resent— — \" \"You need resent nothing, Ma?tre Fille,\" inter-rupted the Big Financier, not unkindly. \"Wliat I have said has been said to his friend and the friend of my own great friend. Judge Carcasson ; and I am only an.xious that he should be warned by someone whose opinions count with him; whom ho can trust \" \"But, monsieur, alas!\" broke in the Clerk of the Court, \"that is the trouble; he does not select those he can trust. He is too confiding. He believes those who flatter him, who impose on his good heart. It has always been so.\" \"I judge it is so still in the case of Monsieur Dolores, his daughter's grandfather?\" the Big Fi-nancier asked quizzically. \"It is so, monsieur,\" replied M. Fille. \"The loss of his daughter shook him even more than the flight of his wife; and it is as though he could not live without that scoundrel near him — a vicious man, who makes trouble wherever he goes. He was a cause of loss to M. Barbille years ago when he managed the ash-factory; he is very dangerous to women — even now he is a danger to the future of a young widow\" (he meant the widow of Palass Poucette); \"and he has caused a scandal by per-jury as a witness, and by the consequences — but I need not speak \u003cif that here. He will do Jean Jacques great harm in thi\u003e end, of that I am sure. 216 !",
         "( Misfortunes come not singly The very day Mademoiselle Zo6 left the Manor Cartier to marry the English actor, Jean Jacques took that Spanish bad-lot to his home; and there he stays, and the old friends go— the old friends go; and he does not seem to miss them.\" There was something like a sob in M. Fille's voice. He had loved Zee in a way that in a mother would have meant martyrdom if necessary, and in a father would have meant sacrifice when needed; and indeed ho had sacrificed both time and mon../ to find Zoe. He had even gone as far as Wir.nipeg on the chance of finding her, making that first big joiuTiey in the worid, which was as much to him in all ways as a journey to Bagdad would mean to most people of M. Momay's worid. Also he had spent money since in corresponding with lawyers in the West whom he engaged to search for her; but Zoe had never been found. She had never written but one letter to Jean Jacques since her flight. This letter said, in effect, that she would come back when her husband was no longer \"a beggar\" as her father had called him, and not till then. It was written en route to Winnipeg, at the dictation of Gerard Fynes, who had a romantic view of life and a mistaken pride, but some courage too — the courage of love. \"He thinks his daughter will come back— yes?\" asked M. Momay \"Once he said to me that he was sorry there was no lady to welcome me at the Manor Cartier, but that he hoped his daughter would yet have the honour. His talk is quite spa-cious and lofty at times, as you know.\"",
         "317 The Money Master I'V' h. n \"So — that is so, monsieur . . . Mademoiselle Zee's room is always ready for her. At time of Noel he sent cards to all the families of the parish who had been his friends, as from his daughter and himself; and when people came to visit at the Manor on New Year's Day, he said to each and all that his daughter regretted she could not arrive in time from the West to receive them; but that next year she would cer-tainly have the pleasure.\" ' ' Like the light in the window for the unreturn- ing sailor,\" somewhat cynically remarked the Big Finan 'ir. \"Did many come to the Manor on that New 1 ,ar's Day?\" \"But yes, many, monsieur. Some came from kindness, and some because they were curious \" \"And Monsieur Dolores?\" The lips of the Clerk of the Court curled. \"He went about with a manner as soft as that of a young cur6. Butter would not melt in his mouth. Some of the women were sorry for him, until they knew he had given one of Jean Jacques' best bear-skin rugs to Madame Palass Poucette for a New Year's gift.\" The Big Financier laughed cheerfully. \"It's an old way to popularity — being generous with other people's money. That is why I am here. The people that spend your Jean Jacques' money will be spending mine too, if I don't take care.\" M. Fille noted the hard look which now settled in M. Momay's face, and it disturbed him. He rose and leaned over the table towards his visitor anx-iously.",
         "at8 Misfortunes come not singly \"Tell mo, if you please, monsieur, is there any rca and immediate danger of the financial collapse ot Jean Jacques?\" ^ The other regarded M. Pille with a look of con-sideration He liked this Clerk of the Court, but he liked Jean Jacques for the matter of that and away now from the big financial arena where he usually worker,, his natural instincts had play He had come to St. Saviour's with a bigger thing in his mind than Jean Jacques and his affairs; he had come on the matter of a railway, and had taken Jean Jacques on the way, as it were. The scheme for the railway looked very promising to him, and he was in good humour; so that all he said about Tean Jacques was free from that general irritation of spint which has sacrificed many a small man on a big man s altar. He saw the agitation he had caused, and he alrnost repented of what he had already said' yet he had acted with a view to getting M. Fille to warn Jean Jacques. \"I repeat what I said,\" he now replied. \"Mon- n/'\\\" '^^^'^\"''' ^^^''^ ^\"\"^ *°° \"i^ely balanced. A little shove one way or another and over goes the whole caboose. If anyone here has influen^ce over him, It would be a kindness to use it. That case before the Court of Appeal, for instance; he'd be better advised to settle it, if there is still time, une or two of the mortgages he holds ought to be law tf/ rj'\"' \"^ \"^^ ^'' °\"' °^ *h-« -\" tL tZ^^ u\"\"- .^' °''^^' *° P°\"\u003c^h the money that s owing him; he ought to shave away his insur-ance, his hghtmng-rod. and his horse-dealing, busi- 319",
         "i The Money Master ■i: I , ncss; and he ought to sell his farms and his store, and concentrate on the flour-mill and the saw-mill. He has had his warnings generally from my lawyers, but what he wants most is the gentle hand to lead him; and I should think that yours, M. Fille, is the hand the Almighty would choose if He was con-cerned with what happens at St. Saviour's and wanted an agent.\" The Clerk of the Court blushed greatly. This was a very big man indeed in the great commercial world, and flattery from him had unusual signifi-cance; but he threw out his hands with a gesture of helplessness, and said: \"Monsieur, if I could be of use I would; but he has ceased to listen to me; he \" He got no further, for there was a sharp knock at the street door of the outer office, and M. Fille has-tened to the other room. After a moment he came back, a familiar voice following him. \"It is Monsieur Barbille, monsieur,\" M. Fille said quietly, but with apprehensive eyes. \"Well — he wants to sec me?\" asked M. Momay. \"No, no, monsieur. It would be better if he did not see you. He is in some agitation.\" \"Fille! Maitre Fille — be quick now,\" called Jean Jacques' voice from the other room. \"What did I say, monsieur?\" asked the Big Financier. \"The mind that's received a blow must be moving— moving ; the man with the many irons must be flying from bellows to bellows!\" \"Come, come, there's no time to lose,\" came Jean Jacques' voice again, and the handle of the door of their room",
         "turned. Misfortunes come not singly M. Fille's hand caught the handle. \"Excuse me, Monsieur Barbille,— a minute please,\" he persisted almost querulously. \"Be good enough to keep your manners . . . monsieur!\" he added to the Financier, \"if you do not wish to speak with him, there is a door\"— he pointed— \"which will let you into the side-street.\" \"What is his trouble?\" asked M. Momay. M. Fille hesitated, then said reflectively: \"He has lost his case in the Appeal Court, m.onsieur; also, his cousin, Auguste Charron, who has been working the Latouchc farm, has flitted, leaving \" ''Leaving Jean Jacques to pay unexpected debts?\" \"So, monsieur.\" \"Then I can be of no use, I fear,\" remarked M. Momay dryly. \"Fille! Fille!\" came the voice of Jean Jacques insistently from the room. \"And so I will say ati revoir, Monsieur Fille,\" continued the Big Financier. A moment later the great man was gone, and M. FiUe was alone with the philosopher of the Manor Cartier. \"Well, well, why do you keep me waiting! MTio was it in there — anyone that's concerned with my afl'airs?\" asked Jean Jacques. these days he was sensitive when there was no cause, and he was credulous where he ought to be suspicious. The fact that the little man had held the door against him made him sure that M. Fille had not wished him to see the departed",
         "visitor. The Money Master f ; \"Come, out with it— who was it making fresh trouble for mc?\" persisted Jean Jacques. \"No one making trouble for you, my friend,\" answered the Clerk of the Court, \"but someone who was trying to do you a good turn.\" \"He must have be n a stranger then,\" returned Jean Jacques bitterly. ' ' Who was it ?\" M. Fille, after an instant's further hesitation, told him. \"Oh, him — M. Momay!\" exclaimed Jean Jacques, with a look of relief, his face lighting. \"That's a big man with a most capable and far-reaching mind. He takes a thing in as the ocean mouths a river. If I had had men Hke that to deal with all my life, what a different ledger I'd be balancing now! Descartes, Kant, Voltaire, Rousseau, Hume, Hegel —he has an ear for them all. That is the intellectual side of him; and in business\" — he turew up a hand — \"there he views the landscape from the mountain- top. He has vision, strategy, executive. He is Napoleon and Anacreon in one. He is of the builders on the one hand, of the Illmninali and the Encyclo- pedistes on the other.\" Even the Clerk of the Court, with his circum-scribed range of thought and experience, in that moment saw Jean Jacques as he really was. Here was a man whose house of life was beginning to sway from an earthquake ; who had been smitten in sev-eral deadly ways, and was about to receive buflfet- ings beyond aught he had yet experienced, philoso-phising on the tight-rope— Blondin and Plato in one. Yet sardonically piteous as it was, the",
         "incident Misfortunes come not singly had shown Jean Jacques with the genn of something big in him. He had recognized in M. Momay, who could level him to the dust to-morrow financially, a master of the world's affairs, a prospector of life's fields, who would march fearlessly beyond the farthest frontiers into the unknown. Jean Jacques' admiration of the lion who could, and would, slay him was the best tribute to his own character. M. Fille's eyes moistened as he realized it; and he knew that nothing he could say or do would make this man accommodate his actions to the hard rules of the business of life ; he must for ever be applying to them conceptions of a half-developed mind. \"Quite so, qviite so, Jean Jacques,\" M. Fille responded gently, \"but\"^ — here came a firmer note to his voice, for he had taken to heart the lesson M. Momay had taught him, and he was determined to do his duty now when the opportunity was in his hand — \"but you have got to deal with things as they are; not as they might have been. If you can-not have the great men, you have to deal with the little men — like me. You have to prove yourself bigger than the rest of us by doing things better. A man doesn't fail only because of others, but also because of himself. You were warned that the chances were all against you in the case that's just been decided, yet you wotUd go on; you were warned that your cousin, Auguste Charron, was in debt, and that his wife was mad to get away from the farm and go West, yet you would take no notice. Nov/ he has gone, and you have to pay, and your case has gone against you in the Appellate Court besides. 233 iili '■n ■ m mm 1 '■Hi 1 i",
         "1 The Money Master ... I will tell you the truth, my friend, even if it cuts me to the heart. You have not kept your judg-ment m hand; you have gone ahead like a bull at a gate; and you pay the price. You listen to those who flatter, and on those who would go through fire and water for you, you turn your back-on those who would help you in your hour of trouble, in your dark day.\" Jean Jacques drew himself up with a gesture im-patient, masterful and forbidding. \"I have fought my fight alone in the dark day; I have not asked for anyone's help,\" he answered. \"I have wept on no man s shoulder. I have been mauled by the claws of injury and shame, and I have not flinched X have healed my own wounds, and I wear my scars without \" ' He stopped, for there came a sharp rat-tat-tat at the door which opened into the street. Somehow the commonplace, trivial interruption produced on both a strange, even startling effect. It suddenly produced m their minds a feeling of apprehension, as though there was whispered in their ears, \"Some-thing IS going to happen— beware!\" Rat-tat-tat! The two men looked at each other, ihe same thought was in the minds of both. Jean Jacques clutched at h beard nervously, then with an effort he controlled himself. He took off his hat as though he was about to greet some important person, or to receive sentence in a court. Instinc-tively he felt the little book of philosophy which he always earned now in his breast-pocket, as a pietist would finger his beads in moments of fear or anxiety.",
         "224 Misfortunes come not singly The Clerk of the Court passed his thin liand over his hair, as he was wont to do in court when the Judge began his charge to the jury, and then with an action more impulsive than was usual with him, he held out his hand, and Jean Jacques grasped it. Some-thing was bringing them together just when it seemed that, in the storm of Jean Jacciues' indigna-tion, they were about to fall apart. M. Fille's eyes said as plainly as words could do, \"Courage, my friend!\" Rat-tat-tat! Rat-tat-tat! The knocking was sharp and imperative now. The Clerk of the Court went quickly forward and threw open the door. There stepped inside the widow of Palass Poucette. She had a letter in her hand. \"M'sieu\", pardon, if I intrude,\" she said to M. Fille; \"but I heard that M'sieu' Jean Jacques was here. I have news for him.\" News !\" repeated Jean Jacques, and he looked like a man who was waiting for what he feared to hear. \"They told me at the post-office that you were here. I got the letter only a quarter of an hour ago, and I thought I would go at once to the Manor Cartier and tell M'sieu' Jean Jacques what the letter says. I wanted to go to the Manor Cartier for some-thing else as well, but I will speak of that by and by. It is the letter now.\" She pulled ofif first one glove and then the other, still holding the letter, as though she was about to perform some ceremony. \"It was a good thing I found out that M'sieu' Jean Jacques was here. It saves a four-mile drive,\" she remarked. 1.^ 2J5 ';l",
         "M The Money Master The news-ah, nom do Dim, the slowness of the woman-hke a river Roing uphill!\" exclaimed Jean Shis Hmbs ° \"^\"^ ^\"'^'\"^ '' ^\"\"^\"^ *° \"'\" \"''' trembling The widow of Palass Poucette flushed, but she had some sense in her head, and she realized that Jean ferr T™' T^ \"\"'^ unbalanced at the moment, indeed, Jean Jacques was not so old that she would have found ,t difficult to take a well-defined and Sh?I! n \"'' !\" 'J''\"' ^'^'\"^ t-i'-cumstances propitious. She held out the letter to him at once. \"It is from my sister in the West-at Shilali,\" she explained. There is nothing m it you can't read, and most of it concerns you. ' hif^u--^^^?r\"^' ^'^^ *^ ''=\"'=^' •'\"t he could not bnng himself to read it, for Virginie Poucette's man-ner was not suggestive of happy tidings. After an instant s hesitation he handed the letter to M Fille who pressed his lips with an air of determination,' and put on his glasses. Jean Jacques saw the face of the Clerk of the Court flush and then turn pale as he read the letter. There, be quick!\" he said before M. Fille had turned the first page. Then the widow of Palass Poucette came to him and, in a simple harmless way she had, free from coquetry or guile, stood beside him. took his hand and held It. He seemed almost unconscious of her act but his fingers convulsively tightened on hers- while she reflected that here was one who needed help sorely; here was a good, warm-hearted man on whom a woman could empty out afifection like rain",
         "226 Misfortunes c-omc not sinnly and pt a Rood harvest. Sho really was as simple as a child, was Virninie I'oucettc, .nd even in her ac- ciuaintancc with vSebastian Dolores, there had only been working in her the natural desire of a primitive woman to have a man saying that which would keep ahvc m her the things that make her sing as she toils; and certainly Virginie toiled late and early on her farm. She really was concerned for Jean Jacques. Both wife and daughter had iaken flight, and he was alone and in trouble. At this moment she felt she would like to be a sister to him- she was young enough to be his daughter almost. Her heart was kind. \"Now!\" said Jean Jacques at last, as the Clerk of the Court's eyes reached the end of the last page \"Now, speak! It is— it is my Zoe?\" \"It is our Zoe,\" answered M. Fille. \"Figtire de Christ, what do you wait for— she is not dead?\" e.xclaimed Jean Jacques with a courage which made him set his fca squarely. The Qerk of the Court shook his head and be-gan. \"She is alive. Madame Poucette's sister saw her by chance. Zoo was on her w ay up the Saskat-chewan River to the Peace River country with her husband. Her husband's health wr.s bad. He had to leave the stage in the United States where he had gone after Winnipeg, The doctors said he m.ust live the open-air life. He and Zoe were going north to take a farm somewhere.\" \"vSomewhere! Somewhere!\" murmured Jean Jacques. \"The farther away from Jean Jacques the better — that is what she thinks.\"",
         "337 Hi The Money Master ./. ' Fillo 4r \"\"m '^'°,\"^' \"^y ^\"^\"'^•\" rejoined M. Jil M .'^''^ '° ^^^^\"^^ Poucettc's sister \"- he held up the letter-\"that when they had proved they eould hve without anybody's help theyloS come back to see you. Zoe thought that, havSg taken her hfe m her own hands, she ought to Sv herself before she asked your forgiveness Si plaee at your table. She felt that you could only there itfsr '' \"\" ^'°'\"^ ''\"'^ '\"\"^''^^^ ^\"\"'-b\"* \"It is romance, it is quixotism— ah, heart of God what qu.xot.sm!\" exclaimed Jean Jacques. ' bhe gets her romance and quixotism from feV'^^S^ °r'\"'^'\" ''''°'''^ *' Clerof T^ like you.\" \"\"\"'^ ^^\"\"'\"^ *^^\" thinking- Jean Jacques' heart was bleeding, but he drew lumself up proudly, and caught his hand aw^y frZ crumbled h.s pnde grew more insistent. M. FiUe had challenged his intellect-his intellect- ),„ A, }^^ ^^'''' ^ procession of practical things \" he declared oracularly. \"I have been a mln ^f ircrir.5?/\"VT' l^-- dreamer. iThlnk 1 act I suffer. I have been the victim of romance my 1 fVwwtT ^^\"^ \"' ^°^' -^^^ has Sn Tl/li !, \"' Romance-romance, first with one Mattre P^lif '\"°'^\"-' ^\"^'^ ^^^''\"^ ^^an thinking Maftre File -you say that? Why, the Barbille have ever .n the past built up life on a basis of though a«d action, and I have added philosophy-the science",
         "228 Misfortunes come not singly of thought and act. Jean Jacques BarbiUe has been the man of design and the man of action also Don Quucote was a fool, a dreamer, but Jean lacnues i. no Don Quixote. He is a man who has done ^hTngs but also he IS a man who has been broken on the been torn— '?' \" ' \"\"\" \"^°^^ heart-strings have He had worked himself up into a fit of eloquence and revolt^ He was touched by the rod of despera-tion, which makes the soul protest that it is rieht when It knows that I is wrong. Suddenly, breaking off his speech, he threw up his hands and made for the door. \"I will fight it out alone!\" he declared with rough emotion, and at the door he turned towards them agam He looked at them both as though he would dare them to contradict him. I'he restless fire of his_^es seemed to dart from one to the other 1 hats the way it is.\" said the widow of Palass Foucette, coming quickly fonvard to him \"It', always the way. We must fight our battles alone buc we don t have to bear the wounds alone. In the battle you are alone, but the hand to heal the wo^lT^ ^° another's. You arc a philosopher- wcU, what I speak is true, isn't it?\" \\irginie had said the one thing which could have stayed the tide of Jean Jacques' pessimism and broken his cloud of gloom. She appealed to him m the tune of an old song. The years and the c^rs^s tSliSr '\"^'^\"^^ '\"\"^ \"'\"-\" ^^^^ ^^ - He stopped with his hand on the door.",
         "229 The Money Master r t h Thats so, without doubt that's so,\" he said Sudd r fr^^\"^ °\" ^ t™*h of Hfc, Jdamc ■; Suddenly there came into his look sometW of he yeam.ng and hunger which the lonely and for Joan Jacques was not a widower-and .hi ' honest woman and .enuinelTTendTrleter ^\" vi Ji c3u;,°. ^'^.^/rvra's'of \"-'\"™n\" mistake it was left at my S^L by ^, J^ J?: to-mmrit^^. tpW t:i ^' ~ eagerly. ^ ^^^ Jacques almost",
         "230 Misfortunes come not singly I told M s,cu Dolores to-day never to enter my house again. I didn't know it was your ruJ R was giving away your property, not his own,\" she humedly explained, and her face flushed M. Fille was in distress. Jean Jacques had had a warning about Sebastian Dolores, but here was another pit into which he might fall, the pit digred by a widow, who, no doubt, would not hesitatfto Z\"7^^- '^^°^?.^'l Catholic philosopher, if he could ^tLft \\^ was going to Virginie Poucette's t ..,,\"\"''* '^^^•, ^^^ ^-^' ^' I'ad as it could be yet there was this to the good, that it was to morrow and not to-day; and who could tell what might happen between to-day and to-morrow ! A moment later the three were standing outside nto h r '^ '\"'\" ''''fr ^' J^^\" Jacques%limbed into his red wagon, Virginie Poucette's eyes were anrl^f 1 '° the northern sky where a reddish glow appeared, and she gave an exclamation of surprise. _ _ That must be a fire, \" she said, pointing. A l)it of pine-land probably,\" said M. Fille— with anxiety however, for the red glow lay in the i^artier and Jean Jacques' mills. Maltre Fille was possessed of a superstition that all the things which threaten a man's life to wreck it, operate awhile - their many fields before they converge li^fan",
         "231 The Money Master ii'' 1 vLTJ\" T ^\",V° ^'^^''' '^^ 'a«t attack on their w I ' . ' '^ ''\"■^''' ^'^y \"°t four or five or fiftv\" and they starLtrMy'tat^'^g ^'.f- '^r-- S-a^TiftSrHeS^^^ ^S^=S^^Sar?S^S^^ crelse?a^s'hetUrrUS„rSe '''%.^'T ^\"- ^e whip a,ai„ sha^J^^STh^ S^So^X Vet h:s eyes scarce y left the skv Ti,» ^ ^' vSon^Xh^^^releXe^^^^^^^^ -^\"^ -^ -\" ofM Fille \" ''^^P^'^ than the imagination repl\"' '\"\"■' J\"\" J\"'\u003e«»' fl™™lll,\" »i« the Wajons and buegie, ,„\u003c! cart, b...n to i.w.",
         "tfc„ CHAPTER XVII HIS GREATEST ASSET JEAN JACQUES did not go to the house of tt,« J w:dow of Palass Pouccttc 'next day 'The h^ proposed, and she did not expect hL. She had seen his flour-mil! burned to the ground on the eve nmg when they met in the office of the Clerk of the Court, when Jean Jacques had learned that his zS had gone irto farther and farther places awav frr^ him. Perhaps Virginia Poucette nevTr hi 'hed as many tears in any whole year of her life as Se did that nght not excepting the year PalLs PouceUe died, and left her his farm and seven horses more or less sound and a threshing-machine in J^od 'on dition. The woman had a rare heart and there was .y^^ u. ^\"^ ^'\"^ \"° ^'\u003c=ar idea as to how that could be done, but she had held his handTt anv rate, and he had seemed the better for it vfrgSe had only an objective view of things; and if she was not matenal, still she could best expre s herlelf through the medium of the senses \" -^tw' :r °'^''%^''^'^^' her who shed tears also those uho saw Jean Jacques' chief asset suri dcniy disappear in flame and smcke and all hSoS",
         "-23 'i The Money Master '/ ;?,■■ i 1 1 , assets become thereby liabilities of a kind ; and there were many who would be the poorer in the end because of it. If Jean Jacques went down, he prob-ably would not go alone. Jean Jacques had done a good fire-insurance business over a course of years, but somehow he had not insured himself as heavily as he ought to have done; and in any case the fire- policy for the mill was not in his own hands. It was in the safe-keeping of M. Momay at Montreal, who had warned M. Fille of the crisis in the money- master's affairs on the very day that the crisis came. No one ever knew how it was that the mill took fire, but there was one man who had more than a shrewd suspicion, though there was no occasion for mentioning it. This was Sebastian Dolores. He had not set the mill afire. That would have been profitable from no standpoint, and he had no grudge against Jean Jacques. Why should he have a grudge? Jean Jacques' good fortune, as things were, made his own good fortune; for he ate and drank and slept and was clothed at his son-in-law's expense. But he guessed accurately who had set the mill on fire, and that it was done accidentally. He remem-bered that a man who smoked bad tobacco which had to be lighted over and over again, threw a burning match down after applying it to his pipe. He remembered that there was a heap of flour- bags near where the man stood when the match was thrown dov.-n ; and that some loose strings for tying were also in a pile beside the bags. So it was easy for the thing to have happened if the man did not turn round after he threw the match down, but",
         "234 His greatest asset went swaying on out of the mill, and over to the Manor Cartier, and up staggering to bed; for he had been drinking potato-brandy, and he had been brought up on the mild wines of Spain! In other words, the man who threw down the lighted match which did the mischief was Sebastian Eolores himself. He regretted it quite as much as he had ever re-gretted anything; and on the night of the fire there were tears in his large brown eyes which deceived the New Cure and others; though they did not deceive the widow of Palass Poucctte, w ho had found him out, and who now had no pleasure at all in his aged gallantries. But the regret Dolores experienced would not prevent him from doing Jean Jacques still greater injury if, and when, the chance occurred, should it be to his own advantage. Jean Jacques shed no tears on the night that his beloved flour-mill became a blackened ruin, and his saw-mill had a narrow escape. He was like one in a dream, scarcely realizing that men were saying kind things to him; that the New Cure held his hand and spoke to him more like a brother than one whose profession it was to be good to those who suffered. In his eyes was the same half-rapt, intense, distant look which came into them when, at Vilray, he saw that red reflection in the sky over against St. Saviour's, and urged his horses onward. The worid knew that the burning of the mill was a blow to Jean Jacques, but it did not know how great and heavy the blow was. First one and then another of his friends said he was insured, and that",
         "235 The Money Master '■ i ■ ■ 1 ■ ' t- in another six months the mill-wheel would be turn-ing again. They said so to Jean Jacques when he stood with his eyes fixed on the burning fabric, which nothing could save; but he showed no desire to speak. He only nodded and kept on staring at the fire with that curious underglow in his eyes. Some chemistry of the soul had taken place in him in the hour when he drove to the Manor Cartier from Vilray, and it produced a strange fire, which merged into the re-flection of the sky above the burning mill. Later, came things which were strange and eventful in his life, but that underglow was for ever afterwards in his eyes. It was in singular contrast to the snapping fire which had been theirs all the days of his life till now— the snapping fire of action, will and design. It still was there when they said to him suddenly that the wind had changed, and that the flame and sparks were now blowing towards the saw-mill. Even when he gave orders, and set to work to defend the saw-mill, arranging a line of men with buckets on its roof, and so saving it, this look remained. It was something spiritual and unmaterial, something, may-be, which had to do with the philosophy he had preached, thought and practised over long years. It did not, disappear when at last, after n'ldnight, every-one had gone, and the smouldering ruins of his greatest asset lay mournful in the wan light of the moon. Kind and good friends like the Clerk of the Court and the New Cure iiad seen him to his bedroom at midnight, leaving him there with a promise that they would come on the morrow; and he had said good-",
         "236 His greatest asset night evenly, and had shut the door upon them with a sort of smile. But long after they had gone, when Sebastian Dolores and Seraphe Corniche were asleep, he had got up again and left the house, to gaze at the spot where the big white mill with the red roof had been— the mill which had been there in the days of the Baron of Beaugard, and to which time had only added size and adornment. The gold-cock weather- vane of the mill, so lorn; the admiration of people living and dead, and indeed the symbol of himsc'f, as he had been told, being so full of life and pride,' courage and vigour— it lay among the ruins, black-ened relic of the Barbillcs. He had said in M. Fille's office not many hours before, \"I will fight it all out alone,\" and here in the tragic quiet of the night he made his resolve a reality. In appearance he was not now like the \"Seigneur\" who sang to the sailors on the Antuine when she was fighting for the shore of Gaspe; nevertheless there was that in him which would keep him much the same man to the end. Indeed, as he got into bed that fateful night he said aloud: \"They shall sec that I am not beaten. If they give me time up there in Montreal I'll keep the place till Zod comes back— till Zot- comes home.\" As he lay and tried to sleep, he kept saying over to himself, \"Till Zoe comes home.\" He thought that if he could but have Zo6 back, it all would not matter so much. She would keep looking at him and saying, \"There's the man that never flinched when things wont wrong; there's the man that was a friend to everyone.\" 237",
         "ill! The Money Master ( ' At last a. thought came to liim— the key to the situation as it seemed, the one thing necessary to meet the financial situation. He would sell the biggest farm \"lo owned, which had been to him in its importance like the flour-mill itself. He had had an offer for it that very day, and a bigger offer still a week before. It was mortgaged to within eight thousand dollars of what it could be sold for but, if he could gain time, that eight thousand dollars would build the mill again. M. Momay, the big financier, would certainly see that this was his due — to get his chance to pull things straight. Yes, he would certainly sell the Barbille Farm to-morrow. With this thought in his mind he went to sleep at last, and he did not wake till the sun was high. It was a sun of the most wonderful brightness and warmth. Yesterday it would have made the Manor Cartier and all around it look like Arcady. But as it shone upon the ruins of the mill, when Jean Jacques went out into the working world again, it made so gaunt and hideous a picture that, in spite of himself, a cry of misery came from his lips. Through all the misfortunes which had come to him the outward semblance of things had remained, and when he went in and out of the plantation of the Manor Cartier, there was no physical change in the surroundings, which betrayed the troubles and disasters fallen upon its overlord. There it all was just as it had ever been, and seeming to deny that anything had changed in the lives of those 'vho made the place other than a dead or deserted world.",
         "238 His greatest asset When Carmen went, when Zok fled, when his cousin Auguste Charron took his flight, when defeats at law abashed him, the house and mills, and stores and offices, and goodly trees, and well-kept yards and bams and cattle-sheds all looked the same. Thus it was that he had been fortified. In one sense his miseries had seemed unreal, because all was the same in the outward scene. It was as though it all said to him: \"It is a dream that those you love have vanished, that ill-fortune sits by your fireside. One night you will go to bed thinking that wife and child have gone, that your treasury is nearly empty; and in the morning you will wake up and find your loved ones sitting in their accustomed places, and your treasury will be full to overflowing as of old.\" So it was while the picture of his home scene remained unbroken and serene; but the hideous mass of last night's holocaust was now before his eyes, with little streams of smoke rising from the cindered pile, and a hundred things with which his eyes had been familiar lay distorted, excoriated and useless. He realized with sudden completeness that a terrible change had come in his life, that a cyclone had rained the face of his created world. This picture did more to open up Jean Jacques' eyes to his real position in life than anything he had experienced, than any sorrow he had suffered. He had been in torment in the past, but he had refused to see that he was in Hades. Now it was as though he had been led through the streets of Hell by some dark spirit, while in vain he looked round for his old 239",
         "(i The Moiipy Mnsier ■ friends Kant and Hegel, Voltaire in.l Kn.„. Rochefoucauld. Plato' and Aristot\" ^°\"\"\"\" ''\"' While gazing at the dismal scene, however ind unheeding the idlers who poke.l ak,ut amonVthe ru.ns and watched him as one who was the \"tntle Cock oTne;''= ?'•'';\"'{ ^^^'^^ -^'^ht of tUS ^U^2-i,r;j^'----4o. =tr^Kr:^h^.:;;^^^r^hJ^ aTes^nd'thtd^r' fr \"r^^^'^ '\" \"derrth and a doud like\"!, f '\" '^\" ''^\"'^''^ °\" '^'^ ^^''-^t. round hi^ V . *^ °\" ^^\"^ ^\"''^^ °f Gaspe settled u!.nea nead ot the Cock among the ruins To hi= fnZTlT \"P\"'\"'^'' ^'^'^ ^«°-^*^ ^d the mS ;i ve ^ thoU7hrCo?n 'p\"'° \"*^°\"'- ^S-\"- I' -\" '» mougn the Cock of Beaugard had reillv err, moned h.m to action, and theLw^ hadl't ZZ",
         "240 . n i I",
         ":i His greatest asset that of a barnyard bantam not a hundred feet away trom him. Jean Jacques' head went up too \"Me— I am what I always was, nothing can change me he excxaimcd defiantly. \"I will seU the Bar- biUe Farm and build the mill again.\" .u^°^^ \"^^ ^^\"\"^ ^y ^°°^ \"'^ ^y \"ook, and because the Big Financier had more heart than he even acknowledged to his own wife, Jean Jacques did sell the Barbille Farm, and got in cash— in good hard cash-eight thousand dollars after the mortgage vvas paid. M. Momay was even willing to take the inadequate indemnity of the insurance policy on the niiU, and lose the rest, in order that Jean Jacques should have the eight thousand dollars to rebuild Ihis he did because Jean Jacques showed such amaz-ing courage after the burning of the mill, and spread himself out in a greater activity than his career had yet shown. He shaved through this financial crisis, in spite of the blow he had received by the loss of his lawsuits, the flitting of his cousin, Augusto Charron, and the farm debts of this same cousin It all meant a series of manipulations made possible by the apparent confidence reposed in him bv M Momay. ■' On the day he sold his farm he was by no means out of danger of absolute insolvency— he was in tact rumcd; but he was not yet the victim of those processes which would make him legally insolvent. I he vultures were hovering, but they had not yet swooped, and there was the Manor saw-mill going night and day; for by the strangest good luck Jean 111 241 m",
         "Ri: The Money Master Jacques received an order for M. Momay's new rail- kio £ f ^^T'°\" -- behind that) which ^oSd \"I like his pluck, but still, ten to one, he loses \" remarked M. Momay to Judge Carcasson. ' He is you'uS'tTk'\"' ' '''\"' \"'^^ Napoleon tha you oughtn t to be partner with an unlucky man \" Yet you have had to do with Monsieur Jean Jacques,\" responded the aged Judge M. Momay nodded indulgently. ''Yes, without risk, up to the burning of the mill Now I take my chances, simply becauL l4 a fool oo m sp,te of all the wisdom I see in histor^ Ind \" k .%?\"'?\"\"\"''='• ^ °\"Sht to have closed him up, but I've let him go on, you see \" ■'hJZ/'^^ \"°* r?'\"* ''■\" '■'^'\"^^ked the Judge. He really is worth it. tl,l?.v ^- *^!\"'', ^ \"\"''\" '■'^Sret it financially. I think 0? vo ,r'V' *'t '\"'* ^\"'^ °' *^^ ^\"'bition and ene^ of your Jean Jacques. That often happens-a man summons up all his reserves for one last effort \"t's par y pnde, partly the tmdcfeated thing in hL partly the gambling spirit which seizes men £ nothing js left but one great spectacular success or else be blotted out. That's the case with your ph° osopher; and Fm not sure that I won't lose twenty thousand dollars by him yet.\" •■wt.nty fhlT°!^'''^ '°u '\"°'\"'= '\"\"'^^ '^^^ justification,\" retorted the Judge, who, in his ninetieth year, was stUl as ahve as his friend at sixty M. Momay waved a hand in acknowledgment, and 242 WB^Mimmm^.",
         "%\\ His greatest .asset rolled his cigar from comer to corner of his mouth. \"Oh, I've lost a lot more in my time, Judge but with a squint in my eye! But I'm doing this 'with no astigmatism. I've got the focus.\" The aged Judge gave a conciliatory murmur— he had a fine persuasive voice. \"You would never be sorry for what you have done if you had known his daughter— his Zoe. It's the thought of her that keeps him going. He wants the place to be just as she left it v.hen she comes back.\" \"Well, well, let's hope it will. I'm giving him p chance,\" replied M. Momay with his wineglass raised. \"He's got eight thousand dollars in cash to buil..l his mill again; and I hope he'll keep a tight hand on it till the mill is up.\" Keep a ::rjit hand on it? That is what Jean Jacques meant to do; but if a man wants to keep a tight hand on money he should not carry it about in his jjocket in cold, hard cash It was a foolish whim of Jean Jacques that he must have the eight thousand dollars in cash- in hundred- dollar bilLs— and not in the form of a cheque- but there was something childlike in him. When, as he thought, he had .saved himself from complete ruin he wanted to keep and gloat over the trophy of victory, and his trophy was the eight thousand dol-lars got from the BarbiUe Farm. He would have to pay out two thousand dollars in cash to the con-tractors for the rebuilding of the mill at once,— they were more than usually cautious— but he would have six thousand left, which he would put in the bank 24,3 I '! ■li. i ':(!",
         "|fi • .1 lit M ! ^^ ^ TJie Money Master with cash\"\"^ ^''^ ^\"\"^''^ ''''' \"'''' ''^ ''■''*' \"^^^ ^\"'■\"fi^'i The child in him liked the idea of puHinR out of hL^^'u'u T\\ \"^°^'\"\"'^ ^\"\"\"'^ ^\" hundred-dollar bills. He had always carried a good deal of money loose m h,s pocket, and now that his resources were so hmited he would still make a gallant show. After HrJ .^k\"''? K'''\"''^^ ^^'P°^'' «i-^ thousand dol- ng the m.ll that he paid over the stipulated two thousand dollars to the contractors on the very day he received the eight thousand. A few days later the remaining six thousand were housed in a cup-board with an iron door in the wall of his office at the Manor Cartier. \"There that will keep me in heart and promise \" said Jean Jacques as he turned the key in the",
         "lock. fortified ; out of d-dollar ■ money :es were . After nd dol- n build- ;ed two 2ry day I'S later a cup- liEcc at Jmise,\" lock. I CHAPTER X\\III JEAN JACQUES HAS ^^ N OFFER THE day after Jean Jacques had got a new lease of life and become his ov.r\\ banker, he treated himself to one of those interludes of pleasure from which he had emerged in the i)ast like a hermit from his cave. He sat on the hill above his lime-kilns, reading the little hand-book of philosophy which had played so big a part in his life. Whatever else had disturbed his mind and diverted him frcm his course, nothing had weaned him from this obsession. He still interlarded all his conversation with quota-tions from brilhant poseurs like Chateaubriand and Rochefoucauld, and from missionaries of thought like Hume and Hegel. His real joy, however, was in withdrawing for m hat might be called a scaiicc of meditation from the world's business. Some men make celebration in wine, sport and adventure; but Jean Jacques made it in flooding his mind with streams of human thought which often tried to mn uphill, which were fre-quently choked with weeds, but still were like the pool of Siloam to his vain mind. They bathed that vain mind in the illusion that it could sec into the secret springs of experience. 245 t 1^! !",
         "i 'VI i The Money Master So on as bright a day as ever the New World tacular bit of logic from one of his idols, wedeed between a P\u003eece of Aristotle quartz and Plato S ble. The sound of it was good in his earq Hp mouthed it as greeaily and happily a ' though he was not sxtfng on the edge of a voLno instead o? the^moss-grown hmestone on a hill above his o^ / Jr?/ '°\"'''';-^.'^'\"\"' '■« 'he life of a man, whatever thet gravtty or Ic-.nty, arc only to be valued and measured by the value and measure of his oum soul. Thus what oXT \";\"\"\"' \"'''\"' \"'\"' '\"\"'^-•''^ shoulh^al outer reason be a tragedy, does not of itself shake the died down' f '■''\"'■ ^\"\"^ J'^\" J'^^^\"^^' ^\"''^^ ^\"ddenly died down, for, as he sat there, the face of a woman made a v:v,d call of recognition. He slowly a™ ened from h.s self-hypnotism, to hear a woman speakmg to him ; to sec two dark eyes lookin^t hfm here f am T \" ^T '\"^ '^\"^^ ^°' \"°*'^'\"g. ^\"^ M'sie,,' T' T '\"? ^° '^y something to you, M sieu Jean Jacques.\" ' ' veJt fresh nnJ?''\"'.?^ ^\"\"^r' P\"\"^^\"*^- She looked Icme of „: . ^™ ^ '\"'^'''^' ^\"^ ^'^ \"-as 'he very cerHinlv h.H ■''. \" '\"\"^ '\"'''' \"°^ handsome, she certainly had a true and sweet comeliness of her o^vn, due to the deep rose-colour of her cheeks, ?he 246",
         "A.*!^ Jean Jacques has an offer ivory whiteness round the lustrous brown eyes the regular shining teeth which showed so much when she smiled and the look half laughing, half sentimen-tal which dominated all. Before she had finished speaking Jean Jacques was on his feet with his hat off. Somehow she seemed to be a part of that abstraction, that intoxi-cation, ,n uhich he had just been drowning his accumulated anxieties. Not that Virginie Poucette was logical or philosophical, or a child of thought for she was wholly the opposite- practical, sensuous emotional, a child of nature and of Eve. Eut neither was Jean Jacques a real child of thought, though he made unconscious pretence of it. Pie also was a child of nature-and Adam. He thought he had the cour-age of his convictions, but it was only the courage of his emotions. His philosophy was but the bent or inchnation of a mind with a capacity to feel things rather than to think them. He had feeling the first essential of the philosopher, but there he stayed an undeveloped chrysalis. ' His look was abstracted still as he took the hand of the widow of Palass Poucette; but he spoke cheerfully. \"It is a pleasure, madame, to welcome you amone my fnends,\" he said. He made a little flourish ^vith the book which had so long been his bosom friend, and added- \"But I hope you are in no trouble that you come to me— so many come to me in their troubles,\" he continued with an air of satisfaction. \"Come to you— why, you have enough troubles",
         "2^^ The Money Master ^'l of yoir own!\" she made answer. \"Ifs because you have your o^vn troubles that I'm here \" \"Why you are here,\" he remarked vaguely There was something very direct and childlike in Virgmie Poucctte. She could not pretend; she wore her heart on lur sleeve. She travelled a long dis-tance m a little v ..ile. _'I've got n., trouble myself.\" she responded. But yes I we.\" she added. \"I've got one trouble-It s yours. Ifs that youVe been having Charron the lawsuits and all the rest. Thev out of the Bankruptcy Court, and that \" Jean Jacques started, flushed, and seemed about to get angry; but shs put things right at once. People talk more than they know, but there's always some f^re where there's smoke,\" she hastened to explam. \"Besides, your father-in-law babbles more than :s good for him or for you. I thought at fr ^ \\* M Dolores was a first-class kind of man that he had had haid times too, and I let him come and .see me; but I found him out, and that was the end of It, you may be sure. If you like him, I don't u-ant to say anything more, but I'm sure that he's no real fr.cnd to you-or to anybody. If that man ^^ent to contcss,on-but there, that's not what I've come for. I vc come to say to you that I never felt so sorry for anyone in my life as I do for you I cr,od all n.ght after your beautiful mill was burned down. You were coming to see me next day-you remember what you said in M. FiUe's oifice-but",
         "248 Jean Jucr)ues has an offer I of course you couldn't. Of course, there was no reason why you should come to see me really- 1 Ve only got two hundred acres and the house Ifs a good house, though-Palass saw to that- and if-! msured; but still I know you'd have come just he same .f I'd had only two acres. I know. There's hosts of people you've been good to here, and they're sony for you; and I'm sorrier than any, for I'm aJone, and you'r,. alone, too. except for the old Dolores, and he s no good to either of us- m.ark my words no good to you! I'm sorry for you, M'sieu' Jean Jacques, and I've come to say that I'm ready to lend you two thousand dollars, if that's any help I could make it more if I had time; but son4times money on the spot is worth a lot more than what's just crawhng to you-snaiUng along while you eat your heart out. Two thousand dollars is two thou-sand do lars-I know what ifs worth to me, though It mayn t be much to you; but I didn't earn it It belonged to a first-class man, and he worked for it and he died and left it to me. It's not come easy go easy with me. I like to feel I've got two thouLd cash without having to mortgage for it. But it belonged to a number-one man, a man of brains— I've got no brams. only some sense-and I want another hiSelT\"\" *° \"'^ '* ^'^ ™^'\"' ^^^ ^\"\"'^^ ^'^^ ^°' It was a long speech, and she delivered it in Kttle gasps of oratory which were brightened by her wonderfully kind smile and the heart-not to say sentiment— which showed in her face. The senti-ment, however, did not prejudice Jean Jacques 249 ^j",
         "\\^\u003e^ The Money Master •t •: iii! t* I against her, for he was a sentimentalist himself. His feelings were very quick, and before she had spoken fifty words the underglow of his eyes was flooded by something which might have been mis-taken for tears. It was, however, only the moisture of gratitude and the soul's good feeling. \"Well there, well there,\" he said when she had finished, \"I've never had anything like this in my life before. It's the biggest thing in the art of being a neighbour I've ever seen. You've only been in the parish three years, and yet you've aiown me a con-fidence immense, inspiring! It is as the Greek philosopher said, 'To conceive the human mind aright is the greatest gift from the gods.' And to you, who never read a line of philosophy, without doubt, you have done the thing that is greatest. It says, 'I teach neighbourliness and life's exchange.' Madame, your house ought to be called Neighbour-hood House. It is the epitome of the spirit, it is the shrine of \" He was working himself up to a point where he could forget all the things that trouble humanity, in the inebriation of an idealistic soul which had a casing of passion, but the passion of the mind and not of the body; for Jean Jacques had not a sensual drift in his organism. If there had been a sensual drift, probably Carmen would still have been the lady of his manor, and he would still have been a magnate and not a potential bankrupt; for in her way Carmen had been a kind of balance to his judgment in the business of life, in spite of her own material and (at the very last) sensual strain. It",
         "250 Ji'im Jacques lias an offer wa, a godsend to Jean Jacques to have such an inspiration as Virginie Poucette had given him of\\i.'c'^\"i• J\"i*'''^\\days, somehow, get the fires of his sotil lighted, as he was wont to do in the old times, and he loved talking-how h.- loved talking of great things! He was really going hard, galloping strong, when Virginie interrupted him, first by an exclamation, then, as insistently he repeated the words. __ It ,s the epitome of the spirit, the shrine She put out a hand, interrupting him, and said' ATnlv^^'' f; \"^\"' J'^'''\" J^\"'^\"^'' that's as good as AToh^re, I s'pose, or the Archbishop at Quetec but are you going to take it, the two thousand dollars? I made a long speech. I know, but that was to tell you why I come with the money\"- she drew out a pocket-book-\"with the order on my lawyer to hand the cash over to you. As a woman I had to explain to you, there being lots of ideas about what a woman should do and what she shouldn't do- but here s nothing at all for you to explain, and M6re Langlois and a lot of others would think Tm vain enough now without your compliments. I'm a neighbour if you like, and I offer you a loan Will you take it— that's all?\" He held out his hand in silence and took the paper from her. I^itMng his head a little on one side, he read it. At first he seemed hardly to get the formal language clear in his mind, however, or maybe his rp'\"i, J^\\'*i\"f^^y '\" ^^^^ abstraction into which fin.^ff ^hf '^d It when he began his reply to her fine ofTer; but he read it out aloud, first quickly 3S1",
         "i MICROCOPY lieSOLUTION TEST CHART (ANSI and ISO TEST CHART No, 2) 1.0 I.I I ^ m 1.8 1125 1 1.4 iiiii I, _J /APPLIED HVHGE Inc =; 1653 Eost Main Street — ,-• Rochester, New ''ofk 14609 USA •-^ (716} 482 - 0300 - Phone ^^ (716) 288 - 59S9 -",
         "Fa. The Money Master then very slowly, and he looked at the signature with a deeply meditative air. \"Virginie Poucette — that's a good name,\" he remarked; \"and also good for two thousand dol-lars!\" He paused to smile contentedly over his own joke. \"And good for a great deal more than that too,\" he added with a nod. \"Yes, ten times as much as that,\" she responded quickly, her eyes fixed on his face. She scarcely knew herself what she was thinking when she said it ; but most people who read this history will think she was hinting that her assets might be united with his, and so enable him to wipe out his liabilities and do a good deal more besides. Yet, how could that be, since Carmen Dolores was still his wife if she was alive; and also they both were Catholics, and Catholics did not recognize divorce! Truth is, Virginie Poucette's mind did not define her feelings at all clearly, or express exactly what she wanted. Her actions said one thing certainly; but if the question had been put to her, whether she was doing this thing because of a wish to take the place of Carmen Dolores in Jean Jacques' life, she would have said no at once. She had not come to that — yet. She was simply moved by a sentiment of pity for Jean Jacques, and as she had no child, or husband, or sister, or brother, or father, or mother, but only relatives who tried to impose upon her, she needed an objective for the emotions of her nature, for the overflow of her unused affec-tion and her unsatisfied maternal spirit. Here, then, was the most obvious opportunity — a man",
         "252 Jean Jacques has an offer in trouble who had not deserved the bitter bad luck which had come to him. Even old M6re L;,n- glois in the market-place at Vilray had admitted that, and had said the same later on in Vircinie's home. For an instant Jean Jacques was fascinated by the sudden prospect which opened out before him. If he asked her, this woman would probably loan him five thousand dollars— and she had mentioned nothmg about security! \"What security do you want?\" he asked in a husky voice. \"Security? I don't understand about that \" she rephed. \"I'd not offer you the money if I didn't thmk you were an honest man, and an honest man would pay me back. A dishonest man wouldn't pay me back, security or no security.\" \"He'd have to pay you back if the security was nght to start with,\" Jean Jacques insisted. \"But you don't want security, because you think I'm an honest man! Well, for sure you're right. I am honest. I never took a cent that wasn't mine- but that's not everything. If you lend you ought to have security. I've lost a good deal from not hav-ing enough security at the start. You are willing to lend me money without security— that's enough to make me feel thirty again, and I'm fifty— I'm. fifty,\" he added, as though with an attempt to show her that she could not think of him in any emotional way; though the day when his flour-mill was burned he had felt the touch of her fingers comforting and thnllmg. 2S3 t.J ilfi",
         "li The Money iVIaster \"You think Jean Jacques Barbille's word as good as his bond?\" he continued. \"So it is; but I'm going to pull this thing through alone. That's what I said to you and Maitre Fille at his office. I meant it too — help of God, it is the truth!\" He had forgotten that if M. Momay had not made it easy for him, and had not refrained from insisting on his pound of flesh, he would now be insolvent and with no roof over him. Like many another man Jean Jacques was the occasional slave of formula, and also the victim of phases of his own temperament. In truth he had not realized how big a thing M. Momay had done for him. He had accepted the chance given him as the tribute to his own courage and enterprise and integrity, and as though it was to the advantage of his greatest creditor to give him another start ; though in reality it had made no difference to the Big Financier, who knew his man and, with wide-open eyes, did what he had done. Virginie was not subtle. She did not understand, was never satisfied with allusions, and she had no gift for catching the drift of things. She could en-dure no perad venture in her conversation. She wanted plain speaking and to be literally sure. \"Are you going to take it?\" she asked abruptly. He could not bear to be checked in his course. He waved a hand and smiled at her. Then his eyes seemed to travel away into the distance, the look of the dreamer in them; but behind all was that strange, ruddy underglow of revelation which kept emerging from shadows, retreating and emerging,",
         "254 Jciin Jacques lias an offer yet always there now, in much or in little, since the burning of the mill. \"I've lent a good deal of money without security in my time,\" he reflected, \"but the only people who ever paid me back were a deaf and dumb man and a fly-away— a woman that was tired of selling herself, and started straight and right with the money f lent her. She had been the wife of a man who studied with me at Laval. She paid me back every penny, too, year by year for five years. The rest I lent money to never paid; but they paid, the dummy and the harlot that was, they paid! But they paid for the rest also! If I had refused these two because of the others, I'd not be fit to visit at Neighbourhood House where Virginie Poucette lives.\" He looked closely at the order she had given him again, as though to let it sink in his mind ar\" be registered for ever. \"I'm going to do withoi xay further use of your two thousand dollars,\" he con-tinued cheerfully. \"It has done its work. You've lent it to me, I've used it\"— he put the hand holding It on his breast— \"and I'm paying it back to you, but withr 'nterest.\" He gave the order to her. \"I don 3e what you mean,\" she said helplessly, and she looked at the paper, as though it had under-gone some change while it was in his hand. \"That you would lend it me is worth ten times two thousand to me, Virginie Poucette,\" he ex-plained. \"It gives me, not a kick from behind— I've not had much else lately— but it holds a light in front of me. It calls me. It says, 'March on, 255 ' I 'I i ll ■■ If",
         ";.i The Money Master Jean Jacques— climb the mountain.' It summons me to dispose my forces for the campaign which will rest'-re the Manor Cartier to what it has ever been since the days of the Baron of Beaugard. It quickens the blood at my heart. It restores \" Virginie would not allow him to go on. \"You won't let me help you ? Suppose I do lose the money —I didn't earn it; it was earned by Palass Poucette, and he'd understand, if he knew. I can live with-out the money, if I have to, but you would pay it back, I know. Yoti oughtn't to take any extra nsks. If your daughter should come back and not find you here, if she returned to the Manor Cartier, and \" He made an insistent gesture. \"Hush! Be still, my friend— as good a friend as a man cculd have. If my Zoe came back I'd hke to feel— I'd like to feel that I had saved things alone; that no worn m's money made me safe. If Zoe or if \" He was going to say, \"If Carmen came back,\" for his mind was moving in past scenes; but he stopped short and looked around helplessly. Then presently, as though by an effort, he added with a bravura note in his voice: \"The world has been full of trouble for a long time, but there have always been men to say to trouble, 'I am master, I have the mind to get above it all.' Well, I am one of them.\" There was no tone of vanity or bombast in his voice as he said this, and in his eyes that new under- glow deepened and shone. Perhaps in this instant he saw more of his future than he would speak of to",
         "256 Jean Jacques has an offer anyone on earth. Perhaps prevision was given him p\".f .u'Tu^^ ^^? ^'8 Financier had said to Maitre l-Ule, that his philosophy was now, at the last, to be of use to him. When his wife had betrayed him. and his wife and child had left him, he had said, -Moi -lesuts philosopher but he was a man of wealth in those days, and money soothes hurts of that kind in rare degree. Would he still say, whatever was yet to come, that he was a philosopher'\" \"Well, I've done what I thought would help you and I can t say more than that,\" Virginie remarked with a sigh, and there was despondency in her eyes Her face became flushed, her bosom showed agi- ta ion; she looked at him as she had done in Maftrc FiUe s office, and a wave of feeling passed over him now. as It did then and he remembered, in response to her look, the thnll of his fingers in her palm His face now flushed also, and he had an impulse to ask her to sit down beside him. He put it away from him however, for the present, at any rate-who could tell what to-morrow might bring forth !-and then he held out his hand to her. His voice shook a httle when he spoke; but it cleared, and began to nng, before he had said a dozen words. \"I'U never forget what you've said and done this mornmg. Virginie Poucette.\" he declared; \"and if I break the back of the trouble that's in my way and come out cock-o'-the-walk again \"-the gold Cock ot Beaugard m the ruins near and the clarion of the bantam of his barnyard were in his mind and ears- ^^it 11 be partly because of you. I hug that thought 1' III",
         "i The Money Master •I :i ) \"I could do a good deal more than that,\" she ven-tured, with a tromulous voice, and then she took her warm hand from his nervous grasp, and turned sharp-ly into the path which led back towards the Manor. She did not turn around, and she walked quickly away. There was confusion in her eyes and in her mind. It would take some time to make the confusion into order, and she was now hot, now cold, in all her frame, when at last she climbed into her wagon. This physical imrest imparted itself to all she did that day. First her horses were driven almost at a gallop; then they were held do^vn to a slow walk; then they were stopped altogether, and she sat in the shade of the trees on the road to her home, pon-dering — whispering to herself and pondering. As her horses were at a standstill she saw ? wagon approaching. Instantly she touched her pair with the whip, and moved on. Before the approaching wagon came alongside, she knew from the grey and the dark-brown horses who was driving them, and she made a strong effort for composure. She suc-ceeded indifferently, but her friend, M6re Langlois, did not notice this fact as her wagon drew near. There was excitement in M6re Langlois' face. \"There's been a shindy at 'The Red Eagle' tav-ern,\" she said. \"That father-in-law of M'sieu' Jean Jacques and Rocque Valescure, the landlord, they got at each other's throats. Dolores hit Valescure on the head with a bottle.\" \"He didn't kill Valescure, did he?\" \"Not that— no. But Valescure is hurt bad— as",
         "2S8 Jean Jacques lias an offer bad. It was six to one and half a dozen to the other —both no good at all. But of course they'll arrest the old man— your great friend! He'll not give you any more fur-robes, that's sure. He got away from the tavern, though, and he's hiding somewhere. Msieu Jean Jacques can't protect him now he isn t what he once was in the parish. He's done for and old Dolores will have to go to trial They'll make it hot for him when they catch him. No more fur-robes from your Spanish friend, Virginie ! You'll have to look somewhere else for your beaux, though to be sure there are enough that 'd be glad to get you with that farm of yours, and your thrifty wavs u you keep your character.\" ' Virginie was quite quiet now. The asperity and suggestiveness of the other's speech produced a cool-ing effect upon her. \"Better hurry, M6re Langlois, or everybody won't hear your story before sundown. If your throat gets tired, there's Brown's Bronchial Troches \" She pointed to an advertisement on the fence near throat'\"^' ^'^^'^ ^°°^ ^^^^ *^^^ \"^^ ^ '■'^^P'\"^ With that shot, Virginie Poucette whipped up her horses and drove on. She did not hear what M^re Langlois called after her, for Mhve Langlois had been slow to recover from the unexpected violence dealt by one whom she had always bullied. \"Poor Jean Jacques!\" said Virginie Poucetto to nerself as her horses ate up the ground. \"That's another bit of bad luck. He'll not sleep to-night. Ah, the poor Jean Jacques— and all alone— not a hand 259 i: •I 11",
         "!l The Money Master to hold; no one to rumple Jiat shaggy iiead of his or pat him on the back! His wife and Ma'm'scUe Zo6, they didn't know a good thing when they had it. No, he'll not sleep to-night — ah, my dear Jean Jacques!\" 'I V ■ s ■ \\ . , • ,.■1, '! t ■■■■ -■^; i",
         "J CH.\\PTER XIX SEBASTIAN DOi^ORES DOES NOT SLEEP gUT Jean Jacques did sleep well that night- h.^ Ti\" '' ^°'^'^ ^^\"\"\"^ ^^'^'^ better for him f he had not done so The contractor's workmen had t^^f.l *^' '\"'^ \"^''^'■\"°°\"' ^'^ had seen the first Si and \u003e '\"\"°^''^ ^\"\"\"^ '\"\"^ \"^'\"^ °f the historic mill, and it was crowned by the golden Cock of Beaugard all grimy with the fire, but jaunty as of yore. The cheerfulness of the workmei, who sang gaily an old chanson of mill-life as they tugged a? the timbers and stones, gave a fillip to the S oUean Jacques, to whom had come a red-Kr Like Mirza on the high hill of Bagdad he had had his philosophic meditations; his good talk with V^ g.me Poucette had followed; and the woman of her hnger-ed in the feeling of his hand all day 2 somethir.g kind and homehke an,\" true. Also in 'the wnrM l\\^. C^^^^«''°n. that he must make the world sing for himself again had°nntT *° \"^^^^ ^^'^ L^\"2l°'\"« had thought, he thL^^l.\"\"''-r''''^i^y the parish noise about the savage incident at \"The Red Eagle.\" and the des- 361 ill' 1;",
         "■( The Money Master a perate affair which would cause the arrest of his father-in-law. He was at last well inclined to be rid of Sebastian Dolores, who had ceased to be a comfort to him, and who broupht him hateful and not kindly memorii's of his lost women, and the happy hours of the past they represented. M. Fillc had come to the Manor in much alarm, lest the news of the miserable episode at \"Tlie Red Eagle\" should bring Jean Jacques down again to the depths. He was infinitely relieved, however, to find that the lord of the Manor Carticr seemed only to be grateful tliat Sebastian Dolores did not return, and nodded emphatically when M. Fille remarked that perhaps it would be just as well if he never did return. As M. Fille sat with his host at the *able in the sunset light, Jean Jacques seemed quieter and stead-ier of body and mind than he had been for a long, long timo. He even drank three glasses of the cor-dial which M6re Langlois had left for him, with the idea that it might comfort him when he got the bad news about Sebastian Dolores; and parting with M. Fille at the door, he waved a hand and said: \"Well, good-night, ma.ster of the laws! Safe journey! I'm off to bed, and I'll sleep without rocking, that's very sure and sweet.\" He stood and waved his hand several times to M. Fille— till he was out of sight indeed; and the Clerk of the Court smiled to himself long afterwards, re-calling Jean Jacques' cheerful face as he had seen it at their parting in the gathering dusk. As for Jeai! Jacques, when he locked up the house at ten o'clock,",
         "262 Sphastian Dolores docs not sloop with Dolores still absent, he had the air of a man trom whose shouMers great weights had fallen Now I've shut the door on him, it '11 stay hut \" he said firmly. \"Let him go back to work He's no good here to me, to iiimself, or to anyone. And that busmess of the fur-robe and Virginie I'oucette — ah, that! He shook his head angrily, then seeing the bottle of cordial still uncorked on the sideboard, he poured some out and drank it very slowly, till his eyes were on the ceiling above him and every drop had one home. Presently, with the bedroom lamp i his hand, he went upstairs, humming to himsek the chanson the workmen had sung that afternoon as they raised again the walls \"f the mill: \" Distal! of flax flowinj; behind her Margatton rocs to the mill- On the old grey ass she goes. The flour of love it will blind her— All, the grist the devil will grind her. When Margatton goes to the mill! On the old grey ass she goes. And the old grey ass, he knows 1\" He liked the sound of his own voice this night of his Reconstruction Period— or such it seemed to him- and he thought that no one heard his singing save himself. There, however, he was mistaken. Some-one was hidden in the house-in the big kitchen-bunk which served as a bed or a seat, as needed This someone had stolen in while Jean Jacques and M. i^Ule were at supper. His name was Dolores, and he h?-! a horse just over the hill near by, to serve 263 i i I i I III I II . if i",
         "1 m The Money Master I f m 'i.'- i V :V:i i \u003e N him when his work was done, and he could get away. The constables of Vilray had twice visited the Manor to arrest him that day, but they had been led in another direction by a clue which he had pro-vided; and afterwards in the dusk he had doubled back and hid himself under Jean Jacques' roof. He had very important business at the Manor Cartier. Jean Jacques' voice ceased one song, and then, after a silence, it took up another, not so melodious. Sebastian Dolores had impatiently waited for this later \"musicale\" to begin— he had heard it often before; and when it was at last a regular succession of nasal explosions, he crawled out and began to do the business which had brought him to the Manor Cartier. He did it all alone and with much skill; for when he was an anarchist in Spain, those long years ago, he had learned how to use tools with expert under-standing. Of late, Spain had been much in his mind. He wanted to go back there. Nostalgia had possessed him ever since he had come again to the Manor Cartier after Zoe had left. He thought much of Spain, and but httle of his daughter. Memory of her was only poignant, in so far as it was associated with the days preceding the wreck of the Antoine. He had had far more than enough of the respectable working life of the New World; but there never was sufficient money to take him back to Europe, even were it safe to go. Of late, however, he felt sure that he might venture, if he could only get cash for the journey.",
         "264 He wanted to drift back fr, ti,„ ;^i ', \" ture and the \"easy nfoney 'ofthe oH A ' '\\^- \"'\"^\"- m Cadiz and Madrid. He ^Ltki^^^''' '^^^^ the plaza, for the bull fight for ,£' r'-\" ^\"'^ sun, for the lazy glamour of tU ^ \"^'*^ \" ^^e wine of Valladolid f^r t J ^^^ ^^^'\"^^^ ^nd the red roadside tavern 'tS coir''\",' \"^^'\"^\"^ °^ ^he before it was too late In LIZ Vi °\"^ \"^^ain be some woman ^hom he could eaiol\"\"\"'' ^'\"^^^ rade whom he cc^nM L? ^°^^' ^°'^^ com- could decdve who e nnnl'^'.'°'\"^P\"^^* ^*°'\" he re.t.ofhis;^u^^.-?^^ irels^iSedTttoS LrSow^'i -^^^' -H «nd himself amid oirs^'^olSTgs^Kd dollars. Six thousand of ll'?^\"^^ \"'^^* *^°\"«^nd ■ thought, when HwJ'r\"'~^°' ^* ^\"^ '^'^- he the fac that he Z .1 °'\"''' ^\"'^ ^\" ^^^ ^^'^^ to time Te had .WthTbottlLT ?° T-r'' ^^°- ^^e Spa.wasthe:^rf;St^^t'r!Sn:iS?ht3",
         "205 'iH' The Money Master i; head, and the way to Spain was by the Six Thousand Dollar Route, the New World terminal of which was the cupboard in the wall at the Manor Cartier. Little cared Sebastian Dolores that the theft of the money would mean the end of all things for Jean Jacques Barbille — for his own daughter's hus-band. He was thinking of himself, as he had always done. He worked for two whole hours before he suc-ceeded in quietly forcing open the iron door in the wall; but it was done at last. Curiously enough, Jean Jacques' snoring stopped on the instant that Sebastian Dolores' fingers clutched the money; but it began cheerfully again when the door in the wall closed once more. Five minutes after Dolores had thrust the six thousand dollars into his pocket, his horse was galloping away over the hills towards the River St. Lawrence. If he had luck, he would reach it by the morning. As it happened, he had the luck. Be-hind him, in the Manor Cartier, the man who had had no luck and much philosophy, snored on till morning in unconscious content. It was a whole day before Jean Jacques discovered his loss. When he had finished his lonely supper the next evening, he went to the cupboard in his ofRce to cheer himself with the sight of the six thousand dollars. He felt that he must revive his spirits. They had been drooping all day, he knew not why. When he saw the empty pigeon-hole in the cup-board, his sight swam. It was some time before",
         "366 Sebastian Dolores does not",
         "sleep CHAPTER XX \"AU 'voir, m'SIEU' jean JACQUES\" IT is seldom that Justice travels as swiftly as * Crime, and it is also seldom that the luck is more with the law than with the criminal. It took the parish of St. Saviour's so long to make up its mind who stole Jean Jacques' six thousand dollars, that when the hounds got the scent at last the quarry had reached the water— in other words, Sebastian Dolores had achieved the St. Lawrence. The crim-inal had had near a day's start before a telegram was sent to the police at Montreal, Quebec, and other places to look out for the picaroon who had left his mark on the parish of St. Saviour's. The telegram would not even then have been sent had it not been for M. Fille, who, suspecting Sebastian Dolores, still refrained from instant action. This he did because he thought Jean Jacques would not wish his beloved Zo6's grandfather sent to prison. But when other people at last declared that it must have been Dolores, M. Fille insisted on telegrams being sent by the magistrate at Vilray without Jean Jacques' consent. He had even urged the magistrate to \"rush\" the wire, because it came home to him with stunning force that, if the money was",
         "268 \"Au 'voir, M'sieu' Jean Jacques\" I not recovered, Jean Jacques would be a beggar I was better to jail the father-in-law, than for the httle money-master to take to the road a pauir Ke^otSr °-'^ '' ^\" -^-\"'^^ -^-\" e wh^'lI^H-^TJf 2\"^'' ^\" ^'' ^^^^* °^ hearts he knew who had robbed him. He realized that it was one of the radn of the comedy-tragedy which began on Inl.^ \"'T' '°-'^^\"y ^^'' ^^°'^' and ft had settled m his mmd at last that Sebastian Dolores was but part of the dark machinery of fate and that what was now had to be. For one whole day after the robbery he was like a man paralysed-dispossessed of active being but when his creditors began to swarm, when M Mor nay sent his man of business down to foreclose hL mortgages before others could take action Jean Jacques waked from his apathy. He begkn an Tafr 1^'^t '''^. -^l--ess.^nd madi \"ss^; again to pull the strings of his affairs. They were however, so confused that a pull at one string Lgled .J^% !!!^ constables and others came to him anJ thft S\"' ^'^'^ ^\"'■^ °\" ^'^^ t'-^'I °f the robbe^' h^^paSjrtt t^-^^^rhroS ;,Z^^- '^^^l \"^^y h^ P^t 't: \"That man-we will uJctTon'wJ:''\"^'^™' \"^ ' \"\"^\"^^ 2°^ '^t the raiW Sen aT sT ru •\"^'^V^^^y- ^^ I ™ssed catching «^armen at St. Chnsanthme. When you are at the 269 I I =",
         "■ if ' j The Money Master ■ t I: shore he wiU be on the river; when you are gettir into the train, he will be getting out. It is the ou' torn of the family. At Bordeaux, the Spanish d( tectivM were on the shore gnashing their teetl when he was a hundred yards away at sea on th Antotne. They missed him like that; and we' miss him too. What is the good! It was not hi hilT. r 7^' ^u^ \"^7 °^ ^'' ''\"\"Sing up beyon. there at Cadiz, where they think more of a toreado than of John the Baptist. It was my fault ought to have banked the money. I ought not t, have kept it to look at like a gamin with his marbles There it was m the wall; and there was Dolores f long way from home and wanting to get back H( fomid the way by a gift of the tools; and I wish ] had the same gift now; for IVe got no other gifi that 11 earn anything for me.\" These were the last dark or pessimistic word' spoken at St. Saviour's by Jean Jacques; and thev were saad to the Clerk of the Court, who could no^ deny the truth of them; but he wrung the hand of Jean Jacques nevertheless, and would not leave him night or day M. Fille was like a little cruiser protectmg a fort when gunboats swarm near, not darmg to attack till their battleship heaves in sight. The battleship was the Big Financier, who saw that a wreck was now inevitable, and was only concerned that there should be a fair distribution of the assets. That meant, of course, that he should be served fS'a^e *^^* *^°'^ ^^^\"^ ^^^ ^^ ^\"\"^^ set Revelation after revelation had been Jean Jacques'",
         "270 \"Au 'voir, M'sicu' Jean Jacques\" lot of late years, but the final revelation of his own sSrf ^\"^ °'r^'^helming. When he began to St tv irT ^j' -^r ^' ^'\"^ ^^'^^d ^y the fact t..at th. law stood in his way. He realized with vaX h°er ?if/^\"^.^^\u003c^ ^^°*'^- and natlil tC^^; V, \"i V^^ ^^ \"\"'^^^ ^\"^* ^^ ^-^l' be in jail; that he had no freedom; that he could do nothing at all in regard to anything he owned; that he las in effect, a pnsoner of war where he had been the general commanding an army. Yet the old pride intervened, and it was associated with some innate nobility; for from the hour in which It was kno^-n that Sebastian DoloS had escaped m a steamer bound for France, and couM not be overhauled, and the chances were that he dollars, Jean Jacques bustled about cheerfully, and Sder aS ^\" \"I'f ''^ ^^* \"^^^^ ^' busi/ess to Ztl ^,'^/^S.«^te. It was a make-believe which few treated ^th scorn. Even the workmen at the miU humoured him, as he came several times everj day to inspect the work of rebuilding; and thev t\u003cS Seranhe 'f^^- ?\"^^i °\"' ^\"^^ °^ ^^' ^^^ers except Seraphe Comiche, who, weeping from morning til night, protested that there never was so good a f^vouS;;^T' J''\" J^'^'^'^^^' ^\"\u003c^ '^^ '^^\"ked his S^hem ' ^\"^^ \"\"\" ''° P^^^^ \"\"til he had The days, the weeks went on, with Jean Tacaues growing thinner and thinner, but going about with his head up like the gold Cock of 271 Beaugard,",
         "^1' The Money Master ^l:'. i! ;■ I ! r and even crowing now and then, as he had done of yore. He faced the inevitable with something of his old smiling volubility; treating nothing of his disaster as though it really existed; signing off this asset and that; disposing of this thing and that; stripping himself bare of all the properties on his life's stage, in such a manner as might have been his had he been receiving gifts and not yielding up all he owned. He chatted as his belongings were, figuratively speaking, being carried away — as though they were mechanical, formal things to be done as he had done them every day of a fairly long life; as a clerk would check off the boxes or parcels carried past him by the porters. M. Fille could hardly bear to see him in this mood, and the New Cur6 hovered round him with a mournful and harm-lessly deceptive kindness. But the end had to come, and practically all the parish was present when it came. That was on the day when the contents of the Manor were sold at auction by order of the Court. One thing Jean Jacques refused absolutely and irrevocably to do from the first — refused it at last in anger and even with an oath: he would not go through the Bankruptcy Coiul;. No persuasion had any effect. The very suggestion seemed to smirch his honour. ■ His lawyer pleaded with him, said he would be able to save something out of the wreck, and that his creditors would be willing that he should take advantage of the privileges of that court; but he only said in reply: \"Thank you, thank you altogether, monsieur,",
         "272 \"Au 'voir, M'sieu' Jean Jacques\" but it is impossible — 'non possumus, non possumus, my son,' as the Pope said to Bonaparte. I owe and I will pay what I can; and what I can't pay now I will try to pay in the future, by the cent, by the dollar, till all is paid to the last copper. It is the way with Jie Barbilles. They have paid their way and their debts in honour, and it is in the bond with all the Barbilles of the past that I do as they do. If I can't do it, then that I have tried to do it will bo endorsed on the foot of the bill.\" No one could move him, not even Judge Carcasson, who from his armchair in Montreal wrote a feeble- handed letter begging him to believe that it was \"well within his rights as a gentleman\" — this he put in at the request of M. Momay — to take advan-tage of the privileges of the Bankruptcy Court. Even then Jean Jacques had only a few moments' hesitation. What the Judge said made a deep im-pression; but he had determined to drink the cup of his misfortune to the dregs. He was set upon complete renunciation ; on going forth like a pilgrim from the place of his troubles and sorrows, taking no gifts, no mercies save those which heaven accorded him. When the day of the auction came everything went. Even his best suit of clothes was sold to a blacksmith, while his fur-coat was bought by a horse-doctor for fifteen dollars. Things that had been part of his life for a generation found their way into hands where he would least have wished them to go — of those who had been envious of him, who had cheated or deceived him, of people with whom !■ a. 'ill 18",
         "273 The Money Master i :i. he had had nothing in common. The red wagon and the pair of little long-tailed stallions, which he had driven for six years, were bought by the owner of a rival flour-mill in the parish of Vilray; but his best sleigh, with its coon-skin robes, was bought by the widow of Palass Poucette, who bought also the famous bear-skin which Dolores had given her at Jean Jacques' expense, and had been returned by her to its proper owner. The silver fruit-dish, once (it was said) the property of the Baron of Beaugard, which each generation of Barbilles had displayed with as much ceremony as though it was a chalice given by the Pope, went to Virginie Poucette. Vir-ginia also bought the furniture from Zoe's bedroom as it stood, togetl. r with the little upright piano on which she used to play. The Cure bought Jean Jacques' wnting-desk, and M. Fille purchased his armchair, in which had sat at least six Barbilles as owners of the Manor. The beaver-hat which Jean Jacques wore on state occasions, as his grand-father had done, together with the bonnet rouge of the habitant, donned by him in his younger days — they fell to the nod of M6re Langlois, who declared that, as she was a cousin, she would keep the things in the family. M6re Langlois would have bought the fruit-dish also if she could have afforded to bid against Virginie Poucette; but the latter would have had the dish if it had cost her two hundred dollars. The only time she had broken bread in Jean Jacques' house, she had eaten cake from this fruit-dish; and to her, as to the parish generally, the dish so beautifully shaped, with its graceful",
         "274 'Au 'voir, M'sicu' Jean Jacques\" depth and its fine-chased handles, was symbol of the social caste of the Barbilles, as the gold Cock of Beaugard was sipn of their civic and commercial glory. Jean Jacques, who had moved about all day with an almost voluble affability, seeming not to realize the tragedy going on, or, if he realized it, rising superior to it, was noticed to stand still suddenly when the auctioneer put up the fruit-dish for sale. Then the smile left his face, and the reddish glow in his eyes, which had been there since the burning of the mill, fled, and a touch of amazement and confusion took its place. All in a moment he was like a fluttered dweller of the wilds to whom comes some tremor of danger. His mouth opened as though he would forbid the selling of the heirloom; but it closed again, because he knew he had no right to withhold it from the hammer; and he took on a look like that which comes to the eyes of a child when it faces humiliating denial. Quickly as it came, however, it vanished*^ for he remembered that he could buy the dish him-self. He could buy it himself and keep it. . . , Yet what could he do with it? Even so, he could keep it. It could still be his till better days came. The auctioneer's voice told off the value of the fruit-dish — \"As an heirloom, as an antique; as a piece of workmanship impossible of duplication in these days of no handicraft; as good pure silver, bearing the head of Louis Quinze— beautiful, r vellous, historic, honourable,\" and Jean Jacq made ready to bid. Then he remembered he had 275",
         "H. Thf Money Master jl!!-!^ ) no money— he who all his life had been able to take a roll of bills from his pocket as another man took a packet of letters. His glance fell in shame, and the words died on his lips, even as M. Manotel, the auc- tionr T, was about to add another five-dollar bid to I price, which already was standing at forty dollars. It was at this momont Jean Jacques heard a wom-an's voice bidding, then two women's voices. Look-ing up he saw that one of the women was M6re Langlois and the other was Virginie Po'icette, who had made the first bid. For a moment they con-tended, and then Mtre Langlois fell out of the con-test, and Virginie continued it with an ambitious farmer from the next county, who was about to become a Member of Parliament. Presently the owner of a river pleastire-steamer entered into the costly emulation also, but he soon fell away; and Virginie Poucette stubbornly raised the bidding by five dollars each time, till the silver symbol of the Barbilles' pride had reached one hundred dollars. Then she raised the price by ten dollars, and her rival, seeing that he was face to face with a woman who would now bid till her last dollar was at stake, withdrew; and Virginie was left triumphant with the heirloom. At the moment when Virginie turned away with the handsome dish from M. Manotel, and the crowd cheered her gaily, she caught Jean Jacques' eye, and she came straight towards him. She wanted to give the dish to him then and there; but she knew that this would provide annoying gossip for many",
         "376 •Au 'voir, M'sieu* Jean Jacques' a day and besides, she thought he would refuse More than that, she had in her mind another alter-native which might in the end secure the heirloom to him, m spite of all. As she passed him, she said • At least we keep it in the parish. If you don't have It, well, then \" She paused, for she did not quite know what to say unless she spoke what was reaUy in her mind and she dared not do that. \"But you ought to have an heirloom,\" she addea leaving unsaid what was her real thought and hope.' With suddcxi mspiration, for he saw she was tryine to m. :^ ,t easy for him, he drew the great silver watch from his pocket, which the head of the Bar- billes had worn for generations, and said- \"I have the only heirloom I could carry about with me It will keep time for me as long as I'll last. The Manor clock strikes the time for the ^°'r^; u\"\"^ ^¥^ '\"^^''^ '^ ^' ^y ^^^ Manor clock.\" Well said— well and truly said, M'sieu' Jean Jacques, remarked the lean watchmaker and so- called jeweller of Vilray. who stood near. \"It is a watch which couldn't miss the stroke of Judgment It was at that moment, in the sunset hour, when the sale had drawn to a close, and the people had begun to disperse, that the avocat of Vilray who represented the Big Financier came to Jean Jacques and said: \"M'sieu', I have to say that there is due to vou three hundred and fifty dollars from the settlement excluding this sale, which will just do what was ex-",
         "377 The Money Master Vh m ? pected of it. I am instructed to give it to you from the creditors. Here it is.\" He took out a roll of bills and offered it to Jean Jacques. \"What creditors?\" asked Jean Jacques. \"All the creditors,\" responded the other, and he produced a receipt for Jean Jacques to sign. \"A formal statement will be sent you, and if there is any more due to you, it will be added th^n. But now- well, there it is, the creditors think there is no reason for you to wait.\" Jean Jacques did not yet take the roll of bihs. \"They come from M. Momay?\" he asked with an air of resistance, for he did not wish to be under further obUgations to the man who would lose most The lawyer was prepared. M. Momay had fore-seen the timidity and sensitiveness of Jean Jacques, had anticipated his mistaken chivalry— for hov^ could a man decline to take advantage of the Bank-ruptcy Court unless he was another Don Quixote! He had therefore arranged with all the creditors for them to take responsibility with himself, though he provided the cash which manipulated this settle-ment. . ... \"No, M'sieu' Jean Jacques,\" the lawyer replied, \"this comes from all the creditors, as the sum due to you from all the transactions, so far as can be seen as yet. Further adjustment may be necessary, but this is the interim settlement.\" . Jean Jacques was far from being ignorant of busi-ness, but so bemused was his judgment and his",
         "in- 'Au 'voir, M'sieu' Jean Jacques\" telligence now, that he did not see there was no balance which could possibly be his, since his liabili-ties vastly exceeded his assets. Yet with a wave of the hand he accepted the roll of bills, and signed the receipt with an air which said, \"These forms must be observed, I suppose.\" What he would have done if the three hundred and fifty dollars had not been given him, it would be hard to say, for with gentle asperity he had declined a loan from his friend M. Fille, and he had but one silver dollar in his pocket, or in the worid. Indeed, Jean Jacques was living in a dream in these dark days—a dream of renunciation and sacrifice, and in the spirit of one who gives up all to some great cause. He was not yet even face to face with the fulness of his disaster. Only at moments had the real sig-nificance of it all come to him, and then he had shiv-ered as before some terror menacing his path. Also, as M. Momay had said, his philosophy was now in his bones and marrow rather than in his words. It had, after all, tinctured his blood and impregnated his mind. He had babbled and been the egotist, and played cock-o'-the-walk; and now at last his phi-losophy was giving some foundation for his feet. Yet at this auction-sale he looked a distracted, if smiling, whimsical, rather bustling figure of mis-fortune, with a tragic air of exile, of isolation from all by which he was surrounded. A profound and wayworn loneliness showed in his figure, in his face, in his eyes. The crowd thinned in time, and yet very many lingered to see the last of this drama of lost fortunes. 279 I",
         "III The Money Master ifh ' ' i A few of the riff-raff, who invariably attend these public scenes, were now rather the worse for drink, from the indifferent liquor provided by the auc-tioneer, and they were inclined to horseplay and coarse chaff. More than one ribald reference to Jean Jacques had been checked by his chivalrous fellow- citizens; indeed, M. Fille had almost laid himself open to a charge of assault in his own court by raising his stick at a loafer, who made insulting references to Jean Jacques. But as the sale drew to a close, an air of rollicking humour among the younger men would not be suppressed, and it looked as though Jean Jacques' exit would be attended by the elements of farce and satire. In this world, however, things do not happen logically, and Jean Jacques made his exit in a wholly unexpected manner. He was going away by the train which left a new railway junction a few miles off, having gently yet firmly declined M. Fillc's invitation, and also the invitations of others — in-cluding the Cur6 and Mfere Langlois — to spend the night with them and start off the next day. Ho elected to go on to Montreal that very night, and before the sale was quite finished he prepared to start. His carpet-bag containing a few clothes and necessaries had been sent on to the junction, and ho meant to walk to the station in the cool of the evening. M. Manotel, the auctioneer, hoarse with his heavy- day's work, was announcing that there were only a few more things to sell, and no doubt they could be had at a bargain, when Jean Jacques began a tour 280",
         "li-'r.i: 'Au 'voir, M'sieu' Jean Jacques\" of the Manor. There was something inexpressibly mournful m this lonely pilgrimage of the dismantled mansion. Yet there was no show of cheap emotion by Jean Jacques; and a wave of the hand prevented anyone from foUowmg him in his dry-eyed progress to say farewell to these haunts of childhood, man-hood, family, and h- ne. There was a strange numb-ness m his mind and body, and he had a feeling that he moved immense and reflective among material things. Only tragedy can produce that feeling Happiness makes the universe infinite and stupen-dous, despair makes it small and even trivial. It was when he had reached the little office where he had done the business of his life— a kind of neu-tral place wnere he had ever isolated himself from the domestic scene— that the final sensation, save one, of his existence at the Manor came to him. Virginie Poucette had divined his purpose when he began the tour of the house, and going by a round-about way, she had placed herself where she could speak with him alone before he V't the place for ever— if that was to be. She was jt sure that his exit was really inevitable— not yet. When Jean Jacques saw Virginie standing beside the table in his office where he had worked over so many years, now marked Sold, and waiting to be taken away by its new owner, he started and drew back, but she held out her hand and said: \"But one word, M'sieu' Jean Jacques; only one word from a friend— indeed a friend.\" \"A friend of friends,\" he answered, still in ab- 281",
         "llij The Money Master I ) straction, his eyes having that burnished light which belonged to the night of the fire; but yet realizing that she was a sympathetic soul who had offered to lend him money without security. \"Oh, indeed yes, as good a friend as you can ever have!\" she added. Something had waked the bigger part of her, which had never been awake in the days of Palass Poucette. Jean Jacques was much older than she, but what she felt had nothing to do with age, or place or station. It had only to do with understand-ing, with the call of nature and of a motherhood crying for expression. Her heart ached for him. \"Well, good-bye, my friend,\" he said, and held out his hand. \"I must be going now.\" \"Wait,\" she said, and there was something in-sistent and yet pleading in her voice. \"I've got something to say. You must hear it. . . . Why should you go? There is my farm — it needs to be worked right. It has got good chances. It has water-power and wood and the best flax in the province — they want to start a flax-mill on it— I've had letters from big men in Montreal. Well, why shouldn't you do it instead' There it is, the farm, and there am I a woman alone. I need help. I've got no head. I have to work at a sum of figures all night to get it straight. . . . Ah, m'sieu', it is a need both sides ! You want someone to look after you; you want a chance again to do things; but you want someone to look after you, and it ' all waiting there on the farm. Palass Poucette left behind him seven sound horses, and cows and sheep, and a",
         "W^ \"Au 'voir, M'sieu' Jean Jacques \" threshing-machine and a fanning-miU, and no debts and two thousand dollars in the bank. You will never do anything away from here. You must stay Jacque?'\"' ^ '\"\" '°°^ ^*^^ y°\"- \u003e^ The light in his eyes flamed up. died down, flamed up agam and presently it covered all his face as he gra -.ed what she meant. ^ \"Wonder of God, do you forget?\" he asked. I am mamed-married still, Virginie Poucette. There is no divorce in the Catholic Church— no none at all. It is for ever and ever.\" \"I said nothing about marriage,\" she said bravely though her face suffused. \"\"*veiy, \"Hand of Heaven, what do you mean .? You mean to say you would do that for me in spite of the Cur6 and— and everybody and everything'\" __ \"You ought to be taken care of,\" she protested. You ought to have your chance again. No one here is free to do it all but me. You are alone Vour wife that was— maybe she is dead. I am alone\" ftl '\".';?* ^^'i'^ °^ ^^^ ^^^ S°°d God will say.' i will settle with Him myself. Well, then, do you think I d care what— what M^re Langlois or the think of you going away with nothing, with nobody It Jier^ is something and somebody-somebody v^ho wou d be good to you. Everybody knows that youve been badly used-everybody I'm young enough to make things bright and ^4rm in ffT ^;!f t^ P'^^^ '^ ^'^ ^\"°\"gh for two, even It It isn't the Manor Cartier.\" 283 M '",
         "1 r 'ti The Money Master \"Figure de Christ, do you think I'd let you do it — me?\" declared Jean Jacques, with lips trembling now and his shoulders heaving. Misfortune and pain and penalty he could stand, but sacrifice like this and — and whatever else it was, were too much for him. They brought him back to the dusty road and everyday life again; they subtracted him from his big dream, in which he had been detached from the details of his catastrophe. \"No, no, no,\" he added. \"You go look another way, Virginie. Turn your face to the young spring, not to the dead winter. To-morrow I'll be gone to find what I've got to find. I've finished here, but there's many a good man waiting for you — men who'll bring you something worth while besides themselves. Make no mistake, I've finished. I've done my term of life. I'm only out on ticket-of- leave now— but there, enough, I shall always want to think of you. I wish I had something to give you— but yes, here is something.\" He drew from his pocket a silver napkin-ring. \"I've had that since I was five years old. My uncle Stefan gave it to me. I 've always used it. I don't know why I put it in my pocket this morning, but I did. Take it. It's more than money. It's got something of Jean Jacques about it. You've got the Barbille fruit-dish— that is a thing I'll remember. I'm glad you've got it, and \" \"I meant we should both eat from it,\" she said helplessly. \"It would cost too much to eat from it with you, Virginie \"",
         "284 \"Au 'voir, M'sieu' Jean Jacques* out wfhS' '\"'■''^' \"^'^^'\"'^ '■ '^^ -^- '^^Id-^ wh'Jr\" •^°'^'.* **^^\"k I'd say to any other living man what I ve said to you?\" she asked n.U'nf\"\u003e'^^f. understandingly. \"That's the best ^ ^ '';. J^ \"\"^ ^°' \"^ °^ ^\" the world.\" he an-swered. \"When I look back, FU see the lighten your window-the light you lit for the lost onV^ for Jean Jacques Barbille.\" Suddenly with eyes that did not see and hands held out before hm., he turned, felt for the door and left iiiG room. She leaned helplessly against the table. \"The poor Jean Jacques-the poor Jean Jacques'\" she murmured. \"Cur6 or no Cur6, I'd have done it ' \u003e she declared, with a ring to her voice. \"Ah but Jean Jacques, come with me!\" she added with a sTc?^ \"? . compassionate gesture, speaking into space. I could make life worth while for us both.\" A moment later Virginie was outside, watching the sf S^vi^^^ ^--' ^' J^- J-^- ^^ ^^^ parish S This was what she saw. The auctioneer was holding up a bird-cage con-taining a canary-Carmen's bird-cage, and Zoe's 285 ' the last. I put ■,•)' m 'ill",
         "i The Money Master i\\^ 'S :, :l t \" it away in the bakery, meaning to sell it at noon, when everybody was eating — food for the soul and food for the body. I forgot it. But here it is, worth anything you like to anybody that loves the beautiful, the good, and the harmonious. What do I hear for this lovely saffron singer from the Elysian fields? What did the immortal poet of France say of the bird in his garret, in 'L'Oiseau de Mon Grenier'f What did he say: 'Sing me a song of the bygone hour, A song of the stream and the sun; Sing of my love in her bosky bower, When my heart it was twenty-one.' Come now, who will renew his age or regale her youth with the divine notes of nature's minstrel? Who will make me an offer for this vestal virgin of song — the joy of the morning and the benediction of the evening? What do I hear? The best of the wine to the last of the feast ! What do I hear? — five dollars — seven dollars — nine dollars — going at nine dollars — ten dollars — Well, ladies and gentlemen, the bird can sing — ah, voiW He stopped short for a moment, for as the evening sun swept its veil of rainbow radiance over the scene, the bird began to sing. Its little throat swelled, it chirruped, it trilled, it called, it soared, it lost itself in a flood of ecstasy. In the applausive silence, the emotional recess of the sale, as it were, the man to whom the bird and the song meant most, pushed his way up to the stand where M. Manotel stood. When the people saw who it was, they fell back, for",
         "386 \"Au 'voir, M'sieu' Jean Jacques\" tation. It filled them with a kind of awe He reached up a brown, eager, affectionate hand- it had always been that-fat and small, but rather sensu\" \"''\"\"'^ ^'\"°*'°\"^'' ^'^°\"8h notmateS or \"Go on with your bidding,\" he said, to w7^' ^\"l\".^ ^° \"\"\"^ '^\"^ ^'''\"g ^*'ch had belonged oracle of the mommg, the muezzin of his moscue of home. It had been to the girl who had ^ne^ another such a bird had been to the mother' of thi girl, the voice that sang, \"Praise God\" in the short summer of that bygone happiness of his. Even IhS voil??W- ^ ^\"^T~J ^''^•\" J^^\" J^^q^es said in a voice that rang. It had no blur of emotion. It had resonance. The hammer that struck the bell of Hs voice was the hammer of memory, and if it was plain san^.' ^'\"'°''' humoured him, while the bird still thZ°fivp'!?'!^T'^''^^°\"^^^•■ ^° I hear no more three ^iLp'-;::?\"\"^ '\"'''' S°'\"g ^^i^«. going three times-gone!\" he cried, for no one had made Whe'I ^'^' T^ '\"'^^^^ ^- ^^\"^\"tel would not have heard another voire than Jean Tacques' if it had been as loud as che falls of the SaSay He had beef °' ^\"^ii\" \"\"'' ^'^^y' ^-^^ M. M^notd.- bI had been mamed four times, and he would be mar-",
         "387 liii ! ' The Money Master ried again if he had the chance; also he wrote verses for tombstones in the churchyard at St. Saviour's, and couplets for ffites and weddings. He handed the cage to Jean Jacques, who put it down on the ground at his feet, and in an instant had handed up five dollars for one of the idols of his own altar. Anyone else than M. Manotel, or perhaps M. Fille or the New Cure, would have hesitated to take the five dollars, or, if they had done so, would have handed it back; but they had souls to understand this Jean Jacques, and they would not deny him his insistent independence. And so, in a moment, he was making his way out of the crowd with the cage in his hand, the bird silent now. As he went, someone touched his arm and slipped a book into his hand. It was M. Fille, and the book was his little compendium of philosophy which his friend had retrieved from his bedroom in the early morning. \"You weren't going to forget it, Jean Jacques?\" M. Fille said reproachfully. \"It is an old friend. It would not be happy with anyone else.\" Jean Jacques looked M. Fille in the eyes. \"Mot— je suis philosophc,\" he said without any of the old insistence and pride and egotism, but as one would make an affirmation or repeat a creed. \"Yes, yes, to be sure, always, as of old,\" an-swered M. Fille firmly; for, from that formula might come strength, when it was most needed, in a sense other and deeper far than it had been or was now. ' ' You will remember that you will always know where to find us— eh?\" added the little Clerk of the Court.",
         "288 'Au 'voir, M'sicu' Jean Jnoquos\" The going of Jean Jacques was inevitable- all persuasion had failed to induce him to stay— ieven that of VirRinic; and M. Fille now treated it as though It was the beginning of a new career for Jean Jacques, whatever that career might be It might be he v,-culd come back some day, but not to things as they were, not ever again, nor as the same man. \"You will move on with the world outside there \" continued M. Fille, \"but we shall be turning on the same swivel here always; and whenever you come —there, you understand. With us it is semper fidelis always the same.\" ' Jean Jacques looked at M. Fille again as though to ask him a question, but presently he shook his head in negation to his thought. \"Well, good-bye,\" he said cheerfully— \"i Ux bonne heurc!\" By that M. Fille knew that Jean Jacques did not v/ish for company as he went— not even the com-pany of his old friend who had loved the bright whimsical emotional Zo\u003c5; who had hovered around nis life like a protecting spirit. \"A bi'tdt,\" responded M. Fille, declining upon the homely patois. But as Jean Jacques walked away with his little book of philosophy in his pocket, and the bird-cage in his hand, someone sobbed. M. Fille turned and saw. It was Virginie Poucette. Fortunately for Virginie other women did the same, not for the same reason, but out of a sympathy which was part of tne scene. '9 289 I U i",
         ".1*1 The Money Mnster It had been the intention of some friends of Jean Jacques to give him a cheer when he left, and even his sullen local creditors.now that theworst had come, were disposed to give him a good send-ofT; but the incident of the canary in its cage gave a turn to the feeling of the crowd which could not be resisted. They were not a people who could cut and dry their sentiments; they were all impulse and simplicity, with an obvious cocksure shrewdness too, like that of Jean Jacques — of the old Jean Jacques. He had been the epitome of all their faults and all their virtues. No one cheered. Only one person called, \"Au 'voir, M'sieu' Jean Jacques!\" and no one followed him — a curious, assertive, feebly-brisk, shock -headed figure in the brown velveteen jacket, which he had bought in Paris on his Grand Tour. \"What a ridiculous little man!\" said a woman from Chalfonte over the water, who had been buying freely all day for her new \"Manor,\" her husband being a member of the provincial legislature. The words were no sooner out of her mouth than two women faced her threateningly. \"For two pins I'd slap your face,\" said old M6re Langlois, her great breast heaving. \"Popinjay— you, that ought to be in a cage like his canary.\" But Virginie Poucette also was there in front of the offender, and she also had come from Chalfonte —was bom in that parish; and she knew what she was facing. \"Better carry a bird-cage and a book than carry swill to swine,\" she said; and madame from Chal-",
         "290 \"Au 'voir. M'sioii' Jonn Jnoquos* onto turned white, for it had horn said that her father was once a swine-herd, and that she had tried her best to forget it when, with her coarse beautv ;te Sir ^^\"■'°-'^^ ^^™\" -'^ --'!;• ''Hold your tongues, all of you, and look at that \" sa^ M. Manotel. who had joined the agitTted g'oup He was pointing towards the departing Jean Jacques' who was now away upon his road Jacques, Jean Jacques had raised the cage on a level with th.l 'v\"i T' \"^''^'■\"\"\"y ^P^'-'kinK to the b rd n sSyTpf; wftr^:''\" -'' ^'-'- --' - -^^^^ hirn'^\"^\"\"^ ^^^'^. ^^\"\"^ ^ \"^^'\"P °' t\"°. and then the blessedness of ,ts song, exultant, ho,«c-hkc, intimate J. i^t'^V.'^''^^\"^ °\"' '^^ bird singing by his side- and he did not look back. ^ ^ \"y",
         "\"'s r t, i f ITT ;l 1 n ■v \": 1 , 'I i! I CHAPTER XXI IF SHE HAD KNOWN IN TIME * -hi I *8 ■i\u003c. NOTHING stops when we stop for a time, or for all time, except ourselves. Everything else goes on — not in the same way; but it does ^o on. Life did not stop at St. Saviour's after Jean Jacques made his exit. Slowly the ruined mill rose up again, and very slowly indeed the widow of Palass Pou- cette recovered her spirits, though she remained a widow in spite of all appeals; but M. Fille and his sister never were the same after they lost their friend. They had great comfort in the dog which Jean Jacques had given to them, and they roused themselves to a malicious pleasure when Bobon, as he had been called by Zoo, rushed out at the heels of an importunate local creditor who had greatly worried Jean Jacques at the last. They waited in vain for a letter from Jean Jacques, but none came; nor did they hear anything from him, or of him, for a long, long time. Jean Jacques did not mean that they should. When he went away with his book of philosophy and his canary he had but one thing in his mind, and that was to find Zoe and make her understand that he knew he had been in the wrong. He had illusions",
         "292 JL^^fhad kno.n in fim. Long bef\"; the crth etl nT \"'\" ^^\"'^ ^°'-^™- own-he had bought from he r ' \"\"'\"^\"°' ^s hundred and twenty acr^. '^/ , ^^^\"\"'ent three Rockies and had TpTnt five hunted doH \"\"^^ •^'^^ provements on it Them ?t T ^\"\"^\"\"^ '\" ™- remaining asset still hk '\" ^'^^ ^^^t, one but worth little if he or .^TT^' '^'^^' ^'^'^~ prevented him f,^ \"\" gooa at the present. It trocted » E iZ '\"\"^ \"\" •'«\"'»\" ke ,;: he went. ' \"\"\"\"S '\"^ '\"'^'\"d his book as whS hr.r .r4ST.r;jsrd-? '- *\"■ ■^\"^ ay. ■■Btesu,. hie sthatiw ,1 '',\"'\" \"»? «\u003c\u003e \"avelta i„ ti\", to hotd I\"*\"?'™ ™™emal «.'s.^s\"iHf-?i •\"-\"-\"",
         "If i i The Money Master of a new dignity came into Jean Jacques' bearing, very diflferent from the assurance of the old days, and in reply he said; \"Not so far that I need be careless about my compatiy.\" This made the landlady of the little hotel laugh quite hard, for she did not like the braggart \"drummer\" who had treated her with great con-descension for a number of years. Also Madame Glozel liked Jean Jacques because of his canary. She thought there must be some sentimental reason for a man of fifty or more carrying a bird about with him; and she did not rest until she had drawn from Jean Jacques that he was taking the bird to his daughter in the West. There, however, madame was stayed in her search for infortuation. Jean Jacques closed up, and did but smile when she adroitly set traps for him, and at last asked him outright where his daughter was. Why he waited in Montreal it would be hard to say, save that it was a kind of middle place between the old life and the new, and also because he must decide what was to be his plan of search. First the West — first Wiimipeg, but where after that? He had at last secured information of where Zo6 and Gerard Fynes had stayed while in Montreal; and now he followed clues which would bring him in touch with folk who knew them. He came to know one or two people who were with Zoe and Gerard in the last days they spent in the metropolis, and he turned over and over in his mind every word said about his girl, as a child turns a sweetmeat in its mouth. This made him eager to be off; but on",
         "294 J^ slie had known in time • -11 , , ^ ' '^ 's ^ sad, sad storv h^rc ci, Bu S talir T ^- \"!.^'^ -\u003e^^°- t\"st.e?t it is %L.T ^ 'i^^ '' dymg-of heart disease cheaper lodgings down the strej . She used t„ hJ°'' If sh^d'waUed /orher'suSr tirhr' 'T^^' she'd have waited asTng aT v 1„: foTt'h 7^' tune the gipsy promised me forty years ago lw°\" Sth\"\"^'^^ -g-e, without a thought of her S slut. She was a slut, m'sieu'-^id I not know 29S ■ ■■",
         "'i The Money Master t': her? Did Ma'm'selle Slut not wait at table in this house and lead the men a dance here night and day — day and night till I found it out ! Well, off he went with the slut, and left the lady behind. . . . You men, you treat women so.\" Jean Jacques put out a hand as though to argue with her. \"Sometimes it is the other way,\" he retorted. \"Most of us have seen it like that.\" \"Well, for sure, you're right enough there, m'sieu',\" was the response. \"I've got nothing to say to that, except that it's a man that runs away with a woman, or that gets her to leave her husband when she does go. There's always a man that says, 'Come along, I'm the better chap for you.'\" Jean Jacques wearily turned his head away towards the cage where his canary was beginning to pipe its evening lay. \"It all comes to the same thing in the end,\" he said pensively; and then he who had been so quiet since he came to the little hotel — Glozel's, it was called — began to move about the room excitedly, running his fingers through his still bushy hair, which, to his credit, was always as clean as could be, burnished and shiny even at his mid-century period. He began murmuring to himself, and a frown settled on his forehead. Mme. Glozel saw that she had perturbed him, and that no doubt she had roused some memories which made sombre the sunny little room where the canary sang; where, to ravish the eyes of the pessimist, was a picture of Louis XVI. going to heaven in the arms of St. Peter. When started, however, the good woman could no",
         "296 \"market. So she kept on S th v'\"\"''^' '^\"\"^ woman do;vn the street ° ''''*°^ °f the \"Heart disease,\" she s-iirl „^ i r and finality; \"and we tnf ' ^'''\"^ ''''^^ assurance - shoek, a tall, a\" traTn a„d^S\"' ^'''l' '^~^ ^^-^ goes. Yes, heart discL \" „f °'^.'^° P°°'- thing avvful pain. But so .^^ ^'\"'\"'^'^'^s with such '^he had only a hu„d,ed^ T''\";'^''^^ '''' 'old n.e Jast n,e throi:gh.- she'S/°^'-^^ \"='^- 'L^nou,h to Wted up her eyes with a tav The . \"^ ''''\"f^' ^*« for something she couldn't f ^ ^'''' ^^ '^ '°\"J^i\"g «niple as though she °v^^li'''/\"\"'^ '^'^^ ««ys. as hcd-tick, 'It won't .^f ^'\"^ ^''°\"t the price ^f a for the poor dear's p£t clme T\"''' \"\"^ ^^\"^amish, and she young enough yet to Ltf '° \"\"' '° ^'^^r, 'f ^he had the chance So tM J u\"'^ °\"' °^ ''fo her people --^.hether I e ou dn f ' '^ ''^^\"'\" °^°\"t belonging to her. 'There's n. 1^ ^°' '°\"^eone mc,' she says, 'and ther^' \" ^^\"\"^ 'belongs to \"J thought ve,^ ],?., \\\"°.°\"^ ^ ''\u003c^fo\"g to.' about hersdf peThSbec. '\"l\"'* \"^\"* '° tell me «nd her famiiy^^had'^'ot ™' ''''/\"'' '^\"\"^ ^^''•\"\"g! 7^ right I should trJand^^tr^'\" ^''- ^et i she had any folks Sr, t ^ ^°^'' *° ^°\"^^. « your home^ And now '• t'°. '^^'■' \"^^^^re ^as answered, m'sieJ'P \"lo^T '■° /°\" ^'^'\"^ she -\"P-'andshelo:k;mteEre%t^V^^ ill",
         "m f The Money Master \"r i at any other time— 'Look there,' she said to me, 'it was in heaven, that's where my home was; but I didn't know it. I hadn't been taught to know the place when I saw it.' \"Well, I felt my skin go goosey, for I saw what was going on in her mind, and how she was remem-bering what had happened to her some time, some-where; but there wasn't, a tear in her eyes, and I never saw her cry — never once, m'sieu' — well, but as; brave as brave, Her eyes are always dry— burn-ing. They're like two furnaces scorching up her face. So I never found out her history, and she won't have the priest. I believe that's because she wants to die unknown, and doesn't want to confess. I never saw a woman I was sorrier for, though I think she wasn't married to the man that left her. But whatever she was, there's good in her- 1 haven't known hundreds of women and had seven sisters for nothing. WeU, there she is— not a friend near her at the last; for it's coming soon, the end— no one to speak to her, except the woman she pays to come in and look after her and nurse her a bit. Of course there's the landlady too, Madame Popincourt, a kmd enough little cricket of a woman, but with no sense and no head for business. And so the poor sick thing has not a single pleasure in the world. She can't read, because it makes her head ache, she says; and she never writes to anyone. One day she tried to sing a little, but it seemed to hurt her, and she stopped before she had begun almost. Yes, m'sieu', there she is without a single pleasure in the long hours when she doesn't sleep.\"",
         "298 J^ she had known in time \"There's my canary— that would cheer her uo \" eagerly said Jean Jacques, who. as the stoo' ofThe chirruping landlady continued, became master o? his agitation, and listened as though to the tale o some life for which he had concern \"Yes take mv canary to her. madame. It picked me up when I was down. It 'U help her-such a bird it il- Ifs he best singer in the .vorld. It's got in its throat IndXT 1 ^\"\"^\" ^\"^ Jennylind and Gri? and all the stars in heaven that sang together Ako' o be sure, it doesn't charge anything, but juft as W as there's daylight it sings'and 'sings! as you ask'^of \"1;:?^ H-'f ^''i' ^^ ^^^* I ^^nted to madame' ^T \"^f ^^■\" ^'^\"\"^^y declared Sst a^if it ir\\\" ^\"^'^^ ^'\"^ '^^ «ke that- S alt th. ^°^ \"\"\"\"'^ ^°°^ '^ ^^« doing, and rf birds that Tf ^ ^\"\"^ '''^''\"- ^''' ^ prince eood a ;£ ^T '\"'^\" ''' '\"'^'^\"'' y°«'\" do as gooa a thing n? you have ever done \" It would have to be much better, or it wouldn't be any use,\" remarked Jean Jacques. both handr^-r/\" .f rv''°\" °^ W^ndliness with Dotn hands. I don't beheve that. You mav h*. queer, but you've got a kind eye. It won't bT for one note mT T \"'^'^ ^ '^^'\"'^ ^° \"\"^^ «^d to W M ,.^°^.5'^ \"°*«' n°w that, and so E.ms- jng. _ At times it's as though he was laughing at haii'^^^J\" because, with me for his master, he has had good reason to laugh,\" remarked Jean Jacques 299 I ■",
         "' The Money Master who had come at last to take a despondent view of himself. \"That's bosh,\" rejoined Mme. Glozel; \"I've seen several people odder than you.\" She went over to the cage eagerly, and was about to take it away. \"Excuse me,\" interposed Jean Jacques, \"I will carry the cage to the house. Then you will go in with the bird, and I'll wait outside and see if the little rascal sings.\" \"This minute?\" asked madame. \"For sure, this very minute. Why should the poor lady wait? It's a lonely time of day, this, the evening, when the long night's ahead.\" A moment later the two were walking along the street to the door of Mme. Popincourt's lodgings, and people turned to look at the pair, one carrying something covered with a white cloth,— evidently a savoury dish of some kind— the other with a cage in which a handsome canary hopped about, well pleased with the world. At Mme. Popincourt's door Mme. Glozel took the cage and went upstairs. Jean Jacques, left behind, paced backwards and forwards in front of the house waiting and looking up, for Mme. Glozel had said that behind the front window on the third floor was where the sick woman lived. He had not long to wait. The setting sun shinmg full on the window had roused the bird, and he began to pour out a flood of delicious melody which flowed on and on, causing the people in the street to stay their steps and look up. Jean Jacques' face, as he",
         "300 If she had known in time listened, had something very !iko a smile. There was that m the smile belonging to the old pride which m days gone by had made him say when he looked at his domains at the Manor Cartier-his houses, his mills, his store, his buildings and his lands Barbllle'- \"\"\"'^ ^' ^\" ^''°\"^' '\" J'^^\" J=^^^\"^« Suddenly, however, there came a sharp pause in the singing, and after that a cry-a faint, startled cry. Then Mme. Glozel's head was thrust out of the wmdow three floors up, and she called to Jean Jacques to come quickly. As she bade him come some strange premonition flashed to Jean Jacques' and with thumping heart he hastened up the stair-case. Outside a bedroom door, Mme. Glozel met him^ She was so excited she could only whisper Be very quiet,\" she said. 'There is something strange. When the bird sang as it did-you heard It-she sat like one in a trance. Then her face took on a look glad and frightened too, and she stared hard at the cage. 'Bring that cage to me,' she baid. I brought It. She looked sharp at it then she gave a cry and fell back. As I took the cage away I saw what she had been looking at— a wntmg at the bottom of the cage. It was the name Carmen.\" .nT^^. ^ f^.^^ '^'^ J^^\" J^^^^^s pushed her aside ff.u u'^^ *^^ '■°°™- ^' ^^ did so, the sick woman in the big armchair, so pale yet so splendid in her death-beauty, raised herself up. With eyes that i^rancesca might have turned to the vision of her late, she looked at the opening door, as though to 301 !m U k i l4l I f-l",
         "I The Money Master learn if he who came was one she .nad wished to see through long, relentless days. \"Jean Jacques — ah, my beautiful Jean Jacques!\" she cried out presently in a voice like a wisp of sound, for she had little breath; and then with a smile she sank back, too late to hear, but not too late to know, what Jean Jacques said to",
         "her. EPOCH THE",
         "FIFTH II !",
         "^1^ CHAPTER XXII BELLS OF MEMORY * long the day since leaving the Manor Carticr he could not escape the signals from his , ast fc heard more than once the bells of nicmorj- rnging S the touch of the invisible hand of D«tiny \"hic^ accepts no philosophy save its ou-n. At Mon real for one hallowed instant, he had regained Wsbst Carmen, but he Imrl t„^^A t ^\"\"'cu ms losi onlyrro t ^^.1'°\"' ^^^ K'-ave-thc Poping\", . 1 ^'\"^f^- ^\"\"'- Glozel and Mme. li Ue mf ' ^\"^\" '''''''' '^^ ^'\"^'- PoP^court ike SL-ii^ctrSdt^'^^^r troub^s over. Passion or ennui wolid'^o 'mJ:^ shfhad''nl'''t^ '°\"'- '^'^^ ^^\"\"^\" Dolores, though' fnd from'r/^T.'' V\" '^\"^^^'^ ^'\"^^^ in on her, and from- the dusk she looked out of the casements 3°S .r",
         "I § M v: !!i IJ* I m The Money Master of life to such a glowing as Jean Jacques had seen when his btiming mill beatified the evening sky. She had known passion and vivid life in the days when she went hand-in-hand with Carvillho Gon-zales through the gardens of Granada; she had known the smothering home-sickness which does not alone mean being sick for a distant home, but a sickness of the home that is; and she had known what George Masson gave her for one thrilling hour, and then — then the man who left her in her death- year, taking not only the last thread of hope which held her to hfe. This vulture had taken also httle things dear to her daily life, such as the ring Car-villho Gonzales had given her long ago in Cadiz, also another ring, a gift of Jean Jacques, and things less valuable to her, such as money, for which she knew surely she would have no long use. As she lay waiting for the day when she must go from the garish scene, she unconsciously took stock of life in her own way. There intruded on her sight the stages of the theatres where she had played and danced, and she heard again the music of the paloma and those other Spanish airs which had made the world dance under her girl's feet long ago. At first she kept seeing the faces of thousands looking up at her from the stalls, down at her from the gallery, over at her from the boxes; and the hot breath of that excitement smote her face with a drunken odour that sent her mad. Then, alas! somehow, as dis-ease took hold of her, there were the colder lights, the colder breath from the few who applauded so Uttle. And always the man who had left her in",
         "306 Bells of memory b^no? T T ''■■^''^^^ ^^^t the answer mijrht th,-n\u003cT tr^ u ° ..f^- ■'hen one day she saw everv- acne. She found an old book of Vr^^r.C Sbetrr ^° '^'\"^- p^'p'-urt-sSfndr^h:; A? fir?o\"y\"t?e th'rofThrth'^^\"^ \"\"'°*^'^- 307 [I;",
         "JSl The Money Master ■I'tl f I ^\"M \"There is a World; men compass it throuRh tears, Dare doom for joy of it; it called me o'er the foam; I found it down the track of sundering years, Beyond the long island where the sea steals home. \"A land that triumphs over shame and pain, Penitence and passion and the parting breath, Over the former and the latter rain. The birth-morn fire and the frost of death. \"From its safe shores the white boats ride away, Salving the wreclcage of the portless ships— The Ught desires of the amorous day, The wayward, wanton wastage of the lips. \"Star-mist and music and the pensive moon — These when I harboured at that perfumed shore; And then, how soon! the radiance of noon. And faces of dear children at the door. \"Land of the Greater Love — men call it this; No light-o'-love sets here an ambuscade; No tender torture of the secret kiss Makes sick the spirit and the soul afraid. \"Bright bowers and the anthems of the free, The lovers absolute — ah, hear the call! Beyond the long island and the sheltering sea, That World I found which holds my world in thrall. \"There is a World; men compass it through tears. Dare doom for joy of it; it called mc o'er the foam; I found it down the track of sundering years, Beyond the long island where the sea steals home.\" At last the inner thought of it got into her heart, and then it was in reply to Mme. Glozel, who asked her where her home was, she said: \"In Heaven, but",
         "308 I did not know It!\" And thus it was, too that at the very lastw-hen Jean Jacques folio ved he sinf ing-b.rd into her death-chamber, she cried out ■ • Ah' my beautiful Jean Jacques'\" '^\"'^^ out, Ah, :^:s?^St;^s^S3^~ warmth at his heart tLn iSat^^Zf'y^:^: It never occurred to him that the two elderly magpS would jointly or severally have given the rest o? heir lives and their scant fortunes to have him with them either as husband, or as one who hono^raWv hires a home at so much a day \"\"\"ouraDly Though Jean Jacques did not know this last fact ^^uVrA 'T T^ \"\"' ^^^'♦b*-d h/s canard me aress she died m, he gave to Mme. Popincourt gone Tr/'''-'^\\'^'' \"°' \"^^^ ^hem tiU he Td gone. The dress in which Carmen died he wraoned ^^^Ct ^f7 '^^. P^\"\"\"\"' ^° ^'\"\u003c^- Glozel to care for till he should send for it or come again. hp. ^^ bird-take him on my birthday to sing at .ousitarht^L^lirg^^^^^^ K ing, and said that if ever he wanted a home, and",
         "309 M ill ii I n ' 'Sr ^ 'l \"i i ■ ''i '^,'^: i 1 ' 1 The Money Master she was alive, he would know where to find it. It sounded and looked sentimental, yet Jean Jacques was never less sentimental in a very sentimental life. This particular morning he was very quiet and grave, and not in the least agitated; he spoke like one from a friendly, sub-bright distance to Mme. Glozel, and also to Mme. Popincourt as he passed her at the door of her house. Jean Jacques had no elation as he took the West- em trail; there was not much hope in his voice; but there was purpose and there was a little stream of peace flowing through his being — and also, mark, £ 'tream of anger tumbhng over rough places. He ha'l jad two letters addressed to Carmen by the man — Hugo Stolphe — who had left her to her fate; and there was a grim devouring thing in him which would break loose, if ever the man crossed his path. He wotild not go hunting him, but if he passed him or met him on the way ! Still he would go hunting — to find his Carmencita, his little Carmen, his Zo6 whom he had unwittingly, God knew! driven forth into the far world of the millions of acres — a wide, wide hvmting - ground in good sooth. So he left his beloved province where he no longer had a home, and though no letters came to him from St. Saviour's, from Vilray or the Manor Cartier, yet he heard the bells of memory when the Hand In-visible arrested his footsteps. One day these bells rang so loud he would have heard them were he svmk in the world's deepest well of shame: but, as it was, he now marched on hiUs far higher than the",
         "310 Bells of memory countered one he E Z, i, ^J\"\" *^ '*» »\" - Oeo.,e Ma;ot\\.^^-X^^^^^^^ he'Sd'^dSef hr° \"'^-'^- -''\"o^t unconsciously, was in the office of tLT yJ^ n. ^f\"'\" ^^^'^- ^^^t Vilray. The letter ^ . ^^^^ °^ ^^^^ Court at Shilah and told h^ Tw v\"?\" ^^^inie's sister at gone awT/i rfa'XSr:^ ho 'T '\"^'^^'^ ^^^^ it was that Shilah ever seemed to hT'^^r^- '^'^\"^ West, a goal in his ouLt TnM ^ ' ^ ^^ ^°'''^^\u003ci but a goal. Hfhad hl'T f ''' '^'' S°^ P^^^aps, route, up, up Sd out into .1, ' P^' '* ^y ^°the'^ having completldl Ibd of c^rdr^' 'l '' '^''^' woman'spl: tT\u0026'^ .^'^ \"^^^^^^ ^^ Shilah, a",
         "^n^^neh4------n^^ irf Tlie Money Master ■J . : i he could not remember. For a moment he did not even realize that he was at Shilah. His meditation had almost been a trance, and it took him time tc adjust himself to the knowledge of the conscious mind. His subconsciousness was very powerfully alive in these days. There was not the same cease-lessly active eye, nor the vibration of the impatient body which belonged to the money-master and miller of the Manor Cartier. Yet the eye had more depth and force, and the body was more powerful and vigorous than it had ever been. The long tramping, the everlasting trail on false scents, the mental battling with troubles past and present, had given a fortitude and vigour to the body beyond what it had ever known. In spite of his homelessness and pilgrim equipment he looked as though he had a home— far ofif. The eyes did not smile; but the lips showed the goodness of his heart — and its hard-ness too. Hardness had never been there in the old days. It was, however, the hardness of resentment, and not of cruelty. It was not his wife's or his daughter's flight that he resented, nor yet the loss of all he had, nor the injury done him by Sebastian Dolores. No, his resentment was against one he had never seen, but was now soon to see. As his mind came back from the far places where it had been, and his eyes returned to the concrete world, he- saw what the woman recalled to him. It was — yes, it was Virginie Poucette— the kind and beautiful Vir- ginie — for her goodness had made him remember her as beautiful, though indeed she was but comely, like this woman who stayed him as he walked by the river.",
         "3\" \"Is Vir- xou are M'sieu' Ta t ' — \" said questioningly. Jacques Barbille?- \"How did you know?\" he askert giniePoucettehere?\" • it al^.-anrthe\"^ S\"? te\"t h— and you have lips!\" he replied. ^^ ^^^^^^ ^^d then the «p?tdtsiX\"t^'hii%r'f\"'' '-\"-^ ^ \"But how did you wtJ f °^ ^''■S'\"i«- bille?\" he repeated \"\"^^ J\"^\" J^^^ques Bar- laugra;;;,Sice iy^t K' ^e replied with a pie and primitive af fer'£ ef \"rl'^\"''' ^^ ^™- tographer at Vilrav an,l v ^■- ^^^\"\"^ '^ a pho- Pictures there, and'^'sent jt tn^'\"' ^?l°\"^ °f your your way/ said A'Jjnie o l\"'' 3' \"^^^ '^\"'\"e not forget that he .frnTf^T' \"'\"' '^ ^^ '^°-' ^° mat she is wr friPT,^ \" \"And what a fSi^L °Sr,*«^ /?\" J«qu=,. on^e\"!i„Je\"l'SetSin'''r^ ^^' ^^^d. \"Only *« two poorSre^'!^,\"^^ hoTJ.^r^'- ^\"\"^ 'h- ^«g.ng to each other so- WeT fh?'\"' '^^'^ \"^-• ^- ^aragay. but that was^ih^or^^ a^^ if'fl",
         "^l The Money Master f r ago. Nothing since, and they were going on— on t\u003c Fort Providence to spend the winter — for his healtt — his lungs.\" \"What to do — on what to live?\" moaned Jeai Jacques. \"His grandmoth( - sent him a thousand dollars so your Madame Zoe wrote me.\" Jean Jacques raised a hand with a gesture o: emotion. \"Ah, the blessed woman! May there bf no purgatory for her, but Heaven at once anc always!\" \"Come home with me — where are your things?' she asked. \"I have only a knapsack,\" he replied. \"It is noi far from here. But I cannot stay with you. I hav\u003c no claim. No, I will not, for \" \"As to that, we keep a tavern,\" she returned \"You can come the same as the rest of the world The company is mixed, but there it is. Yoi needn't eat off the same plate, as they say ir Quebec.\" Quebec! He looked at her with the face of one who saw a vision. How like Virginie Poucette— the brave, generous Virginie — how like she was ! In silence now he went with her, and seeing his mood she did not talk to him. People stared as they walked along, for his dress was curious and his head was bare, and his hair like the coat of a young lion. Besides, this woman was, in her way, as brave and as generous as Virginie Poucette. In the very doom'ay of the tavern by the river a man jostled them. He did not apologize. He only leered. It",
         ".^14 Bells of memory \"eSabi:/\"\"^-'\"'''\"^' \"^'^'^^'y ^-dsome face _'Pig!\" exclaimed Virginie Poucette's sister Jean Jacques stared after the imn ^^^ u everv nerve in h;. u a u \"' ^\"\"^ somehow every nerve m his body became angry. He had nil at once a sense of hatred. He shoDk th^^ C. i/ against which the man had coind^d He tm \"m\" •'Fd ifk^^n\"\" '!:'' '\"f ^\"^' handsomelace \"'\"■ 1 d like to see him thrown into the river \" safH Virginie Poucette's sister. ■'We have a nL S l.r~'r'u™'\" ^'■'^'^\"d-as good as can be wf U if vTv ^ T '\"^^ '^ nothing,' he said Well American monlr'eltiii nfggJr bC \"^^'-^ ^^\"''^ Jean Jacques kept looking after the man. \"Whv don t you turn him out r he asked sharply ^ plied \"C ^T.'' *°.-r\u003e^°- anyhow,- she re- £Lsnp^-i-;-;.--m^^^^^^ fass me after him!' she said, and so he stavs tm f ^ Sr \"^'^ T '\" ^'^^ tavern itsef,b^ ^'t^ htt e annex next door-there, where he'^ going now hii, „ ^^ '•° \"^ ^s well. He s alone there on his dung- She brought Jean Jacques into a room that over- 3^5 t'MI r i !",
         "Ij WPi ij The Money Master looked the river — which, indeed, hung on its very brink. From the steps at its river-door, a little ferry-boat took people to the other side of the Watloon, and very near — just a few handbreadths away — was the annex where was the nian who had jostled Jean Jacques. 1. H't H'' , ■ ' ■ 1. i",
         "ill CHAPTER XXIII JEAN JACQUES HAS WORK TO DO ^ pended from the ceiling of the raft;re7ro^ and through the open doorway which gave on to a httle wooden piazza with a slight railing Ind small ^hing, -etLgtrsiyiSLgtr:s o1.1?e\\o th^«iiS;l-: -less ~- bre^thS Tho h Tu '' \"°' ^°' ^ ^^\"^ «^\"\"d of oreathmg. The bed, however, was empty and no chair was occupied; but on a settle in a c^r^er b^ s de an unused fireplace sat a man, now wirhand^ across his breast; but with his head alwavs in a listening attitude. The whole figure suSed sus eemed to ^It ^\"/ '*\"^'^'\"«^' ^\"^^ ^is bare feet seemed to gnp the fJoor; also the sleeves of hi« you w„\",r 'T^ \"P ^ 1'\"'- It :as not a to you would wish to see in your room at midnight^!",
         "317 ^'' in w ' ' ^r ^ f :''S;| '1 ■ The Money Master asked. Once or twice he sighed heavily, as he lis-tened to the river slishing past and looked out to the sparkle of the skies. It was as though the in-finite had drawn near to the man, or else that the man had drawn near to the infinite. Now and again he brought his fists down on his knees with a sav-age, though noiseless, force. The peace of the river and the night could not contend successfully against a dark spirit working in him. When, during his vigil, he shook his shaggy head and his lips opened on his set teeth, he seemed like one who would take toll at a gateway of forbidden things. He started to his feet at last, hearing footsteps outside upon the stairs. Then he settled back again, drawing near to the chimney-wall, so that he should not be easily seen by anyone entering. Presently there was the click of a latch, then the door opcmcd and shut, and cigar-smoke invaded the room. An instant later a hand went up to the suspended oil-lamp and twisted the wick into brighter flame. As it did so, there was a sHght noise, then the click of a lock. Turning sharply, the man under the lamp saw at the door the man who had been sitting in the comer. The man had a key in his hand. Exit now could only be had through the door opening on to the river. \"Who are you? What the hell do you want here?\" asked the fellow under the lamp, his swarthy face drawn with fear and yet frowning with anger. \"Me — I am Jean Jacques Barbille,\" said the other in French, putting the key of the door in his pocket. The other repHed in French, with a Spanish-English",
         "318 Jean Jacques lias work to do husband such on injury\" *** *™ \"\"\" hJS'JSl'e\" E^'ffl ■\"-»■' \"\"-■\"' \"-» Sit down I want to talk to you \" said loin rd^^rih^r^Sis T.^^^ 'y atab.fat-'th: \"B^ruiT::„^r„r„T7»\"'r?- .u^ow,.r,,^™^u.orhr..\".,r.'i' Jean Jacques was smaller than Stolohe h„t t,= -Stt?-:s;r-dt£Hr thelS'' '\"' ''^^'^- \"^ «'^\"-d ^-ftly -und co.d n^ot hulttv.i;-rd-.--ird3^ tha^Tean\" t\"\"' ^'°'p'^^ '^' ^°^. f°^ he had a fear that Jean Jacques was armed, and might be a mad- 319 if ^1^",
         "it ill 1^ . :! '' The Money Master man armed — there were his feet bare on the brovm painted boards. They looked so strange, so un-canny. He surely must be a madman if he wanted to do harm to Hugo Stolphe; for Hugo Stolphe had only \"kept\" the woman who had left her husband, not because of himself, but because of another man altogether — one George Masson. Had not Carmen herself told him that before she and he lived together? What grudge could Carmen's husband have against Hugo Stolphe ? Jean Jacques sat down also, and, leaning on the table, said: \"Once I was a fool and let the other man escape — George Masson it was. Because of what he did, my wife left me.\" His voice became husky, but he shook his throat, as it were, cleared it, and went on. \"I won't let you go. I was going to kill George Masson — I had him like that!\" He opened and shut his hand with a gesture of fierce possession. \"But I did not kill him. I let him go. He was so clever — cleverer than you will know how to be. She said to me — my wife said to me, when she thought I had killed him, 'Why did you not fight him? Any man would have fought him.' That was her view. She was right — not to kill without fighting. That is why I did not kill you at once when I knew.\" \"When you knew what?\" Stolphe was staring at the madman. \"When I knew you were you. First I saw that ring — that ring on your hand. It was my wife's. I gave it to her the first New Year after we married. I saw it on your hand when you were drinking at the",
         "320 _^ff;^_^acques_has_«wk to do ''Your wk'lr^n aTLl'^^^^ ^° '\"^^ ^^^\" Jean Jacques' eyes swam rpH \"a/t ■/• . \"St^irr\"'^ 't the faTt tht in m^lSs'^^^^ otolphe temnorizeH \"t «„ \" \"'y arms. did not leave you because of n^f \"Z\"^ y°\"- ^^^ because-because I was the-% i^ ''^'\"^ *° '\"^ J.c,u~ SS„f ?„S °i\"'- •\"»-■' \u003e» who would not hav?h„ ■ '''^' \"^^^^ '\"-ah, poor. she\\\"al£: ryou°:7jrtoT' ''^-r^ woman day bv dav h„f f u , , *° '*^® ^'h a days are done and then ^^ ^'' '''^^ ^^^ ^^e ^^-^VtillsupSrr l?fu °\"' '\"^\"'■\"g to say, 'Au and to taTeTonev and ^^ f^ \"^^^'^ ^^^^e back. . . . That wTher dear'thaf '''°T'' *° '^^-' Carmen Barbille; andt war^ou^ fl^^^ ^\"'^ °^ -/^:-Sd^r^roti\"?----'-^ rai'LSre\" rSdT 'T '^'^ ^^^ ^ -^den '■She had on:rnd':::?/;rent'r r-' you to do witK^I Sused herlr^r- h'^' ''^Z hisrr.fBe?u3 ? ^'^-^ - -^\"-\"^s husband, no 3d ' ^ ^'\"\"''' '''^ ^\"^ ^'^\"^no 2j . no ciiud, and you used her so! That",
         "32' if :: !!:■ ■■i i --l W n I '\\ ;r J'i i -i \\, The Money Master is why I shall kill you to-night. We will fight for it.\" Yes, but surely the man was mad, and the thing to do was to humour him, to gain time. To humour a madman — that is what one always advised, there-fore Stolphe would make the pourparler, as the French say. \"Well, that's all right,\" he rejoined, \"but how is it going to be done? Have you got a pistol?\" He thought he was very clever, and that he would now see whether Jean Jacques Barbille was armed. If he was not armed, well, then, there would be the chances in his favour; it wasn't easy to kill with hands alone. Jean Jacques ignored the question, however. He waved a hand impatiently, as though to dismiss it. \"She was beautiful and splendid; she had been a queen down there in Quebec. You Ued to her, and she was blind at first— I can see it all. She beUeved so easily— but yes, always! There she was what she was, and you were what you are, not a Frenchman, not Catholic, and an American — no, not an American — a South American. But no, not quite a South American, for there was the Portuguese nigger in you — Sit down!\" Jean Jacques was on his feet bending over the enraged mongrel. He had spoken the truth, and Carmen's last lover had been stung as though a serpent's tooth was in his flesh. Of all things that could be said about him, that which Jean Jacques said was the worst — that he was not all white, that he had nigger blood! Yet it was true; and",
         "322 Jean Jacques has work to do he realized that Jean Jacques must have got his information in Shilah itself, where he had been charged with it. Yet, raging as he was, and ready to take the Johnny Crapaud— that is the name by which he had always called Carmen's husband- by the throat, he was not yet sure that Jean Jacques was not armed. He sat stiU under an anger greater than his own, for there was in it that fanaticism which only the love or hate of a woman could breed in a man's mind. Suddenly Stolphe laughed outright, a crackling mirthless, ironical laugh; for it really was absurdity made sublime that this man, who had been aban-doned by his wire, should now want to kill one who had abandoned her! This outdid Don Quixote over and over. \"Well, what do you want?\" he asked. \"I want you to fight,\" said Jean Jacques. \"That is the way. That was Carmen's view. You shall have your chance to live, but I shall throw you in the nver, and you can then fight the river. The current IS swift, the banks are steep and high as a house down below there. Now, 1 am ready. . . !\" He had need to be, for Stolphe was quick, kicking the chair from beneath him, and throwing himself heavily on Jean Jacques. He had had his day at that in South America, and as Jean Jacques Barbille had said, the water was swift and deep, and the banks of the Watloon high and steep! But Jean Jacques was unconscious of everything save a debt to be collected for a woman he had loved, a compensation which must be taken in flesh 323 H",
         "[I The Money Master 1 I r M It ?! ?■:■ and blood. Perhaps at the moment, as Stolphe had said to himself, he was a little mad, for all his past, all his plundered, squandered, spoiled Hfe was crying out at him like a hundred ghosts, and he was fighting with beasts at Ephesus. An exaltation possessed him. Not since the day when his hand was on the lever of the flume with George Masson below; not since the day he had turned his back for ever on the Manor Cartier had he been so young and so much his old self- an egotist, with all the blind confidence of his kind; a dreamer inflamed into action with all a mad dreamer's wild power. He was not fifty-two years of age, but thirty-two at this moment, and all the knowledge got of the wrestling river-drivers of his boyhood, when he had spent hours by the river struggling with river- champions, came back to him. It was a reUef to his sick soul to wrench and strain, and propel and twist and force onward, step by step, to the door opening on the river, this creature who had left his Carmen to die alone. \"No, you don't— not yet. The jail before the river!\" called a cool, sharp, sour voice; and on the edge of the trembling platform overhanging the river, Hugo Stolphe was dragged back from the pltmge downward he was about to take, with Jean Jacques' hand at his throat. Stolphe had heard the door of the bedroom forced, but Jean Jacques had not heard it; he was only conscious of hands dragging him back just at the moment of Stolphe's deadly peril.",
         "3=4 Jean Jacques haswork to do \"And coUected justTn tS..\"\"\" °'^''' °^ '^\"^ l^^- and there wasn't any t\"me toTo \" ''. . ^^^^f\"^' what your business with hm was \"\"rtif* ^\"°^ He hustled his prisoner out. good-bye S Knie^of J,,^?°^.^t *^^^' ^^ ^^'^ crack of J^Z^ ^ i'oucette's sister through the strat him. • \"\"\" ^\"^ ^°\"^ \"^'^^ *« ^ould re! tu2t;ckr,i1,TsSrT'' '%\"^'^' - •^^ from view. '^ *'^^°''« 't disappeared day; and she Suld noT^sf ti?.'',,, \"f ^^^ \"\" ^'^^^ Virginie how T^n t \" ^'^'^ ^^^ written to eveL,! and i::t SreS.\" ''^^'^ ^ ^^^",
         "3»S ■ ; ■ 1: ■ i f {■*' CHAPTER XXIV JEAN JACQUES ENCAMPED .1 t ■^ 1 , l^'^ ;r:iw, THE Young Doctor of Askatoon had a good heart, and he was exercising it honourably one winter's day near three years after Jean Jacques had left St. Saviour's. \"There are many French Canadians working on the railway now, and a good many habitant farmers Uve hereabouts, and they have plenty of children — why not stay here and teach school? You are a Catholic, of course, monsieur?\" This is what the Young Doctor said to one who had been under his anxious care for a few, vivid days. The little brown-bearded man with the grey- brown hair nodded in reply, but his gaze was on the billowing waste of snow, which stretched as far as eye could see to the pine-hills in the far distance. He nodded assent, but it was plain to be seen that the Young Doctor's suggestion was not in tune with his thought. His nod only acknowledged the rea-sonableness of the proposal. In his eyes, however, was the wanderlust which had possessed him for three long years, in which he had been searching for what to him was more than Eldorado, for it was hope and home. Hope was all he had left of the",
         "326 Jean Jacques encamped It was his fixed deal I', ^f \"'' °^ ^'- Saviour's. Lands. „,i!]rmSo^X;t;trc^^^^^^ were gone, and his uifpT- ' T\"\"^^^^' store, all had buried her ^-th!- T'\" ^''° ^^^ «°\"e- He treal-Mme ao^lLr'^i^\"'.'^^'^^\"^^ '\" Mon- wards thaT the W f '\"\"\"^ *° ^^' neighbours after- was carved. --ChllTL^e^ TcS^\" \"'\"' fc«a«r '-which was to sav ''^',ft, '^'* '\"\"*''- God's Home now.\" ^' °^' ^\"\"^ °\"^e. and That done, with a sorrow which still h^^ fi, ^finality in his mind, he hatru'rnl^hislac'^^^^^^^^^^ t^stiiah^whS^; '^:!:^S^:hi''-^^^^^^ and at last to Askatoon wheTe anoth ' 7\".\"^°'\"^' closed an enoch in hU:\\;(.,^^'^ chapter still There he harLen taken do ^Tu \"^\"\"\"'^ '\"^ ^\"• the lungs, and. Sn^ng^^ttrdr of Tr*T °' had been taken possession of by th'eYounrn '*?\"■'' who would not senH i,;«, \u002b *i. %. ^ot^ng Doctor. sion aiiln on^,'''''\"^ ^'''^°'\"' ^\"^ '^\"P^'e^s confu-",
         "3»7 The Money Master ^1 The Young Doctor was a man of decision, and he had whisked the little brown-grey sufferer to his own home, and tended him there like a brother till the danger disappeared; and behold he was re-warded for his humanity by as quaint an experience as he had ever known. He had not succeeded — though he tried hard — in getting at the history of his patient's life; but he did succeed in reading the fascinating story of a mind; for Jean Jacques, if not so voluble as of yore, had still moments when he seemed to hypnotize himself, and his thoughts were alive in an atmosphere of intellectual passion ill in accord with his condition. Presently the little brown man withdrew his eyes from the window of the Young Doctor's office and the snowy waste beyond. They had a curious red underglow which had first come to them an evening long ago, when they caught from the sky the re-flection of a burning mill. There was distance and the far thing in that imderglow of his eyes. It had to do -with the horizon, not with the place where his feet were. It said, \"Out there, beyond, is what I go to seek, what I must find, what wili be home to me.\" \"Well, I must be getting on,\" he said in a low voice to the Young Doctor, ignoring the question which had been asked. \"If you want work, there's work to be had here, as I said,\" responded the Yoimg Doctor. \"You are a man of education \" \"How do you know that?\" asked Jean Jacques.",
         "328 Jean Jacques encamped 1 say I speak,\" answered plenty to do H wS Oh' '\"f •\", ^\"^ ^^^'^^ ^\"'h sous, hardlj or ancs^ u'w^^'^-.r. ''^\"\"^'^^ f^ and silver dollars at h.™ Aw ^°^^ '°\"'' ^^'\"'^ \"The doUaS are mTr * \"\"^^ *^\" standard.- the Young Dc^^tor\" uTztr\" \"°\"' ^'■\" ^^ said\\£°o1if fil'^lj^^^^^^^ to pay you.\" to him the Young Doctor had t^' ' '^-\"^\"\"^ mocking; and thourf, V,. v, M ^\"\"\"^ '™\"'=^ ^d his day there were 5^! ^\"\"t ^ \"\"\"^^^^ \"\"\"^h in endure it \"\"\"' ^^^ '* was not easy to SuS s?:dit^.°^ thi^wrni^sLrs Sss^Ssicts^r^^^^ had the exactlS of \"'^\"^^™'^''^\u003c^^^Psack. It course and wScal^ f. f f ^^ .'^* \"P™ ^ f^^ ^°uw carry it out on scientific calcula-",
         "339 The Money Master . ' tion. He had been full of mocking quips and sallit at himself, but from first to last he never talkec The things he said were nothing more than surfac sounds, as it were — the ejaculations of a mind, nc its language or its meanings. \"He's had some strange history, this queer littl man,\" said the housekeeper to the Young Doctoi \"and I'd like to know what it is. Why, we don' even know his name.\" \"So would I,\" rejoined the Young Doctor, \"an I'll have a good try for it.\" He had had his try more than once, but it had nc succeeded. Perhaps a little torture woiild do i( he thought; and so he had made the rather tactics remark about the scarcity of dollars. Also his loo! was incredulous when Jean Jacques protested tha he had enough to pay the fee. \"When you searched me you forgot to look in th right place,\" continued Jean Jacques; and he die\\ from the lining of the hat he held iu lus hand a littl bundle of ten-dollar bills. \"Here — take your pa; from them,\" he said, and held out the roll of bills \"I suppose it won't be more than four dollars a day and there's enough, I think. I can't pay you fo your kindness to me, and I don't want to. I'd lik to owe you that; and it's a good thing for a mai himself to be owed kindness. He remembers i when he gets older. It helps him to forgive himsel more or less for what he's sorry for in life. I'v( enough in this bunch to pay for board and pro fessional attendance, or else the price has gone uf since I had a doctor before.\"",
         "330 Jean Jacques encamped ha?pSsX\"7^ -^ '•\u003e; ;-«•\u003e was half-i„,nical. of a hidden p'ast^TnopastX 'T.'^ \"^\" ever been a happy past ' \" *\"'^'^^\" ^as with the remark that th;.^\"^'\"™^'' them denomination of „ou^\\otm TL°' ' ^'\"'^ ^\"^ -his eye as he said it^ \"^hen I Td Jed-^ ^\"'\"^'« to laV^aTt leTreSf o^l^^-^^ '^\"^ ^^ ^ -\" for his old age Wdl «nLv '^\"r ''\"^'^ ^\"^^ 'here meant for ^neTL'Sl^,' r^'' ^JJ^ -^ a bit of trouble and it v..J , ^°^ weren't stitution and a i' J?' ''\"\"fy y^\"-\" good con- that pulled you thZr if * .^'^ ^y\"\"^'''''' mine. Go and th«nv ■ u '^*'\" * ^\"y ^\"1 of She did iTau\"^ \"\"^ housekeeper if you ,ike. JaZe?'^ Tsa^/J\" '*'\"\"'' ''«'•■\" ^\"^wered Jean £ Poucette S f.n\",H '\"'^^ \"\"^ °^ Virginie Pa- that.exc^ro;e tWn«°1lT \"\"'''\"« ''^\"^^ ^'^^^ anybody. •■ ^' ^\"'^ ^ \"^ \"°t raying that to ~ar2°^Tm;^ *''\"\".■ H— a very somethmg-'a^vrteSeTet '''''''■ ^' ^^ J^V' ^^'^\"'^ P^'««^ Poucette.?- he asked \"l^I^^:^ l^T^K^!'^''',^ though^:ty; •'Virginie p'o?eette^ai:Xi''\"^-:,.-^ he began^. be£\\im E'pas^nr'''\"^^' ^''^'^ ^^^^^ -t m tnat past, now so far away, in which",
         "Jo The Money Master J 7i it '^\"^ sj^i h. ) t? he had lived— and died. Strange that when he had mentioned Virginie's name to the housekeeper he had no such feeling as possessed him now. It had been on the surface, and he had used her name without any deep stir of the waters far down in his soul. But the Young Doctor was fingering the doors of his inner life, — all at once this conviction came to him — and the past rushed upon him with all its disarray and ignominy, its sorrow, joy, ela-tion and loss. Not since he had left the scene of his defeat, not since the farewell to his dead Carmen, that sweet summer day when he had put the lovely, ruined being away with her words, \"Jean Jacqttcs — ah, my beautiful Jean Jacques,\" ringing in his ears, had he ever told anyone his story. He had had a feeling that, as Carmen had been restored to him without his crying out, or vexing others with his sad history, so would Zo6 also come back to him. Patience and silence was his motto. Yet how was it that here and now there came an overpowering feeling, that he must tell this healer of sick bodies the story of an invalid soul ? This man with the piercing dark-blue eyes before him, who looked so resolute, who had the air of one who could say, \"This is the way to go,\" because he knew and was sure; he was not to be denied. \"Who was Virginie Poucette?\" repeated the Young Doctor insistently, yet ever so gently. \"Was she such a prize among women? What did she do?\" A flood of feeling passed over Jean Jacques' face. He looked at his hat and his knapsack lying in a",
         "332 Jean Jacques cnrarnpiHl \\'.M' a desire to seize them and fly r am the A ''\" ' L ,_ °^ \"^\"^ °^ fatalism canw- up -i l,im AS -ough he had received an order from •.nti.;., h, ' soul, he said helplessly: \"Well, if it must be, it must.\" Then he swept the knapsack and his hai frorr *hc chair to the floor, and sat down. .JII^^A ^^'u °' '^^ beginning,\" he s..id aiih Lis eyes fixed on those of the Young Doctor, yet i\u003c,o;.n,. beyond h.m to far-ofT things. \"I will st.r, ,n m the time when I used to watch the gold Cock of Beaugard turning on the mill, when I sat in the doorway of the Manor Cartier in my pinafore. I iTho, M°''t''\\^ ^ *'\" y°\"' ''\"* \"\"^ybe it was meant to W^^i , • I ^°\"V'ction. While you are able to keep logic and conviction hand in hand then everything is all right. I have found that out ^gic, philosophy are the props of life, but still you must obey the impulse of the soul-oh. abso-lutely! You must \" He stopped short. \"But it will seem strange to you he added after a moment, in which the Youne T^J % ^'.'~* wayfarer-a vagabond you may think. But in other days I was in places—-\" ^ n«\u003c=M fiu^ °°''*°^ interjected with abrupt friendli- ne^ that there was no need to say he had been in in ra ^°\" ^''\" ^ ^PP^^nt. if he were l.'J^^\"' *^^v' ^ \"^^ 'P'^^ ^\"^^^y-\" rejoined Jean toff ^\"h J?' '°°H '^' cherry-brandy which the other oflfered him, and drank it off with gusto.",
         "333 i' The Money Master il' I ' 1 St 11 \"Ah, that — that,\" he said, \"is like the cordials Mfere Langlois used to sell at Vilray. She aiid Virgiuie Poucette had a place together on the market — none better than Mfere Langlois except Virginie Poucette, and she was like a drink of water in the desert. . . . Well, there, I will begin. Now my father was- \" It was lucky there were no calls for the Young Doctor that particular early morning, else the course of Jean Jacques' life might have been greatly different from what it became. He was able to tell his story from the very first to the last. Had it been inter-rupted or unfinished one name might not have been mentioned. When Jean Jacques used it, the Young Doctor sat up and leaned forward eageriy, while a light came into his face — a light of surprise, of revelation and understanding. When Jean Jacques came to that portion of his life when manifest tragedy began, — it began of course on the Antoine, but then it was not manifest — when his Carmen left him after the terrible scene with George Masson, he paused and said: \"I don't know why I tell you this, for it is not easy to tell ; but you saved my life, and you have a right to know what it is you have saved, no matter how hard it is to put it all before you.\" It was at this point that he mentioned Zoe's name — he had hitherto only spoken of her as \"my daughter\"; and here it was the Young Doctor showed startled interest, and repeated the name after Jean Jacques. \"Zo6! Zo6 — ah!\" he said, and became silent",
         "334 Jean Jacques encamped again. Jean Jacques had not noticed the Young Doctors pregnant interruption, he was so busy with his own memories of the past; and he brought the tale to the day when he turned his face to the West to look for Zo6. Then he paused. \"And then?\" the Young Doctor asked. \"There '^ f!'^r^~^^^'\"' '^ ^^^ ^■^^'\"Ch for Zoe ever since \" ^ What IS there to say?\" continued Jean Jacques. I have searched till now. and have not found \" _ How have you hved?\" asked the other. \"Keeping books in shops and factories, coUectine accounts for storekeepers, when they saw they could trust me, working at threshings and harvests, teach-ing school here and there. Once I made fifty dollars at a railway camp telling French-Canadian tales and singing chansons Canadiennes. I have been insurance agent, sold lightning-rods, and been fore-man of a gang building a mill-hut I could not bear that. Every time I looked up I could see the Cock of Beaugard where the roof should be. And so on so on, first one thing and then another till now— till I came to Askatoon and fell down by the drug-store and you played the good Samaritan. So it g\u003c^s, and I step on from here again, looking— looking \" \"WW * f '^1\"^;\" \"^'^ *^« \"^°™g Doctor. What IS the good of going on now! You can only tramp to the next town, and \" \"And the next,\" interposed Jean Jacques. \"But Z'^ '\\T^ J^^\"^\" \"^ P\"' ^'^ h^nd on his heart, and gathered up his hat and knapsack. ;;But you haven't searched here at Askatoon \" Ah? . . . Ah— well, surely that is so,\" answered",
         "335 The Money Master ti iV hi Jean Jacques wistfully. \"I had forgotten that. Perhaps you can tell me, you who know all. Have you any news about my Zoe for me ? Do you know — was she ever here? Madame Gerard Fynes would be her name. My name is Jean Jacques Barbille.\" \"Madame Zoe was here, but she has gone,\" quietly answered the Young Doctor. Jean Jacques dropped the hat and the knapsack. His eyes had a glad, yet staring and frightened look, for the Young Doctor's face was not the bearer of good tidings. \"Zo6 — my Zo6! You are sure? . . . When was she here?\" he added huskily. \"A month ago.\" \"When did she go?\" Jean Jacques' voice was almost a whisper. \"A month ago.\" \"Where did she go?\" asked Jean Jacques, holding himself steady, for he had a strange dreadful pre-monition. \"Out of all care at last,\" answered the Young Doctor, and took a step towards the little man, who staggered, then recovered himself. \"She — my Zoe is dead! How?\" questioned Jean Jacques in a ghostly sort of voice, but there was a steadiness and control unlike what he had shown in other tragic moments. \"It was a blizzard. She was bringing her hus-band's body in a sleigh to the railway here. He had died of consumption. She and the driver of the sleigh went down in the blizzard. Her body covered the child and saved it. The driver was lost also.\"",
         "336 Jean Jacques encamped There wt/'ltet- 0?^ rh™ the' \";'°'''^^- Your nan.e is Jean Jac.uefBarbillttVln t^LTinT '° \"°\".^^ ''\"\"^'^ hefan°dhe nusband in the graveyard yonder.\" He oointed Yes. Her husband had become Catfinim f„^ nis knees, whi.. anng his child's name. geml' Irtf^^'r '\"'' \" '^\"\"'^ °\" his shoulder geniiy, but presently went out shutHn^ tu^ ^ after him. As he lef^ the room htev \"'he' ulS^d andsaid, \"Cou.age, Monsieur Jean Jacques! c\"ur latlThe h Jd ^T\\^°T' ^\"-\"^ b^* a half-hour \"Monsieur Jean Jacques,\" he said gently to the bowed figure still sitting as he left him Jean Jacques got up slowly and looked at him as though scarce understanding where he was WheT^is zS^to *\"'.\"~\"^\"! ^^ '\"y ^°^'^ '^hild? wh,7XZ ^- \"1° asked in agitation. His whole hod^ seemed to palpitate. His red fire. 22 eyes were",
         "all CHAPTER XXV WHAT WOULD YOU HAVE DONE? THE Young Doctor did not answer Jean Jacques at once. As he looked at this wayworn fugitive he knew that another, and perhaps the final crisis of his life, was come to Jean Jacques Barbille, and the human pity in him shrank from the possible end to it all. It was an old-world figure this, with the face of a peasant troubadour and the carriage of an aboriginal — or an aristocrat. Indeed, the ruin, the lonely wandering which had been Jean Jacques' portion, had given him that dignity which often comes to those who defy destiny and the blows of angry fate. Once there had been in his carriage something jaunty. This was merely life and energy and a little vain confidence; now there was the look of courage which awaits the worst the world can do. The life which, according to the world's logic, should have made Jean Jacques a miserable figure, an ill- nourished vagabond, had given him a physical grace never before possessed by him. The face, however, showed the ravages which loss and sorrow had made. It was lined and shadowed with dark reflection, yet the forehead had a strange smoothness and serenity little in accord with the rest of the countenance. It 338 .m *",
         "•; _^at would you have done? was hke the snow-summit of a mountain below which are the ragged escarpments of trees and rocks maT mg a look of storm and warfare \"Where is she-the child of my Zoe?\" Jean i^'^T.u^^^'^'^ ^'•^ ^\" ^■'\"°^t angr; emphasis a^ though the Young Doctor were hidi^^her from him She .s with the wife of Nolan Dovie, my parTnerTn was mamed five years, and she had no child This was a gnef to her, even more than to Nolan who Nol \\'T \"^ \" '\"^\"^ ^\"^^t -- proimc It w^ Nolan who found your daughter on the prairie-Th^ dnver dead but she just alive when found. To g ve her ease of mmd, Nolan said he would make the tSd ?;f °\"\\ ^^\" ^^ ''''' 'hat. she sS aS tned _to speak, but ,t was too late, and she wa2 In sudden agony Jean Jacques threw up his hands '■ButS/lf '° '°°\". \\° \"\" 8°«e!\" he%xclaimed But a child she was and had scarce tasted the world The mercy of God— what is it !\" . \"You can't take time as the measure of life \" re jomed the Youns Doctor with \" \"' '\"^' '^^- eesture \"P^I, u i . 7 ^ compassionate -S m,,.!, P' ^^f ^^ ^\"\"^ ^^\"\"'^ °f happiness coSse^\" \"'°\"' °^ \"' «\"'• '\"^yb^- '\" ^ logger niC^^tft • ^'J^ \"^^ '^\"'■t'^ a hundred years of hap-piness !'• bitterly retorted Jean Jacques. ^ cpn.i ''^ ^^^ ^\"^^ h^f child would have it?\" gently remarked the Young Doctor m'sieu-V'^TlV'^\"\" y • °° y°\" '^\"'^ 'J^^t possible, ■nsieu ? Tell me, do you think that was in he^",
         "339 The Money Master I :, mind — to have loved, and been a mother, and given her life for the child, and then the bosom of God? Answer that to me, m'siou'?\" There was intense, poignant inquiry in Jean Jacques' face, and a light seemed to play over it. The Young Doctor heeded the look and all that was in the face. It was his mission to heal, and he knew that to heal the mind was often more necessary than to heal the body. Here he would try to heal the mind, if only in a little. \"That might well have been in her thought,\" he answered. \"I saw her face. It had a wonderful look of peace, and a smile that would reconcile any-one she loved to her going. I thought of that when I looked at her. I recall it now. It was the smile of understanding.\" He had said the only thing which could have com-forted Jean Jacques at that moment. Perhaps it was meant to be that Zoe's child should represent to him all that he had lost — home, fortune, place, Car-men and Zo6. Perhaps she would be home again for him and all that home should mean — be the promise of a day when home would again include that fled from Carmen, and himself, and Carmen's child. Maybe it was sentiment in him, maybe it was sentimentality — and maybe it was not. \"Come, m'sieu',\" Jean Jacques said impatiently, \"let us go to the house of that M'sieu' Doyle. But first, mark this; I have in the West here some land — three hundred and twenty acres. It may yet be to me a home, where I shall begin once more with my Zoe's child — with my Zoe of Zoe — the home-life I",
         "340 What would you have done? Let us go at lost down by the Beau Cheval once. YetSfe:t'r.tg,::?r^7j the ^°\"\"« °-'- there would be anofw h/ . ^f \"°' ^ ^\"^^^ 'hat his grandchild asTtss'ar He'w ' {t'^J''^^-^ -ith to whom a waif of the n™- ^ - \" ^\"^°^^°'\"^''' hon. Should S ttS'Tnd^lSr dS- -^- Doyle%ndinsta„tS^le^^^^^^^^^ ^? ^-^ to hear the interview ^^,v^ . , \"^ ^\"\"^ \"° ^sh the two. Nola™ re ;trt Vtt' \"'^l' '^^^'^^ room where they were shown ,n M ^'\"'' ^\"' '\" ^^^ Norah was rocWhwir^ to Norah was a cradle. hy^he.table sheTuLlL°e\"f •°L?wt\"^\"'^^\"^ The mtroduction was of the briefest \"'Mnn • Barbae wishes a word with you Mrs DovYe \" \"J the Young Doctor \"Tf. i . '-'°y'^- said need me. MoSeur h. u \"'^\"^'\" *'\u003e^* doesn't know. . Tell thp T f\" '\" \"\"y ^^'■\u003c^' a^ you Tell him I'd iS to s^; h^^.' ''°''\" '^ ^\" \"ght. bay stallion and tie ™ ■'\"'^\"r \"^°\"' '^e them Good hjLT ^ u -^ '''' ''^^ ^n offer for at Se 6,^%^r^-^y'- ^''- D\u003c'y'e\"-he was Will decSe wha ,^^/°\" -'^ M°\"-- Barbille culty.\" ^^* ^°'^ 'he child without diffi- Jac^uls wSn?S tf' '\"' ^\"' ^^^■\"' ^\"^ J- wds aione with the woman and the child",
         "341 !!f (\u003e The Money Master \"What's best for the child!\" That was what the Young Doctor had said. Norah stopped rocking the i '■ ile and stared at the closed door. What had tl i. man before her, this tramp habitant of whom i-e had heard, of course, to do with little Zo6 in the cradle — her little Zoo who had come just when she was most needed; who had brought her man and herself close together again after an estrangement which neither had seemed able to prevent? \"What's best for the child!\" How did the child in the cradle concern this man ? Then suddenly his name almost shrieked in her brain. Barbille — that was the name on the letter ioxind on the body of the woman who died and left Zoe behind — M. Jean Jacques Barbille. Yes, that was the name. What was going to happen? Did the man intend to try and take Zo6 from her? \"What is your name — all of it?\" she asked sharp-ly. She had a very fine set of teeth, as Jean Jacques saw mechanically; and subconsciously he said to himself that they seemed cruel, they were so white and regular — and cruel. The cruelty was evident to him as she bit in two the thread for the waistcoat she was mending, and then plied her needle again. Also the needle in her fingers might have been in-tended to sew up his shroud, so angry did it appear at the moment. But her teeth had something almost savage about them If he had seen them when she was smiling, he would have thought them merely beautiful and rare, atoning for her plain face and flat breast — not so fiat as it had been ; for since the **» ^T^JF^M ^",
         "fUit",
         "Mtm^^'-^A\"^ h^ll MmjL fflifr .III 1 :",
         "m What would you have done? in her contour appeared ^^\" ner tather. I am the grandfather of this Zoi^ \" »l motioned towards the cradle ^^ cradle and looked down at thftinvf '''\"' *° *'''' pillow. There ro„lH t? '''^.'■\"y face on its white was ;v,„ f ^\"^^ 5°\"'d be no mistake about if here ^cI^JL °i ^'' '°'' ^- ^'th something t^ . Ah, the beautiful, beloved thintri\" h^lf- . m a low voice ere Nn^rcV i u ^ ^^ exclaimed mychiUdisturbrf\" ^'\"\"' =\"''•■ I »o„-. have out at once \"\"^ *^' *^'\"^ \"'^'^^ \"\u003e-' be fough? \"The child is not yours, but mine,\" he declared",
         "343 MICROCOPY RtSOlUtlON TEST CHART (ANSI Qod ISO TEST CHART No. 2) ^ APPLIED IM^GE In 165 J East Moin S!.eet Rochester, New York i»( (716) 482 - 0300 -Phone (?16) 288 - 5989 -",
         "Fox The Money Master ll ■ Hi ■ ) I', i \"Here is proof — the letter found on my Zoe when sh died — addressed to me. The doctor knew. Ther is Ao mistake.\" He held out the letter for her to see. \"As you cai read here, my daughter was on her way back to th Manor Cartier, to her old home at St. Saviour's She was on her way back when she died. If sh had lived I should have had them both; but om is left, according to the will of God. And so I wil take her — this flower of the prairie — and begin lifi again.\" The face Norah turned on him had that look whicl is in the face of an animal when its young is beinj forced from it — fierce, hungering, furtive, vicious. \"The child is mine,\" she exclaimed — \"mine anc no other's. The prairie gave it to me. It came tc me out of the storm. 'Tis mine — mine only. ] was barren and wantin', and my man was slippin from me, because there was only two of us in oui home. I was older than him, and yonder was a gir with hair like a sheaf of wheat in the sun, and she kept lookin' at him, and he kept goin' to her. 'Twas a man she wanted, 'twas a child he wanted, and there they were wantin', and me atin' my heart out with passion and pride and shame and sorrow There was he wantin' a child, and the girl v.-antin' a man, and I only wantin' what God should grant all women that give themselves to a man's arms after the priest has blessed them. And whin all was at the worst, and it looked as if he was away with her — the girl yonder — then two things hap-pened. A man — he was me own brother and a",
         "344 What would you have done? W Tm ^ \"^^ \"^y ''-^^ '°°k her and married her and then, too, Heaven's will sent thisTwid's mother to her last end and the child itsS to mv Nolan's arxns. To my husband's anns fi it eame^ you miderstand; and he give the child to me Tft should be, and said he, 'We'll make believeTt is our ■Tl^-mine\"' ''^' '° '^''\"V \"^^^^^'^ ^ -re-b^v\" sSLToi t^hTrof SorVndT: irr^ ^^ is and all's well here in the Jome^LV erCod' inVryrr^'-mTrcL-trr^-ris -^tt h\\;U°r- '-hat Sink do\"v:.in\\S-' During her passionate and defiant appeal lean Jacques was restless with the old unrest of yea s ago and his face twitched with emotion; but before she in J°\"^'^a'\"e, you are only thinking of yourself m his. You are only thinking of what you wan what you and your man need. But it's not mT' looked at that way only, and—\" * '° ^^ on'lv^'L*''? '* f\".'* *? ^ '\"\"'^^d ^t that way only, she interrupted. \"As you say, it isn't Nolan andme alone to be considered There's—\" I here s me, ' he interrupted sharply. \"The child IS bone of my bone. It is bone of all the BarM « back to the time of Louis XL^'-hrhad safd tW ong ago to Zoe first, and it was now becli^'aS ■n his mmd. \"It is linked up in the chain nf X iS:?f °' ^' ^^^'\"'^^- '' '« °- with thTg ne*' tions of noblesse and honour and virtue. It is—\"",
         "345 ! The Money Master \"It's one with Abel the son of Adam, if it come; to that, and so am I,\" Norah bitingly interjected while her eyes flashed fire, and fhe rocked the cradli more swiftly than was good for the child's sleep. Jean Jacques flared up. \"There were sons anc daughters of the fam.ily of Adam that had names but there were plenty others you whistled to as yoi would to a four-footer, and they'd come. The Bar billes had names — always names of their own bacl to Adam. The child is a Barbille Don't rod the cradle so fast,\" he suddenly added with at irritable gesture, breaking off from his argument \"Don't you know better than that when a child'; asleep? Do you want it to wake up and cry?\" She flushed to the roots of her hair, for he hac said something for which she had no reply. Sh( had undoubtedly disturbed the child. It stirred ii its sleep, then opened its eyes, and at once begar to cry. \"There,\" said Jean Jacques, \"what 1 I tel you? Anyone that had ever had childien woulc know better than that.\" Norah paid no attention to his mocking words to the undoubted truth of his complaint. Stooping ovei ^e gently Ufted the child up. V/ith hungr) tenc ess she laid it against her breast and pressed its cheek to her own, murmuring and crooning to it \"Acushla! Acushla! Ah, the pretty bird — mother's sweet — mother's angel!\" she said softly. She rocked backwards and forwards. Her eyes, though looking at Jean Jacques as she crooned and coaxed and made lullaby, apparently did not see him.",
         "346 What wniild you li,-,vc done? El«n«. allured hi, mind ll t?\" A *■ , '^ youth and innocence ,n3 home S Lh ,T? ,°' vision of the day ivhen hlo™?^ . m ' '' '\"\"' \" »St-th:^£SiSiS b;ng •.. song to my Fanchonette, ' bing a song to my Fanchonette!",
         "347 The Monev Master The wch of sleep that the weaver weaves — Weaves, weaves, weaves! Over those eyes of violet, Over those ej js of my Fanehonette, Weaves, weaves, weaves — Sec the web that the weaver weaves!\" U For quite two minutes Jean Jacques and Norah Doyle stooped over the cradle, looking at Zoc's rosy, healthy, pretty face, as though unconscious of each other and only conscious of the child. When Jean Jacques had finished the long first verse of the chanson, and would have begun another, Norah made a protesting gesture. \"She's asleep, and there's no more need,\" she said. \"Wasn't it a good lullaby, madame?\" Jean Jacques asked. \"So, so,\" she replied, on her defence again. \"It was good enough for her mother,\" he replied, pointing to the cradle. \"It's French and fanciful,\" she retorted — \"both music and words.\" \"The child's French — what would you have?\" asked Jean Jacques indignantly. \"The child's father was English, and she's goin' to be English, the darlin', from now on and on and on. That's settled. There's maimy an English and Irish lullaby that '11 be sung to her hence and on-ward; and there's manny an English song she'll sing when she's got her voice, and is big enough. Well, I think she'll sing like a canary.\" \"Do the birds sing in English?\" exclaimed Jean",
         "348 What would you have done? Jacques, with anger in his face now. Was there ever any vanity Hke the vanity of these people who had made the eonquest of Quebec, when sixteen BarbiUes lost their lives, one of them being aide-de- camp to M. Vaudreuil, the governor! \"AH the canaries I ever heard sung in English \" she returned stubbornly. \"Hovy do Frenchmen understand their singing then ? ' irritably questioned Jean Jacques. \"Well, in translation only,\" she retorted and with her sharp white teeth she again bit the black thread of her needle, tied the end into a little knot, and began to mend the waistcoat which she had laid down in the first moments of the interview. \"I want the child,\" Jean Jacques insisted abruptly. 1 II wait till she wakes, and then 1 11 wrap her up and take her away.\" \"Didn't you hear me say she was to be brought up Enghsh?\" aslied Norah, with a slowness which clothed her fiercest impulses. \"Name of God, do you think I'll let you have her! returned Jean Jacques with asperity and de-cision. \"You say you are alone, you and your M sieu Nolan. Well, I am alone-all alone in the worid, and I need her— Mother of God, I need her more than I ever needed anything in my life! You have each other, but I have only myself, and it is not good company. Besides, the child is mine, a BarbiUe of BarbiUes, une ligitime—a. rightful child of '\"^[\"^•ge- But if it was a love-child only it would still be mine, being my daughter's child. Look you It IS no such thing. It is of those who can claim",
         "349 The Money Master I inheritance back to Louis XI. She will be to me the gift of God in return for the robbery of death.\" He leaned over the rradle, and his look was like that of one who had found a treasure in the earth. Now she struck hard. Yet very subtly too did she attack him. \"You — you are thinking of your-self, m'sieu', only of yourself. Aren't you going to think of the child at all? It isn't yourself that counts so much. You've had your day, or the part of it that matters most. But her time is not yet even begun. It's all — all — before her. You say you'll take her away — well, to what? To what will 30U take her? What have you got to give her? What \" \"I have the three hundred and twenty acres out there\" — he pointed westward — \"and I will make a home and begin again with her.\" \"Three hundred and twenty acres — 'out there'!\" she exclaimed in scorn. \"Anyone can have a farm here for the askin'. 'WTiat is that? Is it a home? What have you got to start a home with? Do you deny you are no better than a tramp? Have you got a hundred dollars in the world? Have you got a roof over your head? Have you got a trade? You'll take her where — to what? Even if you had a homo, what then ? You would have to get some-one to look after her — some old crone, a wench maybe, who'd be as fit to bring up a child as I would be to \" she paused and looked round in helpless quert for a simile, when, in despair, she caught sight of Jean Jacques' watch-chain — \"as I would be to make a watch!\" she added.",
         "350 I Whiit would you have done? Instinctively Jean Jacques drew cut the ancient timepiece he had worn on the (\".ran,! Tour- which had gone down with the Anlomc and come up with ;;The good God woul.1 se. that \" he began The good God doesn't interfere in bringing up bab.es, she.etorted. ' 'That's the work for'the fathers and mothers, or godfathers and godmothers \" You are neither, ' ' exclaimed Jean Jacques. ' ' You have no rights at all.\" ,/.'^ ^Ym/° r^*'^'\"^''' I have no rights! Look at the child. Look at the way she's clothed. L^k at the crad e in which it lies. It cost fifteen dollars; and the clothes-what they cost w^ould keep a family half a year. I have no rights, is it?-I who stepped bem asked, and made ,t my own, and treated it as It was me own. No, by the love of God, I treated it far, far better than if it had been me own Be-cause a chi d was denied me, the hunger of the years made me love the child as a mother would on a desert island with one child at her knees \" :,„.,,?\" '^'\"'i^' another-one not your own, as this isn t, argued Jean Jacques fiercely. directlv^'%\"h°' 'I ^' ^T\"\" '° \"\"^\"^'- ^'^ ^^Suments directly. She chose her own course to convince. Nolan loves this child as if it was his,\" she de-clared, her eyes all afire, \"but he mightn't k e wi\"rr? \"I ''r^' creatures. Then where wou d I be? and what would the home be but what It was before-as cold, as cold and bitter!",
         "It The Money Aliufor ; was the hand of God brouRht the child to the door of two people who had no child and who prayed for one. to you \u003c, y it was the hand of God that brought your daughter hereawiy, that put the child in my arms? Not its mother, am I not? But I love her better than twenty mothers could. It's the hunger— the hunger— the hunger in me. She's made a woman of me. She has a home where every-thing is hers— everything. To see Nolan play with her, tossin' her up and down in his arms as if he'd done it all his life — as natural as natural! To take her away fron. that— all the comfort here where she can have annything she wants! With my old mother to care for her, if so be I was away to mar-ket or whereabouts— one that brought up six chil-dren, a millionaire among them, praise be to God as my mother did— to take this delicate little thing away from here, what a sin and crime 'twould be! She herself 'd never forgive you for it, if ever she grew up — though that's not likely, things bein' as they are with you, and you bein' what you are. Ah, there — there she is awake and smilin', and kickin' up her pretty toes this minute! There she is, the lovely little Zoe, with eyes like black pearls. . . . See now — see now which she'll come to — to you or me, m'sieu'. There, put out your arms to her, and I'll put out mine, and see which she'll take. I'll stand by that— I'll stand by that. Let the child decidf!. Hold out your arms, and so will I.\" With an impassioned word lean Jacques reached down his arms to the child, wi^ch lay laughing up at them and kicking its pink toes into the air, and",
         "352 J^])^^^J»™^l_youhnve \u003cl(.iu.? Kurt rch'S ^~=:::::^::^^^r;^. Tt,, I . • \"\u003e-^\"\u003c-s iiiL enn 01 a toilsome mnrt The laughing child crooned and si.luuemi nn i voice '' '\"•\" '^''^ ■'\"''\" J^^'J\"'^^ -ith shakin, thi3°\" !?\"'''' \"°i*''\"8 '° g'^e hcr-I have everv Sor tt c*;:^?- o?^J,\"«''.^^ -'^ 'hat I Zfd youg^ingtoti'm-sreu'-'''\" '\"\"^^•' • ■ ■ ''-^^' - towards a wall to n.eet^hc:\\J,r A n^'squt\" You are going?\" Norah wh.s ered and Th. golden link binding Nolan and arms, over her heart. Jean Jacques did not speak a ^■, his hps moved. She held out the thJ ^fl^-^y^' but he shook his h, itl^'[^'' .°\"\"f ''^'d her in his arms be able to give her up Gravely and s\u003e. 353 ^^as in her \"«T5ly, though le one to him ' If he did e w ( 'uld not ^nl\\,",
         "Viow- The Money Muster ever, hi; stooped over and kissed the lips of the child lyinj; against Norah's hvcast. As he did so, with a (luick, mothering instinct \\orah impulsively kissed his sha\u003e;Ky head, and her eyes fdled wiui tears. She smiled too, and Jean Jaccjues saw how beautiful her teeth were — cruel no lonper. He moved away slowly. At the door he nrncd, and looked back at the two — a lon^;, liny;eriii(» look he gave. Then he faced away from them attain. \"Moi — jc stiis I'hitosol'hi-,\" he said K'-'\"l'y. and opened the door and stepped out ..d away into the frozen",
         "world. ; ihihl with Isivt'ly wiui I' how irncd, K look ,n. , and to the EPILOGUE QH;,W E miRht lay its hand on the parish of s^iSt srt4,ri'o f ;l:v\" ''- ''•'^'^\"' One autumn when the hillsides woro in . station, from which there Z. T^ the railway- miles to Vilrav At thn T ; J\"^'\"\" \"' \"^^'\"^l",
         "3SS The Money Master .^'1 scarce believe that you are here once more. Have you good news?\" \"It was to come back with good news that I went,\" her brother answered smiling, his face lighted by an inner exaltation. \"Dear, dear Fille!\" She always called him that now, and not by his Christian name, as though he was a peer. She had done so ever since the Govern-ment had made him a magistrate, and Laval Univer-sity had honoured him with the degree of doctor of laws. She was leading him to the pony-carriage in which she had come to meet him, when he said: \"Do you think you could walk the distance, my dear? ... It would be like old times,\" he added gently. \"I could walk twice as far to-day,\" she answered, and at once gave directions for the young coachman to put \"His Honour's\" bag into the carriage. In spite of Fille's reproofs she insisted in calhng him that to the servants. They had two servants now, thanks to the legacy left them by the late Judge Carcasson. Presently M. Fille took her by the hand. \"Before we start — one look yonder,\" he murmured, pointing towards the mill which had once belonged to Jean Jacques, now rebuilt and looking almost as of old. \"I promised Jean Jacques that I would come and salute it in his name, before I did aught else, and so now I do salute it.\" He waved a hand and made a bow to the gold Cock of Beaugard, the pride of all the vanished Barbilles.",
         "356 Epilogue Have \"Jean Jacques BarbiUe says that his head is un hke yours M. le Coq, and he wishes you many T^LTJ^l'\" '°'\"''\" ^' '''^\"\"' '^^it^ -rio-l™and world ^ ^^' \"°' °\"' °^ *\"\"^ ^'th the mcidern The gold Cock of Beaugard seemed to understand for 1 swung to the left, and now a httle to the right' and then stood still, as if looking at the httle pR exiles from an ancient worldA.f which the Tnly vest^es remaining may be found in old Quebec This ceremony over, they walked towards Mont Violet, averting their heads as they passed the Manor Cartier in a kind of tribute to its departed master -as a Stuart Legitimist might pass the big palace P ll /t ^^ '^' ^f '\" ^\"'^°\"- I\" the wofd pS Fille took his sister's hand. ^ ' he'if -'ThZ Ty^^' ^°\" ^'^ '° ''\"^^^^S t° hear.\" ne said. There they are at peace, Jean Tacoues and Virgime-that best of best women '■ thZVtS^T^''^ .*° ^'''^'\"'•= Poucette-to \"But entirely. There was nothing in the wav- and she m^nt to have him, the dear soul I Inot Wame her, for at bottom he is as good a man as lives Our Judge called him 'That dear fool, Jean J™s a man of men in his way, after all,- and our Judge was always nght-but yes, nearly always right\"' sumS' ''^^\"1°^ ^?\"*\"\"'\"^ meditation he re-sumed. Well, when Virginie sold her place here and went to live with her sister out at Shu5i In the West, she said. 'If Jean Jacques is alive, h^^nt",
         "357 \u003e The Money Master on the land which was Zn6's, which he bought for her. If he is alive — then!' So it was, and by one of the strange accidents which chance or women like Virginie, who have plenty of courage in their simpleness, arrange, they met on that three hundred and sixty acres. It was like the genius of Jean Jacques to have done that one right thing which would save him in the end — a thing which came out of his love for his child — the emotion of an hour. Indeed, that three hundred and sixty acres was his salvation after he learned of Zoe's death, and the other little Zoe, his grandchild, was denied to him — to close his heart against what seemed that last hope, was it not courage? And so, and so he has the reward of his own soul — a home at last once \"With Virginie Poucette — Fille, Fille, how things come round!\" exclaimed the little lady in the tiny bonnet with the mauve strings. \"More than Virginie came round,\" he replied almost oracularly. \"Who, think you, brought him the news that coal was found on his acres — who but the husband of Virginie's sister! Then came Vir-ginie. On the dcay Jean Jacques saw her again, he said to her, 'WTiat you would have given me at such cost, now let me pay for with the rest of my life. It is the great thought which was in your heart that I will pay for with the days left to me.' \" A flickering smile brightened the sensitive ascetic face, and humour was in the eyes. \"What do you think Virginie said to that? Her sister told me. Virginie said to that, 'You will have more days left,",
         "358 . I^pilogiie laughed much at tha^^? Irs to h^'\" L'T\"' made a speech at it!\" ^ \"^'\"\"^^ ^^ve ;;Then he is no more a philosopher?\" with°Lt::Se.^'n^'ed'ii\" '':,.!jr' -^^ -^ met and whef we parted ' I think ?' \"\"'' \"'^\" ^'^ for indeed I could'not help it \"et Ce'w^'\"^ °\"' m his eyes— peace.\" ^^^ P^ace ;;His eyes used to rustle so.\" he htt^e'dt'hf^thT'^- ^°\"' ^'^^^ - -hat left him, it was withV ^^^^ ^''\"'- '^^^ ^ when I ad to him^Wlf \"'' ''°'° ^^^''^^ W'\"- and day. Jean JacSLTs^'T s'id 'T. '^*^° \"^ °- friend; it is too far.' I see t' iM \"°'.. '\"\"' '\"^^ away— too ereat a in„l . \" °- '\"'\"'°n miles with'the so'JiTXv'u'i ° V* ^ ''=^*' ^\"* traveller. I see it pk! .u ^°\"' '^ ^ S^eat busings andThe\"pittll7S^trof 't ^'^ memory as it was when I w!s a^M w if^^\" ■t .s, e-eo^thing has changed except If '^^f my love iust\\hTsamVStnr tr-?\" ^.^^■^\" \";r5erni:cl::ft:.^----.^-^^ that^S^a;i:t^e2^!?— tL'^T^^^^ terrupting. ^^id his sister in- \"Yes. yes, one knows-he said it often",
         "enough The Money Master and had need enough to say it. Well, said he to me, 'Me, I am a ' then he stopped, shook his head, and so I could scarcely hear him, murmured, 'Me — I am a man who has been a long journey with a pack on his back, and has got home again.' Then he took Virginie's hand in his.\" The old man's fingers touched the comer of his eye as though to find something there ; then he con-tinued. '\"Ah, a pedlar!' said I to him, to hear what he would answer. 'Follies to sell for sous of wisdom,' he answered. Then he put his arm aroimd Virginie, and she gave him his pipe.\" \"I wish M. Carcasson knew,\" the Uttle grey lady remarked. \"But of course he knows,\" said the Clerk of the Cotirt, with his face turned to ..ne sunset. THE",
         "END 1 he to 3ok his •mured, sy with Then • of his he con- to hear sous of around ey lady : of"
      ],
